{"Sydenham chorea": {"description": "Sydenham chorea is a movement disorder that occurs with rheumatic fever.", "Possible Complications": "No complications are expected.", "Symptoms": ["Changes in handwriting", "Jerky, uncontrollable, and purposeless movements that look like twitches; the abnormal movements disappear during sleep", "Loss of fine motor control, especially of the fingers and hands", "Loss of emotional control, with bouts of inappropriate crying or laughing", "Symptoms of rheumatic fever (See: Acute rheumatic fever)"], "Exams and Tests": "There may be a history of sore throat for several weeks before Sydenham chorea.Blood tests that may show signs of rheumatic fever include erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR). Other blood tests may show proteins in the blood associated with Sydenham chorea and a past strep infection.Different blood tests may be done to identify whether the child may have a strep infection.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to kill the bacteria that cause rheumatic fever. The doctor may also prescribe antibiotics to prevent future rheumatic fever infections. This is called preventive antibiotics, or antibiotic prophylaxis.Symptoms will be treated as appropriate. Sedation may be needed in severe cases.", "Causes": "Sydenham chorea is a major sign of acute rheumatic fever. The person may currently or recently have had the disease. Sydenham chorea may be the only sign of rheumatic fever in some patients.Sydenham chorea occurs most often in girls before puberty, but may be seen in boys.", "Prevention": "Pay careful attention to children's complaints of sore throats and get early treatment to prevent acute rheumatic fever. If there is a strong family history of rheumatic fever, be especially watchful, because your children may be more likely to develop this infection."}, "Silent thyroiditis": {"Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Frequent bowel movements", "Heat intolerance", "Increased appetite", "Increased sweating", "Irregular menstrual periods", "Irritability", "Muscle cramps", "Nervousness, restlessness", "Palpitations", "Weakness", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show:Enlarged thyroid gland, Rapid heart rate, Shaking hands. Tests that may be done include:Radioactive iodine uptake, Thyroid hormones T3 and T4. ", "description": "Silent thyroiditis is swelling (inflammation) of the thyroid gland. The disorder can cause hyperthyroidism, followed by\u00a0hypothyroidism.", "Causes": "The cause of this type of thyroiditis is unknown, but it is related to an immune attack against the thyroid. The disease affects women more often than men.The disease can occur in women who have just had a baby. It can also be caused by medicines such as interferon and amiodarone.", "Treatment": "Treatment is based on symptoms. Medicines called beta-blockers may be used to\u00a0relieve rapid heart rate and excessive sweating."}, "Sleepwalking": {"description": "Sleepwalking is a disorder that occurs when people walk or do other activity while they are still asleep.", "Symptoms": ["Acting confused or disoriented when the person\u00a0wakes up", "Aggressive behavior when woken uip by someone else", "Having a blank look on the face", "Opening eyes during sleep", "Not remembering the sleep walking episode when they wake up", "Performing detailed activity of any type during sleep", "Sitting up and appearing awake during sleep", "Taking in sleep and saying things that do not make sense", "Walking during sleep"], "Exams and Tests": "Usually, examinations and testing are not needed. If the sleepwalking occurs often, the doctor may do an exam or tests to rule out other disorders (such as partial complex seizures).If\u00a0the person\u00a0has a history of emotional problems,\u00a0they also may need to have a psychological evaluation to look for causes such as excessive anxiety or stress.", "Causes": "The normal sleep cycle has stages, from light drowsiness to deep sleep. During the stage called rapid eye movement (REM) sleep, the eyes move quickly and vivid dreaming is most common.Each night people go through several cycles of non-REM and REM sleep. Sleepwalking (somnambulism) most often occurs during deep, non-REM sleep (stage 3 or stage 4 sleep) early in the night. If it occurs during REM sleep, it is part of REM behavior disorder and tends to happen near morning.The cause of sleepwalking in children is usually unknown. Fatigue, lack of sleep, and anxiety are all associated with sleepwalking. In adults, sleepwalking may occur due to:Alcohol, sedatives, or other medication, Medical conditions, such as partial complex seizures, Mental disorders . In the elderly, sleepwalking may be a symptom of an organic brain syndrome or REM behavior disorders.Sleepwalking can occur at any age, but it happens most often in children ages 5\u00a0through 12. It appears to run in families.", "Prevention": "Do not use\u00a0alcohol or anti-depressant medicines\u00a0if you sleepwalk., Avoid getting too tired and try to prevent insomnia, because this can trigger sleepwalking., Avoid or minimize stress, anxiety, and conflict, which can worsen the condition.. ", "Treatment": "Most persons do not need specific treatment for sleepwalking.In some cases, short-acting tranquilizers have been helpful in reducing sleepwalking episodes.Some people mistakenly believe that a sleepwalker should not be awakened. It is not dangerous to awaken a sleepwalker, although it is common for the person to be confused or disoriented for a short time when they wake up.Another misconception is that a person cannot be injured while sleepwalking. Sleepwalkers are commonly injured when they trip and lose their balance.Safety measures may be needed to prevent injury. This may include moving objects such as electrical cords or furniture to reduce the chance of tripping and falling. Stairways may need to be blocked with a gate."}, "Stomach cancer": {"description": "Stomach cancer is cancer that starts in the stomach.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal fullness or pain, which may occur after a small meal", "Dark stools", "Difficulty swallowing, which becomes worse over time", "Excessive belching", "General decline in health", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Vomiting blood", "Weakness or fatigue", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis is often delayed because symptoms may not occur in the early stages of the disease. And many of the symptoms do not specifically point to stomach cancer. So, people often self-treat symptoms that gastric cancer has in common with other, less serious, disorders (bloating, gas, heartburn, and fullness).Tests that can help diagnose gastric cancer include:Complete blood count (CBC) to check for anemia., Esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD) with biopsy to examine the stomach tissue. EGD involves putting a tiny camera down the esophagus (food tube) to look at the inside of the stomach., Stool test to check for blood in the stools. . ", "Causes": "Several types of cancer can occur in the stomach. The most common type is called adenocarcinoma. It starts from one of the cell types found in the lining of the stomach.Adenocarcinoma is a common cancer of the digestive tract. It is not very common in the United States. It is diagnosed much more often in people in eastern Asia, parts of South America, and eastern and central Europe. It occurs most often in men over age 40.The number of people in the United States who develop this cancer has decreased over the years. Experts think this decrease may be in part because people are eating less salted, cured, and smoked foods.You are more likely to be diagnosed with gastric cancer if you: Have a diet low in fruits and vegetables, Have a family history of gastric cancer, Have an infection of the stomach by a bacteria called Helicobacter pylori, Had a polyp larger than 2 centimeters in your stomach, Have inflammation and swelling of the stomach for a long time (chronic atrophic gastritis), Have pernicious anemia, Smoke . ", "Prevention": "Screening programs are successful in detecting disease in the early stages in parts of the world where the risk of stomach cancer is much higher than in the United States. The value of screening in the United States and other countries with much lower rates of stomach cancer is not clear.The following may help reduce your risk of stomach cancer:DO NOT smoke., Keep a healthy diet rich in fruits and vegetables., Take medicines to treat reflux disease (heartburn), if you have it., Take antibiotics if you are diagnosed with H. pylori infection. . ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the stomach (gastrectomy) is the only treatment that can cure adenocarcinoma of the stomach. Radiation therapy and chemotherapy may help. Chemotherapy and radiation therapy after surgery may improve the chance of a cure.For people who cannot have surgery, chemotherapy or radiation may improve symptoms and may prolong survival, but will likely not cure the cancer. For some people, a surgical bypass procedure may relieve symptoms."}, "Small intestinal ischemia and infarction": {"description": "Intestinal ischemia and infarction is damage to (ischemia) or death of (infarction) part of the intestine. It is due to a decrease in the blood supply to the area.", "Possible Complications": "Intestinal infarction may require a colostomy or ileostomy, which may be short-term or permanent. Peritonitis is common in these cases. People who have a large amount of tissue death in the intestine can have problems absorbing nutrients. They can become dependent on intravenous nutrition. Some people may become severely ill with fever and a bloodstream infection (sepsis).", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Fever", "Vomiting", "Severe abdominal pain, even though the area is not very tender when touched"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests may show a high white blood cell (WBC) count (a marker of infection) and increased acid in the bloodstream. There may be bleeding in the GI tract.Other tests include:Angiogram, CT scan of the abdomen, Doppler ultrasound of the abdomen . These tests do not always diagnose the problem. Sometimes, the only sure way to diagnose intestinal ischemia is with a surgical procedure.", "Treatment": "In most cases, the condition needs to be treated with surgery. The section of intestine that has died is removed, and the healthy remaining ends of the bowel are reconnected.In some cases, a colostomy or ileostomy is needed. The blockage of arteries to the intestine is corrected, if possible.", "Causes": "There are several possible causes of intestinal ischemia and infarction.Hernia: If the intestine moves into the wrong place or becomes tangled, this can cut off blood flow. , Adhesions: The intestine may become trapped in scar tissue from past surgery (adhesions). This can lead to ischemia if left untreated., Embolus: A blood clot from the heart or main blood vessels may travel through the bloodstream and block one of the arteries supplying the intestine. People who have had a heart attack or who have arrhythmias, such as atrial fibrillation, are at risk for this problem., Arterial thrombosis: The arteries that supply blood to the intestine may become so narrowed or blocked from atherosclerotic disease (cholesterol buildup). When this happens in the arteries to the heart, it causes a heart attack. When it happens in the arteries to the intestine, it causes intestinal ischemia., Venous thrombosis: The veins carrying blood away from the intestines may become blocked by blood clots This interrupts blood flow in the intestines. This is more common in people with liver disease, cancer, or blood clotting disorders., Low blood pressure: Very low blood pressure in patients who already have narrowing of the intestinal arteries may also cause intestinal ischemia. This often occurs in people with other serious medical problems. . ", "Prevention": "Preventive measures include:Control risk factors, such as irregular heartbeat, high blood pressure, and high cholesterol, Do not smoke , Eat a nutritious diet, Quickly treat hernias. "}, "Stuttering": {"description": "Stuttering is a speech disorder in which sounds, syllables, or words are repeated or last longer than normal. These problems cause a break in the flow of speech (called disfluency).", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications of stuttering include social problems caused by the fear of teasing, which may make a child avoid speaking entirely.", "Symptoms": ["Feeling frustrated when trying to communicate", "Pausing or hesitating when starting or during sentences, phrases, or words, often with the lips together", "Putting in (interjecting) extra sounds or words (\"We went to the...uh...store\")", "Repeating sounds, words, parts of words, or phrases (\"I want...I want my doll,\" \"I...I see you,\" or \"Ca-ca-ca-can\")", "Tension in the voice", "Very long sounds within words (\"I am Booooobbbby Jones\" or \"Llllllllike\")", "Eye blinking", "Jerking of the head or other body parts", "Jaw jerking"], "Exams and Tests": "No testing is usually necessary. The diagnosis of stuttering may require consultation with a speech pathologist.", "Treatment": "There is no one best treatment for stuttering. Most early cases are short-term and resolve on their own.Speech therapy may be helpful if:Stuttering has lasted more than 3\u00a0to 6 months, or the \"blocked\" speech lasts several seconds, The child appears to be struggling when stuttering, or is embarrassed, There is a family history of stuttering. Speech therapy can help make the speech more fluent or smooth.Parents are encouraged to:Avoid expressing too much concern about the stuttering, which can actually make matters worse by making the child more self-conscious, Avoid stressful social situations whenever possible, Listen patiently to the child, make eye contact, don't interrupt, and show love and acceptance. Avoid finishing sentences for them., Set aside time for talking, Talk openly about stuttering when the child brings it up, letting them know you understand their frustration, Talk with the speech therapist about when to gently correct the stuttering . Taking medicine has not been shown to be helpful for stuttering.It is not clear whether electronic devices help with stuttering.Self-help groups are often helpful for both the child and family.", "Causes": "About 5% of children (1 of every 20 children) ages 2\u00a0to 5 will develop some stuttering during their childhood. It may last for several weeks to several years.For a small number of children (less than 1%), stuttering does not go away and may get worse. This is called developmental stuttering and it is the most common type of stuttering.Stuttering tends to run in families. Genes that cause stuttering have been identified.There is also evidence that stuttering is a result of brain injuries, such as stroke or traumatic brain injuries.In rare cases, stuttering is caused by emotional trauma (called psychogenic stuttering).Stuttering is more common in boys than girls. It also tends to persist into adulthood more often in boys than in girls.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent stuttering."}, "Swallowing soap": {"Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Stable angina": {"description": "Stable angina is chest pain or discomfort that most often occurs with activity or stress. Angina is due to poor blood flow through the blood vessels in the heart.", "Symptoms": ["Arm (most often the left)", "Back", "Jaw", "Neck", "Shoulder", "Fatigue", "Shortness of breath", "Weakness", "Dizziness or light-headedness", "Nausea, vomiting, and sweating", "Palpitations", "Most often comes on after activity or stress", "Lasts an average of 1 to 15 minutes", "Is relieved with rest or a medicine called nitroglycerin"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you and check your blood pressure. Tests that may be done include:Coronary angiography, Coronary risk profile (special blood tests), ECG, Exercise tolerance test (stress test or treadmill test), Nuclear medicine (thallium) stress test, Stress echocardiogram . ", "Causes": "Your heart muscle needs a constant supply of oxygen. The coronary arteries carry blood containing oxygen to the heart.When the heart muscle has to work harder, it needs more oxygen. Symptoms of angina occur when the coronary arteries are narrowed or blocked by atherosclerosis or by a blood clot.The most common cause of angina is coronary artery disease. Angina pectoris is the medical term for this type of chest pain.Stable angina is less serious than unstable angina, but it can be very painful or uncomfortable.There are many risk factors for coronary artery disease. Some include:Diabetes\u00a0, High blood pressure, High LDL cholesterol and low HDL cholesterol, Smoking . Anything that makes the heart muscle need more oxygen or reduces the amount of oxygen it receives can cause an angina attack in someone with heart disease, including:Cold weather, Exercise, Emotional stress, Large meals. Other causes of angina include:Abnormal heart rhythms (your heart beats very quickly or your heart rhythm is not regular), Anemia, Coronary artery spasm (also called Prinzmetal's angina), Heart failure, Heart valve disease, Hyperthyroidism (overactive thyroid). ", "Prevention": "A risk factor is something about you that increases your chance of getting a disease or having a certain health condition.Some risk factors for heart disease you cannot change, but some you can. Changing the risk factors that you can control will help you live a longer, healthier life.", "Treatment": "Treatment for angina can include:Lifestyle changes, Medicines, Procedures such as coronary angiography with stent placement, Coronary artery bypass surgery. If you have angina, you and your doctor will develop a daily treatment plan. This plan should include:Medicines you regularly take to prevent angina, Activities that you can do and those you should avoid, Medicines you should take when you have angina pain, Signs that mean your angina is getting worse, When you should call the doctor or get emergency medical help. MEDICINESYou may need to take one or more medicines to treat blood pressure, diabetes, or high cholesterol levels. Follow your doctor's directions closely to help prevent your angina from getting worse.Nitroglycerin pills or spray may be used to stop chest pain.Anti-clotting drugs such as aspirin and clopidogrel (Plavix) or prasugrel (Effient) can help prevent blood clots from forming in your arteries, and reduce the risk of heart attack. Ask your doctor if you should be taking these medicines.Your doctor may give you one or more medicines to help prevent you from having angina. These include:ACE inhibitors to lower blood pressure and protect your heart, Beta-blockers to lower heart rate, blood pressure, and oxygen use by the heart, Calcium channel blockers to relax arteries, lower blood pressure, and reduce strain on the heart, Nitrates to help prevent angina, Ranolazine (Ranexa) to treat chronic angina. NEVER STOP TAKING ANY OF THESE DRUGS ON YOUR OWN. Always talk to your doctor first. Stopping these drugs suddenly can make your angina worse or cause a heart attack. This is especially true of anti-clotting drugs (aspirin, clopidogrel, and prasugrel).Your doctor may recommend a cardiac rehabilitation program to help improve your heart's fitness.SURGICAL TREATMENTSome people will be able to control angina with medicines and not need surgery. Others will need a procedure called angioplasty and stent placement (also called percutaneous coronary intervention) to open blocked or narrowed arteries that supply blood to the heart.Blockages that cannot be treated with angioplasty may need heart bypass surgery to replace the damaged blood vessels."}, "Stress incontinence": {"description": "Stress incontinence occurs when your bladder leaks urine during physical activity or exertion. It may happen when you cough, lift something heavy, or exercise.", "Possible Complications": "Physical complications are rare and usually mild, but they can include:Wearing away of materials placed during surgery, such as a sling or artificial sphincter, Fistulas or abscesses, Irritation of the vagina lips (vulva), Pain during intercourse, Skin sores in people who can't get out of the bed or chair, Unpleasant odors, Urinary tract infections, Vaginal discharge. The condition may get in the way of social activities, careers, and relationships. It also may make you feel embarrassed or bad about yourself.", "Symptoms": ["Are physically active", "Cough", "Exercise", "Have sexual intercourse", "Sneeze", "Stand"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam, including a:Genital exam in men, Pelvic exam in women, Rectal exam. In some women, a pelvic examination may show that the bladder or urethra is bulging into the vagina.Tests may include:Cystoscopy to look inside the bladder, Pad test. You exercise while wearing a sanitary pad.\u00a0Then the pad is weighed to find out how much urine you lost., Pelvic or abdominal ultrasound, Post-void residual (PVR) to measure the amount of urine left after you urinate, Urinalysis to check for urinary tract infection, Urinary stress test (you stand with a full bladder and then cough), Urodynamic studies to measure pressure and urine flow, X-rays with contrast dye\u00a0to look at your\u00a0kidneys and bladder. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on how your symptoms affect your life. Your health care provider may ask you to keep a urinary diary. You can record how many times you urinate during the day and night, and how often you leak urine.There are four types of treatment for stress incontinence:Behavior changes, Medication, Pelvic floor muscle training, Surgery. BEHAVIOR CHANGESMaking these changes may help:Drink less fluid (if you drink more than normal amounts of fluid)., Don't hold it. Urinate when you first feel the urge. This may help reduce the amount of urine that leaks., Avoid jumping or running., Take fiber to avoid constipation, which can make urinary incontinence worse., Quit smoking. This can reduce coughing and bladder irritation. Smoking also increases your risk for bladder cancer., Avoid alcohol and caffeinated drinks such as coffee. They can cause the urge to urinate., Lose excess weight., Avoid foods and drinks that may irritate your bladder. These include spicy foods, carbonated drinks, and citrus., If you have diabetes, keep your blood sugar under good control.. PELVIC FLOOR MUSCLE TRAININGThere are different ways to strengthen the muscles in your pelvic floor.Biofeedback. This method can help you learn to identify and control your pelvic floor muscles., Kegel exercises can help keep the muscle around your urethra strong and working well. This may help keep you from leaking urine., Vaginal cones. You place the cone into the vagina. Then you try to squeeze your pelvic floor muscles to hold the cone in place. You can wear the cone for up to 15 minutes at a time, two times a day. You may notice improvement in your symptoms in 4 to 6 weeks.. MEDICINESMedicines tend to work better if you have mild to moderate incontinence. Your doctor may prescribe one or more medicine.Anticholinergic medicines help relax the muscles of the bladder. They include oxybutynin (Oxytrol, Ditropan), tolterodine (Detrol), darifenacin (Enablex), trospium (Sanctura), and solifenacin (Vesicare)., Antimuscarinic drugs block bladder contractions., Estrogen therapy may help improve symptoms in women who have gone through menopause. It is applied as a cream or inserted into your vagina as a tablet or ring., Imipramine, a tricyclic antidepressant, helps relax bladder muscles.. SURGERIESIf other treatments do not\u00a0work, your doctor may recommend surgery. Surgery may help if you have severe incontinence. Most health care providers suggest surgery only after trying other treatments.Anterior vaginal repair helps restore weak and sagging vaginal walls. This is used when the bladder bulges into the vagina (prolapse)., Artificial urinary sphincter. This is a device used to keep urine from leaking. It is used mainly in men., Collagen injections make the area around the urethra thicker. This helps control leakage. The procedure may need to be repeated after a few months., Male sling is a mesh tape used to put pressure on the urethra. It is easier to do than placing an artificial urinary sphincter., Retropubic suspensions lift the bladder and urethra., Tension-free vaginal tape supports the bladder and urethra., Vaginal sling procedures use a sling to support the urethra.. If you have trouble completely emptying your bladder, you may need to use a catheter. This is a very small tube you completely emptying your bladder, you may need to use a catheter. This is a very small tube you place in your urethra to drain urine from your bladder.\u00a0\u00a0\r\n", "Causes": "Most adults can hold over 2 cups of urine in their bladder. Stress incontinence occurs when the muscles that control your urine flow don't work properly.The bladder and urethra are supported by the pelvic floor muscles. Urine flows from your bladder through your urethra to the outside., The sphincter is a muscle around the opening of the bladder. It squeezes to prevent urine from leaking through the urethra.. When either set of muscles become weak, urine can pass when pressure is placed on your bladder. You may notice it when you:Cough, Sneeze, Laugh, Exercise, Lift heavy objects. Weakened muscles may be caused by:Childbirth, Injury to the urethra area, Some medications, Surgery in the pelvic area or the prostate (in men). Stress incontinence is the most common type in women. Certain things increase your risk:If you have had more than one pregnancy and vaginal delivery. , If you have pelvic prolapse. This is when your bladder, urethra, or rectum slide into the vagina. Delivering a baby can cause nerve or tissue damage in the pelvic area. This can lead to pelvic prolapse months or years after delivery.. ", "Prevention": "Doing Kegel exercises may help prevent symptoms. Women who are pregnant may want to do Kegels during and after pregnancy\u00a0to help prevent incontinence."}, "Sleeping sickness": {"description": "Sleeping sickness is an infection caused by germs carried by certain flies. It results in swelling of the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Injury related to falling asleep while driving or during other activities, Gradual damage to the nervous system, Uncontrollable sleep as the disease gets worse, Coma . ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Mood changes", "Fever", "Headache", "Weakness", "Insomnia at night", "Sleepiness during the day (may be uncontrollable)", "Sweating", "Swollen lymph nodes all over the body", "Swollen, red, painful nodule at site of the fly bite "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show inflammation of the brain and its covering.Tests include the following:Blood smear, Cerebrospinal fluid tests (fluid from your spinal cord), Complete blood count (CBC), Lymph node aspiration. Most antibody and antigen tests are not helpful because they cannot tell the difference between current and past infections. Specific levels of antibodies called IgM in the cerebrospinal fluid may be more helpful.", "Treatment": "Medicines used to treat this disorder include:Eflornithine (for T. b. gambiense only), Melarsoprol, Pentamidine (for T. b. gambiense only), Suramin (Antrypol) . Some people may receive a combination of these medicines.", "Causes": "Sleeping sickness is caused byTrypanosoma brucei rhodesiense and Trypanosomoa brucei gambiense. T. b. rhodesiense causes the more severe form of the illness.Tsetse flies carry the infection. When an infected fly bites you, the infection spreads through your blood.Risk factors include living in parts of Africa where the disease is found and being bitten by tsetse flies. The disease does not occur in the United States, but travelers who have visited or lived in Africa can be infected.", "Prevention": "Pentamidine injections protect against T. b. gambiense, but not against T. b. rhodesiense. Because this medicine is toxic, using it for prevention is not recommended.Insect control measures can help prevent the spread of sleeping sickness in high-risk areas."}, "Sports cream overdose": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Eye irritation", "Loss of vision", "Ringing in the ears", "Throat swelling", "Kidney failure", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Collapse", "Convulsions", "Hyperactivity", "Rash (usually an allergic reaction)", "Mild burn (in extremely high doses)", "Nausea", "Vomiting, possibly with blood"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222. ", "Prevention": "Keep all medications and poisons in child-proof containers and out of the reach of children."}, "Scorpions": {"Symptoms": ["Double vision", "Difficulty breathing", "No breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Drooling", "Spasm of the larynx (voice box)", "Thick-feeling tongue", "High blood pressure", "Increased or decreased heart rate", "Irregular heartbeat", "Urinary incontinence", "Urine output, decreased", "Muscle spasms", "Convulsions", "Paralysis", "Random movements of head, eye, or neck", "Restlessness", "Seizures", "Stiffness", "Abdominal cramps", "Fecal incontinence"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Social anxiety disorder": {"description": "Social anxiety disorder is a persistent and irrational fear of situations that may involve scrutiny or judgment by others, such as at parties and other social events.", "Possible Complications": "Alcohol use to combat anxiety, Alcohol or other drug dependence\r\n, Loneliness and social isolation. ", "Symptoms": ["Blushing", "Difficulty talking", "Nausea", "Profuse sweating", "Trembling ", "Attending parties and other social occasions", "Eating, drinking, and writing in public", "Meeting new people", "Speaking in public", "Using public restrooms "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look at your history of social anxiety and will get a description of the behavior from you, your family, and friends.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you function effectively. The success of the treatment usually depends on the severity of the phobia.Anti-anxiety and antidepressant medications are sometimes used to help relieve the symptoms. See: Panic Disorder for more information about medications.Behavioral treatment may have long-lasting benefits:Cognitive behavioral therapy helps you understand and change the thoughts that are causing your condition, as well as learn to recognize and replace panic-causing thoughts., Systematic desensitization or exposure therapy may be used. You are asked to relax, then imagine the situations that cause the anxiety, working from the least fearful to the most fearful. Gradual exposure to the real-life situation has also been used with success to help people overcome their fears., Social skills training may involve social contact in a group therapy situation to practice social skills. Role playing and modeling are techniques used to help you become more comfortable relating to others in a social situation. . Lifestyle changes may help reduce how often the attacks occur.Get regular exercise, enough sleep, and regularly scheduled meals., Reduce or avoid the use of caffeine, some over-the-counter cold medicines, and other stimulants. . ", "Causes": "People with social anxiety disorder fear and avoid situations in which they may be judged by others. It may begin in adolescence and may have to do with overprotective parents or limited social opportunities. Males and females are affected equally with this disorder.People with social phobia are at high risk for alcohol or other drug use. This is because they may come to rely on alcohol or drugs to relax in social situations."}, "Scrofula": {"description": "Scrofula is a tuberculosis infection of the lymph nodes in the neck.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur from this infection:Draining sore in the neck, Scarring . ", "Symptoms": ["Fevers (rare)", "Painless swelling of lymph nodes in the neck and other areas of the body", "Sores (rare)", "Sweats "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests to diagnose scrofula include:Biopsy of affected tissue, Chest x-rays, CT scan of the neck, Cultures to check for the bacteria in tissue samples taken from the lymph nodes, HIV blood test, PPD test (also called TB test), Other tests for tuberculosis (TB) . ", "Treatment": "When infection is caused by Mycobacterium tuberculosis, treatment usually involves 9 to 12 months of antibiotics. Several antibiotics need to be used at once. Common antibiotics for scrofula include:Ethambutol, Isoniazid (INH), Pyrazinamide, Rifampin . When infection is caused by another type of mycobacteria (which often occurs in children), treatment usually involves antibiotics such as: Rifampin, Ethambutol, Clarithromycin . Surgery is sometimes used first. It may also be used if the medicines are not working.", "Causes": "Scrofula is most often caused by the bacteria Mycobacterium tuberculosis. It is usually caused by breathing in contaminated air.", "Prevention": "People who have been exposed to someone with tuberculosis of the lungs should have a PPD test."}, "Sj\u00f6gren syndrome": {"description": "Sj\u00f6gren syndrome is an autoimmune disorder in which the glands that produce tears and saliva are destroyed. This causes\u00a0dry mouth and dry eyes. The condition may affect other parts of the body, including the kidneys and lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Damage to the eye, Dental cavities, Kidney failure (rare), Lymphoma, Pulmonary infections, Vasculitis (rare) . ", "Symptoms": ["Itching eyes", "Feeling that something is in the eye ", "Difficulty swallowing or eating", "Loss of sense of taste", "Problems\u00a0speaking", "Thick or stringy saliva", "Mouth sores or pain", "Hoarseness", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Change in the color of hands or feet", "Joint pain or joint swelling", "Swollen glands"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam reveals dry eyes and mouth. There may be mouth sores because of the mouth dryness.You may have the following tests:Schirmer's test of tear production, Antinuclear antibodies (ANA) test, Salivary gland biopsy, Rheumatoid factor (possible), Tear test, Slit lamp examination of the eyes . ", "Treatment": "The goal is to relieve symptoms.Dry eyes may be treated with artificial tears, eye-lubricating ointments, or cyclosoporine liquid., Tiny plugs can be placed in the tear drainage ducts to help the tears stay on the surface of the eye. . Disease modifying drugs (DMARDs) similar to those used for rheumatoid arthritis may improve the symptoms of Sj\u00f6gren syndrome. These include tumor necrosis factor (TNF) inhibiting drugs such as Enbrel, Humira or Remicaide.Some things you can do to ease symptoms include:Sip water throughout the day, Chew sugarless gum, Avoid medicines that can cause mouth dryness, such as antihistamines and decongestants, Avoid alcohol . Talk with your dentist about:Mouth rinses to replace minerals in your teeth, Saliva substitutes, Drugs that help your salivary glands make more saliva. To prevent dental decay that can be caused by mouth dryness:Brush and floss your teeth often, Visit the dentist for regular checkups and cleanings. ", "Causes": "The cause of Sj\u00f6gren syndrome is unknown. It is an autoimmune disorder. This means the body attacks healthy tissue by mistake. The syndrome occurs most often in women ages 40\u00a0to 50. It is rare in children.Primary Sj\u00f6gren syndrome is defined as dry eyes and dry mouth without another autoimmune disorder.Secondary Sj\u00f6gren syndrome occurs along with another autoimmune disorder, such as:Polymyositis, Rheumatoid arthritis, Scleroderma, Systemic lupus erythematosus. "}, "Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor": {"Symptoms": ["A deep voice", "Enlarged clitoris", "Facial hair", "Loss in breast size", "Stopping of menstrual periods"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and a pelvic exam, and ask about your symptoms. Tests will be ordered to check\u00a0the levels of female and male hormones, including testosterone.An ultrasound or another imaging test will likely be done to find out where the tumor is and its size and shape.", "description": "Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor is a rare cancer of the ovaries. The cancer cells produce and release a male sex hormone.", "Causes": "The exact cause of this tumor is not known. Changes (mutations) in genes may play a role.Sertoli-Leydig tumors occur most often in young women 20 to 30 years old. But the tumor can occur at any age.", "Treatment": "Surgery is done to remove one or both ovaries. If the tumor is advanced stage, chemotherapy or radiation therapy may be done after surgery."}, "Secondary systemic amyloidosis": {"description": "Systemic means\u00a0that the disease\u00a0affects the entire body.", "Possible Complications": "Endocrine failure, Heart failure, Kidney failure, Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding in the skin", "Fatigue", "Irregular heartbeat", "Numbness of hands and feet", "Rash", "Shortness of breath", "\r\n  Swallowing difficulties\r\n  ", "Swollen arms or legs", "Swollen tongue", "Weak hand grip", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Abdominal ultrasound (may show a swollen liver or spleen), Biopsy or aspiration of fat just beneath the skin (subcutaneous fat), Biopsy of rectum, Biopsy of skin, Biopsy of bone marrow, Blood tests, including creatinine and BUN, Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Nerve conduction velocity, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The condition that is causing the amyloidosis should be treated. Some persons may need a bone marrow or stem cell transplant. There is no specific treatment for amyloidosis itself.", "Causes": "The exact cause of amyloidosis is unknown. You are more likely to develop secondary systemic amyloidosis if you have a long-term infection or inflammation.This condition may occur with:Ankylosing spondylitis, Bronchiectasis, Chronic osteomyelitis, Cystic fibrosis, Familial Mediterranean fever, Hairy cell leukemia, Hodgkin disease, Juvenile chronic arthritis, Kidney dialysis, Multiple myeloma, Reiter syndrome, Rheumatoid arthritis, Sjogren syndrome, Systemic lupus erythematosus, Tuberculosis. ", "Prevention": "If you have a disease that is\u00a0known to increase your risk of this condition, make sure you get it treated. This may help prevent amyloidosis. "}, "Steam iron cleaner poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain in the mouth", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Collapse", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Breathing difficulty due to throat swelling", "Burns", "Irritation", "Burns", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "SVC obstruction": {"description": "SVC obstruction is a narrowing or blockage of the superior vena cava -- the second largest vein in the human body. The superior vena cava moves blood from the upper half of the body to the heart.", "Possible Complications": "The throat could become blocked, which can block the airways.Increased pressure may develop in the brain, leading to changed levels of consciousness, nausea, vomiting, or vision changes.", "Symptoms": ["Swelling around the eye", "Swelling of the face", "Swelling of the whites of the eyes", "Decreased alertness", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Headache", "Reddish face or cheeks", "Reddish palms", "Reddish mucus membranes (inside the nose, mouth, and other places)", "Redness changing to blueness later", "Sensation of head or ear \"fullness\"", "Vision changes "], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show enlarged veins of the face, neck, and upper chest. Blood pressure is often high in the arms and low in the legs.A bronchoscopy (a lighted tube placed through the mouth into the windpipe and lungs) may be performed if lung cancer is suspected.Blockage of the SVC may be visible on:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest or MRI of chest, Coronary angiography (a heart blood vessel study), Doppler ultrasound (sound wave test of the blood vessels), Radionuclide ventriculography (nuclear study of heart motion). This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Abdominal MRI or CT scan\r\n , Liver scan. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to relieve the blockage.Diuretics (water pills) or steroids may be used to relieve swelling.Other treatment options may include radiation or chemotherapy to shrink the tumor, or surgery to remove the tumors. Surgery to bypass the obstruction is rarely performed. Placement of a stent to open up the SVC is available at some medical centers.", "Causes": "Superior vena cava (SVC) obstruction is a relatively rare condition.Most often it is caused by cancer or a tumor in the mediastinum (the area of the chest under the breastbone and between the lungs).The types of cancer that can lead to this condition include:Breast cancer, Lymphoma, Metastatic lung cancer (lung cancer that spreads), Testicular cancer, Thyroid cancer, Thymus tumors. Superior vena cava obstruction can also be caused by noncancerous conditions that cause scarring. These conditions include:Histoplasmosis infection, Inflammation of a vein ( thrombophlebitis), Lung infections (such as tuberculosis). Other causes of superior vena cava obstruction include:Aortic aneurysm (widening of the artery that leaves the heart)\r\n , Blood clots in the superior vena cava, Constrictive pericarditis (tightening of the thin lining of the heart), Effects of radiation therapy for certain medical conditions\r\n , Enlargement of the thyroid gland (goiter). Catheters placed in the large veins of the upper arm and neck may cause blood clots in the superior vena cava.", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of other medical disorders may reduce the risk of developing SVC obstruction."}, "Subdural effusion": {"description": "A subdural effusion is a collection of fluid trapped between the surface of the brain and the outer lining of the brain (the dura matter). If this fluid becomes infected, the condition is called a subdural empyema.", "Possible Complications": "Complications from surgery include:Bleeding, Brain damage, Infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Bulging fontanelles in babies\r\n ", "Increased head circumference", "Lethargy", "Persistent fever ", "Seizures", "Separated sutures in babies\r\n ", "Vomiting", "Weakness or loss of movement on both sides of the body"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you.\u00a0Tests include:CT scan of the head, Head size (circumference) measurements\r\n , MRI scan of the head, Ultrasound of the head. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to drain the effusion is often necessary. Rarely, a permanent drainage device (shunt) is needed to drain fluid. Antibiotics may need to be given through a vein.", "Causes": "A subdural effusion is a rare complication of bacterial meningitis. Subdural effusion is more common in infants and in persons who have meningitis caused by Haemophilus influenzae."}, "Selective mutism": {"description": "Selective mutism is a condition in which a child who can speak stops speaking, usually in school or social settings.", "Possible Complications": "Selective mutism can affect the child's ability to function in school or social settings. Without treatment, symptoms may get worse.", "Symptoms": ["Ability to speak at home with family", "Fear or anxiety around people they do not know well", "Inability to speak in certain social situations", "Shyness "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no test for selective mutism. Diagnosis is based on the person's history of symptoms.Teachers and counselors should consider cultural issues, such as recently moving to a new country and speaking another language. Children who are uncomfortable with a new language may not want to use it outside of a familiar setting. This is not selective mutism.The person's history of mutism should also be considered. People who have been through trauma may show some of the same symptoms seen in selective mutism.", "Treatment": "Treating selective mutism involves behavior changes. The child's family and school should participate. Certain medications that treat anxiety and social phobia have been used safely and successfully.", "Causes": "Selective mutism is most common in children under age 5. The cause, or causes, are unknown. Most experts believe that children with the condition inherit a tendency to be anxious and inhibited. Most children with selective mutism have some form of extreme social fear (phobia).Parents often think that the child is choosing not to speak, but usually the child is truly unable to speak in certain settings.Some affected children have a family history of selective mutism, extreme shyness, or anxiety disorders, which may increase their risk for similar problems. This syndrome is not the same as mutism. In selective mutism, the child can understand and speak, but is unable to speak in certain settings or environments. Children with mutism never speak."}, "Spinal tumor": {"description": "A spinal tumor is a growth of cells (mass) in or surrounding the spinal cord.", "Possible Complications": "Incontinence, Life-threatening spinal cord compression, Loss of sensation, Paralysis, Permanent damage to nerves, disability from nerve damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal sensations or loss of sensation, especially in the legs (may be in the knee or ankle, with or without shooting pain down the leg) ", "Back pain that gets worse over time, is often in the middle or\u00a0lower back, is usually severe and\u00a0not relieved by pain medicine, gets worse when lying down or straining (such as\u00a0during a cough or sneeze), and may extend to the hips or legs\u00a0", "Cold sensation of the legs, cool fingers or hands, or coolness of other areas", "Fecal incontinence", "Inability to keep from leaking urine (urinary incontinence)", "Muscle contractions, twitches, or spasms (fasciculations)", "Muscle function loss", "Muscle weakness (decreased muscle strength) in the legs\u00a0that causes falls, makes walking difficult, and may get worse (progressive) "], "Exams and Tests": "A nervous system (neurological) examination may help pinpoint the location of the tumor. The health care provider may also find the following during an exam:Abnormal reflexes, Increased muscle tone, Loss of pain and temperature sensation, Muscle weakness, Tenderness in the spine. These tests may confirm spinal tumor:Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) examination, Cytology (cell studies) of CSF, Myelogram, Spinal CT, Spine MRI, Spine x-ray. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce or prevent nerve damage\u00a0caused by\u00a0pressure on (compression of) the spinal cord.Treatment should be given quickly. The more quickly symptoms develop, the sooner treatment is needed to prevent permanent injury. Any new or unexplained back pain in a patient with cancer should be thoroughly investigated.Treatments include:Corticosteroids (dexamethasone) may be given to reduce inflammation and swelling around the spinal cord., Emergency surgery may be needed to relieve compression on the spinal cord. Some tumors can be completely removed. In other cases, part of the tumor may be removed to relieve pressure on the spinal cord., Radiation therapy may be used with, or instead of, surgery., Chemotherapy has not been proven effective against most spinal tumors, but it may be recommended in some cases, depending on the type of tumor., Physical therapy may be needed to improve muscle strength and the ability to function independently.. ", "Causes": "Any type of tumor may occur in the spine, including:Leukemia, Lymphoma, Myeloma. A small number of spinal tumors occur in the nerves of the spinal cord itself. Most often these are ependymomas and other gliomas.Tumors that start in spinal tissue are called primary spinal tumors. Tumors that spread to the spine from some other place (metastasize) are called secondary spinal tumors. Tumors may spread to the spine from the breast, prostate, lung, and other areas.The cause of primary spinal tumors is unknown. Some primary spinal tumors occur with certain inherited gene mutations.Spinal tumors can occur:Inside the spinal\u00a0cord (intramedullary), In the membranes (meninges) covering the spinal cord (extramedullary - intradural), Between the meninges and bones of the spine (extradural). Or, tumors may extend from other locations. Most spinal tumors are extradural.As it grows, the tumor can affect the:Blood vessels, Bones of the spine, Meninges, Nerve roots, Spinal cord cells. The tumor may press on the spinal cord or nerve roots, causing damage. With time, the damage may become permanent."}, "Shellac poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blindness", "Blurred vision", "Wide pupils ", "Convulsions", "Disturbance of the acid balance of the blood (leads to multi-organ failure)", "Low blood pressure ", "Kidney failure ", "No breathing", "Rapid, shallow breathing", "Leg cramps", "Weakness ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Dizziness", "Fatigue", "Headache ", "Cyanosis (blue skin, lips, or fingernails) ", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Sensorimotor polyneuropathy": {"description": "Sensorimotor polyneuropathy is a condition that\u00a0causes a decreased ability to move or feel (sensation) because of nerve damage.", "Possible Complications": "Deformity, Injury to feet (caused by bad shoes or hot water when stepping into the bathtub), Numbness, Pain, Trouble walking, Weakness. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased feeling in any area of the body", "Difficulty swallowing or breathing", "Difficulty using the arms or hands", "Difficulty using the legs or feet", "Difficulty walking", "Pain, burning, tingling, or abnormal feeling in any area of the body (called neuralgia)", "Weakness of the face, arms, or legs, or any area of the body "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam may show:Decreased feeling (may affect touch, pain, vibration, or position sensation), Diminished reflexes (ankle most commonly), Muscle atrophy, Muscle twitches (fasciculations), Muscle weakness, Paralysis. Tests may include:Biopsy, Blood tests, Electrical test of the muscles (EMG), Electrical test of nerve conduction, X-rays or other imaging tests. ", "Treatment": "Goals of treatment include:Finding the cause, Controlling the symptoms, Promoting a patient's self-care and independence. Depending on the cause, treatment may include:Changing medicines, if they are causing the problem, Controlling blood sugar level , Not drinking alcohol, Taking daily nutritional supplements. PROMOTING SELF-CARE AND INDEPENDENCEExercises and retraining to maximize function of the damaged nerves, Job (vocational) therapy, Occupational therapy, Orthopedic treatments, Physical therapy, Wheelchairs, braces, or splints. CONTROL OF SYMPTOMSSafety is important for people with neuropathy. Lack of muscle control and decreased sensation\u00a0can increase the risk of falls or other injuries.If you have movement difficulties,\u00a0these measures can help keep you safe:Leave lights on., Remove obstacles (such as loose rugs that may slip on the floor)., Test water temperature before bathing., Use railings., Wear protective shoes (such as those with closed toes and low heels)., Wear shoes that have non-slippery soles.. Other tips include:Check your feet (or other affected area) daily for bruises, open skin areas, or other injuries, which you may not notice and can become infected., Check the inside of shoes often for grit or rough spots that may injure your feet., Visit a foot doctor (podiatrist) to assess and reduce the risk of injury to your feet., Avoid leaning on your elbows, crossing your knees, or being in other positions that put prolonged pressure on certain body areas.. Medicines used to treat this condition:Over-the-counter and prescription pain relievers to reduce stabbing pain (neuralgia), Anticonvulsants or antidepressants, Lotions, creams, or medicated patches. Avoid pain medicine whenever possible, or use it only when necessary. Keeping your body in the proper position or keeping bed linens off a tender body part may help control pain.", "Causes": "Neuropathy means a disease of, or damage to nerves. When it occurs outside of the brain or spinal cord, it is called a peripheral neuropathy. Mononeuropathy means one nerve is involved. Polyneuropathy means that many nerves in different parts of the body are involved.Neuropathy can affect nerves that provide feeling (sensory neuropathy) or cause movement (motor neuropathy). It can also affect both, in which case it is called a sensorimotor neuropathy.Sensorimotor polyneuropathy is a body-wide (systemic) process that damages nerve cells, nerve fibers (axons), and nerve coverings (myelin sheath). Damage to the covering of the nerve cell causes nerve signals to slow down. Damage to the nerve fiber or entire nerve cell can make the nerve stop working. Some neuropathies develop over years, while others can start and get severe within days.Nerve damage can be caused by:Autoimmune (when the body attacks itself) disorders, Conditions that put pressure on nerves, Decreased blood flow to the nerve, Diseases that destroy the glue (connective tissue) that holds cells and tissues together, Swelling (inflammation) of the nerves . Some diseases lead to polyneuropathy that is mainly sensory or mainly motor. Possible causes of sensorimotor polyneuropathy include:Alcoholic neuropathy, Cancer (called a paraneoplastic neuropathy), Chronic inflammatory neuropathy, Diabetic neuropathy, Drug-related neuropathy, Guillain-Barre syndrome, Hereditary neuropathy, Vitamin deficiency (vitamins B12, B1, and E) . "}, "Sleep disorders in the elderly": {"description": "Sleep disorders in the elderly involve any disrupted sleep pattern. This can include problems falling or staying asleep, too much sleep, or abnormal behaviors with sleep.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications are:Alcohol use, Drug abuse . ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty falling asleep", "Difficulty telling the difference between night and day", "Early morning awakening", "Waking up often during the night "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will take a history and perform a physical exam to look for medical causes and determine which type of sleep disorder is causing the problem. ", "Treatment": "Relieving chronic pain and controlling medical conditions such as frequent urination may improve sleep in some people. Treating depression can also improve sleep.Sleeping in a quiet room that is not too hot or too cold and having a relaxing bedtime routine may help improve symptoms. Other ways to promote sleep include the following healthy lifestyle tips:Avoid large meals shortly before bedtime., Avoid stimulants such as caffeine after mid-afternoon., Get regular exercise early in the day., Go to bed and wake up at the same time every day., DO NOT take naps., Use the bed only for sleep or sexual activity. . If you cannot fall asleep after 20 minutes, get out of bed and do a quiet activity such as reading or listening to music.Avoid using sleeping pills to help you sleep, if possible. They can lead to dependence and can make sleep problems worse over time if you don't use them correctly. Your health care provider should assess your risks of daytime sleepiness, mental (cognitive) side effects, and falls before you begin taking sleep medications.If you think you need sleeping pills, talk with your doctor about which pills are safe for you when taken properly. Certain sleeping pills should not be taken on a long-term basis., DO NOT drink alcohol at any time when you are using sleeping pills. Alcohol can make the side effects of all sleeping pills worse. . WARNING: The FDA has asked manufacturers of certain sleep medicines to put stronger warning labels on their products so that consumers are more aware of the potential risks. Possible risks while taking such medicines include severe allergic reactions and dangerous sleep-related behaviors, including sleep-driving. Ask your doctor about these risks.", "Causes": "Sleep problems are common in the elderly. In general, the amount of sleep needed stays constant throughout the adult years. Doctors recommend that adults get 7 to 8 hours of sleep each night. In older adults, sleep is less deep and choppier than sleep in younger people. A healthy 70-year-old may wake up several times during the night without it being due to disease.Some causes or contributors to sleep disturbances in older adults include:Alzheimer disease, Alcohol, Changes in the body's natural internal clock, causing some people to fall asleep earlier in the evening), Chronic disease, such as heart failure, Certain medicines, herbs, supplements, and recreational drugs, Depression (depression is a common cause of sleep problems in people of all ages), Neurological conditions, Not being very active, Pain caused by diseases such as arthritis, Stimulants such as caffeine and nicotine, Frequent urination at night. ", "Prevention": "Getting regular exercise and avoiding as many causes of sleep disruption as possible and adequate exposure to natural light may help control sleep problems. "}, "Silicosis ": {"description": "Silicosis is a respiratory disease caused by breathing in (inhaling) silica dust.", "Possible Complications": "Connective tissue disease, including rheumatoid arthritis, scleroderma (also called progressive systemic sclerosis), and systemic lupus erythematosus, Lung cancer, Progressive massive fibrosis, Respiratory failure, Tuberculosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will take a medical history that includes many questions about your jobs (past and present), hobbies, and other activities that may have exposed you to silica. The health care provider will also do a physical exam.Tests to confirm the diagnosis and rule out similar diseases include:Chest x-ray, Chest CT scan, Pulmonary function tests, Tests for tuberculosis, Blood\u00a0tests for connective tissue diseases. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for silicosis. Removing the source of silica exposure is important to prevent the disease from getting worse. Supportive treatment includes cough medicine, bronchodilators, and oxygen if needed. Antibiotics are prescribed for respiratory infections as needed.Treatment also includes limiting exposure to irritants and\u00a0quitting smoking.Persons with silicosis are at high risk\u00a0of developing tuberculosis (TB). Silica is believed to interfere with the body's immune response to the bacteria that cause TB. Skin tests to check for exposure to TB should be done regularly. Those with a positive skin test should be treated with anti-TB drugs. Any change in the appearance of the chest x-ray may be a sign of TB.Patients with severe silicosis may need to have a lung transplant.", "Causes": "Silica is a common, naturally-occurring crystal. It is found in most rock beds. Silica dust forms during mining, quarrying, tunneling, and working with\u00a0certain metal ores. Silica is a main part of sand, so glass workers and sand-blasters are also exposed to silica.Three types of silicosis occur:Simple chronic silicosis, which results from long-term exposure (more than 20 years) to low amounts of silica dust. The silica dust causes swelling in the lungs and chest lymph nodes. This disease may cause people to have trouble breathing. This is the most common form of silicosis., Accelerated silicosis, which\u00a0occurs after exposure to larger amounts of silica over a shorter period of time (5\u00a0to 15 years). Swelling in the lungs and symptoms occur faster than in simple silicosis., Acute silicosis, which\u00a0results from short-term exposure to very large amounts of silica. The lungs become very inflamed and can fill with fluid, causing severe shortness of breath and low blood oxygen levels.. Progressive massive fibrosis can occur in either simple or accelerated silicosis, but is more common in the accelerated form. Progressive massive fibrosis causes severe lung scarring and destroys normal lung structures.People who work in jobs where they are exposed to silica dust are at risk. These jobs include:Abrasives manufacturing, Glass manufacturing, Mining, Quarrying, Road and building construction, Sand blasting, Stone cutting. Intense exposure to silica can cause disease within a year. But\u00a0it usually takes at least 10\u00a0to 15 years of exposure before symptoms occur. Silicosis has become less common since the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) created regulations requiring the use of protective equipment, which limits the amount of silica dust workers inhale.", "Prevention": "If you work in a high-risk occupation or have a high-risk hobby, wear dust masks and do not smoke. You might also want to use other protection recommended by OSHA, such as a respirator."}, "Sepsis": {"description": "This response\u00a0may be called systemic inflammatory response syndrome (SIRS).", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Confusion or delirium", "Fever or low body temperature (hypothermia)", "Light-headedness due to low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Shaking", "Skin rash", "Warm skin"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the person and ask about the person's medical history.The infection is often confirmed by a blood test. But a blood test may not reveal infection in people who have been receiving antibiotics. Some infections that can cause sepsis cannot be diagnosed by a blood test.Other tests that may be done include:Blood differential, Blood gases , Kidney function tests, Platelet count and fibrin degradation products, to check for bleeding risk, White blood cell count \r\n\u00a0. ", "Causes": "The symptoms of sepsis are not caused by the germs themselves. Instead, chemicals the body releases cause the response.A bacterial infection anywhere in the body may set off the response that leads to sepsis. Common places where an infection might start include the:Bloodstream , Bones (common in children), Bowel (usually seen with peritonitis), Kidneys (upper urinary tract infection or pyelonephritis), Lining of the brain (meningitis), Liver or gallbladder, Lungs (bacterial pneumonia), Skin (cellulitis). For patients in the hospital, common sites of infection include intravenous lines, surgical wounds, surgical drains, and sites of skin breakdown, known as bedsores or pressure ulcers.", "Prevention": "The risk of sepsis can be reduced by\u00a0getting all\u00a0recommended vaccines. In the hospital, careful hand washing can help prevent infections that lead to sepsis. Prompt removal of urinary catheters and IV lines when they are no longer needed can also help prevent infections that lead to sepsis.", "Treatment": "A person with sepsis\u00a0will be admitted to a hospital, usually in the intensive care unit (ICU). Antibiotics are usually given through a vein (intravenously).Oxygen is given to the person. Large amounts of fluids are given through a vein. Other medical treatments include:Medicines that increase blood pressure , Dialysis if there is kidney failure, A breathing machine (mechanical ventilation) if there is lung failure. "}, "Sanfilippo syndrome": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Blindness, Inability to care for self, Intellectual disability, Nerve damage that slowly gets worse and eventually requires wheelchair use , Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Behavioral problems", "Coarse facial features", "Diarrhea", "Full lips", "Heavy eyebrows that meet in the middle of the face above the nose", "Sleep difficulties", "Stiff joints that may not extend fully", "Walking problems"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show signs of liver and spleen swelling. An eye exam will show clear corneas, unlike the cloudy corneas seen in persons with Hurler syndrome (MPS I H). Neurological testing will reveal signs of seizures and intellectual disability.Urine tests will be done. Persons with Sanfilippo syndrome have large amounts of a mucopolysaccharide called heparan sulfate in the urine.Other tests may include:Blood culture, Echocardiogram, Slit lamp eye exam, Skin fibroblast culture, X-rays of the bones. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment available for Sanfilippo syndrome.", "Causes": "Sanfilippo syndrome occurs when the substances (enzymes) needed to break down the heparan sulfate sugar chain are missing or are defective.There are four main types of Sanfilippo syndrome, also called MPS III. Which type a person has depends on which enzyme is affected.Sanfilippo type A is the most severe form. Persons with this type\u00a0do not have a normal working form of\u00a0the enzyme called heparan N-sulfatase., Sanfilippo type B occurs when a person is missing or does not produce enough alpha-N-acetylglucosaminidase., Sanfilippo C occurs when a person is missing or does not produce enough acetyl-CoAlpha-glucosaminide acetyltransferase., Sanfilippo D occurs when a person is missing or does not produce enough N-acetylglucosamine 6-sulfatase.. The syndrome is inherited as an autosomal recessive trait. If both parents carry the defective gene related to this condition, each of their children has a 25% chance of developing the disease.Sanfilippo syndrome is possibly the most common forms of MPS. It is seen in about 1 in 70,000 births. A family history of Sanfilippo syndrome increases\u00a0the risk for this condition.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of Sanfilippo syndrome. Counseling is also recommended for families who have a child with Sanfilippo syndrome, to help them understand the condition and possible treatments. Prenatal testing is available."}, "Salmonella enterocolitis": {"description": "Salmonella enterocolitis is an infection in the lining of the small intestine that is caused by Salmonella bacteria.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, cramping, or tenderness", "Chills", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Muscle pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. You may have signs of a tender abdomen and tiny pink spots, called rose spots, on your skin.Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Complete blood count with differential, Febrile/cold agglutinins (a test for specific antibodies), Stool culture for salmonella, Examination of stool for white blood cells. ", "Causes": "Salmonella infection is one of the most common types of food poisoning. It occurs when you swallow food or water that contains salmonella bacteria. The salmonella germs may get into the food you eat (called contamination) in several ways.You are more likely to get this type of infection if you have:Eaten foods such as turkey, turkey dressing, chicken, or eggs that have not been cooked well or stored properly, Family members with a recent salmonella infection, Been or worked in a hospital, nursing home, or other long-term health facility, A pet iguana or other lizards, turtles, or snakes (reptiles and amphibians are carriers of salmonella), A weakened immune system, Regularly used medicines that block acid production in the stomach, Crohn's disease or ulcerative colitis, Used antibiotics in the recent past. Most people with this condition are younger than 20. ", "Prevention": "Learning how to prevent food poisoning can reduce the risk of this infection.Proper food handling and storage can help reduce the risk. Good handwashing when handling eggs, poultry, and other foods is important., If you own a reptile, wear gloves when handling the animal or its feces because salmonella can easily pass to humans.. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to make you feel better and avoid dehydration. Dehydration means your body does not have as much water and fluids as it should.These things may help you feel better if you have diarrhea:Drink 8 to 10 glasses of clear fluids every day. Water is best., Drink at least 1 cup of liquid every time you have a loose bowel movement., Eat small meals throughout the day instead of three big meals., Eat some salty foods, such as pretzels, soup, and sports drinks., Eat some high-potassium foods, such as bananas, potatoes without the skin, and watered-down fruit juices.. If your child has samonella, give your child fluids for the first 4 to 6 hours. At first, try 1 ounce (2 tablespoons) of fluid every 30 to 60 minutes.Infants should continue to breastfeed and receive electrolyte replacement solutions as recommended by your child's health care provider., You can use an over-the-counter drink, such as Pedialyte or Infalyte. Do not water down these drinks., You can also try Pedialyte popsicles., Watered-down fruit juice or broth may also help.. Medicines that slow diarrhea are usually not given because they may make the infection last longer. If you have severe symptoms, your health care provider may prescribe antibiotics.If you take water pills or diuretics, you may need to stop taking them when you have diarrhea. Ask your health care provider.Your doctor might recommend antibiotics if you:Have diarrhea more than 9 or 10 times per day, Have a high fever, Need to be in the hospital. "}, "Sodium bisulfate poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning pain in the mouth", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting", "Severe low blood pressure", "Blisters", "Burns", "Painful, red skin", "Decreased vision", "Eye pain", "Eye redness and tearing"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Subdural hematoma ": {"description": "A subdural hematoma is a collection of blood between the covering of the brain (dura) and the surface of the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Brain herniation (pressure on the brain severe enough to cause coma and death), Persistent symptoms such as memory loss, dizziness, headache, anxiety, and difficulty concentrating, Seizures, Temporary or permanent weakness, numbness, difficulty speaking. ", "Symptoms": ["Confused speech", "Difficulty with balance or walking", "Headache", "Lethargy or confusion", "Loss of consciousness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness", "Seizures", "Slurred speech", "Visual disturbances", "Weakness", "Bulging fontanelles (the \"soft spots\" of the baby's skull)", "Feeding difficulties", "Focal seizures", "Generalized tonic-clonic seizure", "High-pitched cry", "Increased head circumference", "Increased sleepiness or lethargy", "Irritability", "Persistent vomiting", "Separated sutures (the areas where growing skull bones join)"], "Exams and Tests": "Always get medical help after a head injury. Older persons should receive medical care if they show signs of memory problems or mental decline, even if they do not appear to have had an injury. An exam should include a complete neurologic exam.Your doctor may order a brain imaging study if you have any of the following symptoms:Confused speech, Difficulty with balance or walking, Headache, Inability to speak, Lethargy or confusion, Loss of consciousness, Nausea and vomiting, Numbness, Recent cognitive decline in an elderly person, even without a history of brain injury, Seizures, Slurred speech, Visual disturbance, Weakness. A CT scan or MRI scan will likely be done to evaluate for the presence of a subdural hematoma.", "Treatment": "A subdural hematoma is an emergency condition.Emergency surgery may be needed to reduce pressure within the brain. This may involve drilling a small hole in the skull, which allows blood to drain and relieves pressure on the brain. Large hematomas or solid blood clots may need to be removed through a procedure called a craniotomy, which creates a larger opening in the skull.Medicines used to treat a subdural hematoma depend on the type of subdural hematoma, the severity of symptoms, and how much brain damage has occurred. Diuretics and corticosteroids may be used to reduce swelling. Anticonvulsion medications, such as phenytoin, may be used to control or prevent seizures.", "Causes": "A subdural hematoma is usually the result of a serious head injury. When it occurs this way, it is called an \"acute\" subdural hematoma. Acute subdural hematomas are among the deadliest of all head injuries. The bleeding fills the brain area very rapidly, compressing brain tissue. This often results in brain injury and may lead to death.Subdural hematomas can also occur after a very minor head injury, especially in the elderly. These may go unnoticed for many days to weeks, and are called \"chronic\" subdural hematomas. With any subdural hematoma, tiny veins between the surface of the brain and its outer covering (the dura) stretch and tear, allowing blood to collect. In the elderly, the veins are often already stretched because of brain atrophy (shrinkage) and are more easily injured.Some subdural hematomas occur without cause (spontaneously).The following increase your risk for a subdural hematoma:Anticoagulant medication (blood thinners, including aspirin), Long-term abuse of alcohol, Medical conditions that make your blood clot poorly, Recurrent falls, Repeated head injury, Very young or very old age . ", "Prevention": "Always use safety equipment at work and play to reduce your risk of a head injury. For example, use hard hats, bicycle or motorcycle helmets, and seat belts. Older individuals should be particularly careful to avoid falls."}, "Sick sinus syndrome": {"description": "People with these disorders may also have other abnormal heart rhythms, such as:", "Possible Complications": "Angina, Decreased exercise capacity, Fainting (syncope), Falls or injury caused by fainting, Heart failure, Poor heart pumping. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain or angina", "Confusion or other changes in mental status", "Fainting or near-fainting", "Fatigue", "Dizziness or light-headedness", "Sensation of feeling the heart beat (palpitations)", "Shortness of breath, possibly only with physical activity "], "Exams and Tests": "The heart rate may be very slow at any time. Blood pressure may be normal or low.Sick sinus syndrome may cause symptoms of heart failure to start or get worse. Sick sinus syndrome is diagnosed when the symptoms occur only during episodes of arrhythmia. However, this is often hard to prove.An ECG may show abnormal heart rhythms related to this syndrome.Holter monitoring is an effective tool for diagnosing sick sinus syndrome. It may pick up very slow heart rates and long pauses, along with episodes of atrial tachycardias. Other forms of long-term electrical monitoring may also be useful.An intracardiac electrophysiology study (EPS) is a very specific test for this disorder. However, it is not often needed and may not confirm the diagnosis. Exercise testing has not been shown to work well to detect the problem. ", "Treatment": "You may not need treatment if you do not have any symptoms. Your doctor will review the medicines you take to make sure they are not making your condition worse. Do not stop taking any of your medicines unless your doctor tells you to do so.You may need a permanent implanted pacemaker if your symptoms are related to bradycardia (slow heart rate).A fast heart rate (tachycardia) may be treated with medicine. Sometimes, a procedure called radiofrequency ablation is used to cure tachycardia.In some cases, medicines used to control periods of fast heart rate are combined with use of a pacemaker, which guards against periods of slow heart rate. ", "Causes": "Sick sinus syndrome most often occurs in people older than 50. It is often due to scar-like damage to electrical pathways in the heart muscle tissue. In children, heart surgery on the upper chambers is a common cause of sick sinus syndrome.Coronary artery disease, high blood pressure, and aortic and mitral valve diseases may occur with sick sinus syndrome, although these diseases may have nothing to do with the syndrome.Sick sinus syndrome is uncommon. Sinus bradycardia occurs more often than the other types of the condition.Tachycardias that start in the upper chambers of the heart may be part of the syndrome. These include atrial fibrillation, atrial flutter, atrial tachycardia, and other types of fast heart rates. A period of fast heart rates is often followed by very slow heart rates immediately after the tachycardia ends.Some medicines can make abnormal heart rhythms worse. These include digitalis, calcium channel blockers, beta-blockers, and anti-arrhythmics. ", "Prevention": "Keeping your heart healthy by eating a well-balanced diet and exercising can prevent many types of heart disease.You may need to avoid some types of medicines. Many times, the condition is not preventable."}, "Spinal cord abscess": {"description": "Spinal cord abscess is swelling and irritation (inflammation) and the collection of infected material (pus) in or around the spinal cord.", "Possible Complications": "The abscess can either injure the spinal cord from direct pressure, or it can cut off the blood supply to the spinal cord.Complications may include:Infection returns, Long-term (chronic) back pain, Loss of bladder/bowel control, Loss of sensation, Male impotence, Weakness, paralysis. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Loss of bladder or bowel control", "Loss of movement of an area of the body below the abscess", "Loss of sensation of an area of the body below the abscess", "Low backache, often mild but slowly gets worse\r\n  Pain typically moves to the hip, leg, or feet, Pain may spread to the shoulder, arm, or hand. ", "Pain typically moves to the hip, leg, or feet", "Pain may spread to the shoulder, arm, or hand", "Severe back pain"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam often shows tenderness over the spine. An exam may show signs of:Spinal cord compression, Paralysis of the lower body (paraplegia) or of the entire trunk, arms, and legs (quadriplegia), Changes in sensation below the area of involvement. The amount of nerve loss depends on where the lesion is located on the spine and how much it is compressing the spinal cord.Tests that may be done:CT scan of the spine, Draining of abscess, Gram stain and culture of abscess materia, MRI of the spine. ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to relieve pressure on the spinal cord and cure the infection.Urgent surgery to relieve the pressure is sometimes recommended. It involves removing part of the spine bone and draining the abscess. Sometimes it is not possible to completely drain the abscess.Antibiotics are used to treat the infection. They are usually given through a vein (IV).\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 \r\n \r\n", "Causes": "A spinal cord abscess is caused by an infection inside the spine. An abscess of the spinal cord itself is very rare. A spinal abscess usually occurs as an epidural abscess.Pus forms as a collection of:Destroyed tissue cells, Fluid, Live and dead bacteria and other microorganisms, White blood cells. The pus is commonly covered by a lining or membrane that forms around the edges. The pus collection causes pressure on the spinal cord.The infection is usually due to bacteria. Often it is caused by a staphylococcus infection that spreads through the spine. It may be caused by tuberculosis in some areas of the world, but it is not as common today as it was in the past. In rare cases, the infection may be due to a fungus.The following increase your risk of a spinal cord abscess:Back injuries or trauma, including minor ones, Boils on the skin, especially on the back or scalp, Complication of lumbar puncture or back surgery, Spread of any infection through the bloodstream from another part of the body (bacteremia). The infection often begins in the bone (osteomyelitis). The bone infection may cause an epidural abscess to form. This abscess gets larger and presses on the spinal cord. The infection can spread to the cord itself.The disorder is rare, but may be life-threatening.", "Prevention": "Thorough treatment of boils, tuberculosis, and other infections decreases the risk. Early diagnosis and treatment are essential to prevent complications.\u00a0\r\n"}, "Slipped capital femoral epiphysis": {"description": "A slipped capital femoral epiphysis is a separation of the ball of the hip joint from the thigh bone (femur) at the upper growing end (growth plate) of the bone.", "Possible Complications": "This disorder is associated with a greater risk of osteoarthritis later in life. Other potential but rare complications include reduced blood flow to the hip joint and wearing away of hip joint tissue.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty walking, walking with a limp", "Knee pain", "Hip pain", "Hip stiffness", "Outward-turning leg", "Restricted hip movements"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. A hip or pelvis x-ray can confirm this condition.", "Treatment": "Surgery to stabilize the bone with pins or screws will prevent the ball of the hip joint from slipping or moving out of place. Some surgeons may suggest using pins on the other hip at the same time, because many children will develop this problem in that hip later.", "Causes": "A slipped capital femoral epiphysis may affect both hips.An epiphysis is an area at the end of a long bone that is separated from the main part of the bone by the growth plate. In this condition, the problem occurs in the upper area while the bone is still growing.Slipped capital femoral epiphysis occurs in about 2 out of every 100,000 children. It is more common in:Growing children ages 11 to 15, especially boys, Children who are obese, Children who are growing rapidly. \u00a0Children with hormone imbalances caused by other conditions are at particular risk for this disorder.", "Prevention": "Weight control for obese children may be helpful. Many cases are not preventable."}, "Scalded skin syndrome": {"description": "Scalded skin syndrome is a skin infection in which the skin becomes damaged and sheds.", "Possible Complications": "Fluid regulation problems causing dehydration or electrolyte imbalance, Poor temperature control (in young infants), Severe bloodstream infection (septicemia), Spread to deeper skin infection (cellulitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Fever", "Large areas of skin peel or fall away (exfoliation or desquamation)", "Painful skin", "Redness of the skin (erythema), which spreads to cover most of the body", "Skin slips off with gentle pressure, leaving wet red areas (Nikolsky's sign)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and look at the skin. The exam may show that the skin slips off when it is rubbed (positive Nikolsky's sign).Tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), Cultures of the skin, throat, nose and blood, Electrolyte test, Skin biopsy (in rare cases) . ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are given through a vein (intravenously) to help fight the infection. Fluids are also given through a vein to prevent dehydration. Much of the body's fluid is lost through open skin. Moist compresses to the skin may improve comfort. You can apply a moisturizing ointment to keep the skin moist. Healing begins about 10 days after treatment.", "Causes": "Scalded skin syndrome is caused by infection with certain strains of Staphylococcus bacteria. The bacteria produce a poison that causes the skin damage. The damage creates blisters, as if the skin were scalded. These blisters can occur\u00a0at areas of the skin away from the initial site.Scalded skin syndrome is found most commonly in infants and children under the age of 5.", "Prevention": "The disorder may not be preventable. Treating any staphylococcus infection quickly can help."}, "Spinal muscular atrophy": {"description": "Spinal muscular atrophy is a group of disorders of the motor neurons (motor cells). These disorders are inherited and can\u00a0appear at any\u00a0stage of life. The disorder leads to muscle weakness and atrophy. ", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration \r\n (food and fluids get into the lungs, causing pneumonia), Contractions of muscles and tendons, Heart failure, Scoliosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Infants with SMA type I are born with very little muscle tone, weak muscles, and feeding and breathing problems. ", "With SMA type II, symptoms may not appear until age 6 months to 2 years. ", "Type III SMA is a milder disease that starts in childhood or adolescence and slowly gets worse. ", "Type IV is even milder, with weakness starting in adulthood.", "Breathing difficulty, leading to a lack of oxygen", "Feeding difficulty (food may go into the windpipe instead of the stomach)", "Floppy infant (poor muscle tone)", "Lack of head control", "Little\u00a0movement", "Weakness that gets worse", "Frequent, increasingly severe respiratory infections", "Nasal speech", "Posture that gets worse"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will take a careful history and perform a brain/nervous system (neurologic) examination to find out if there is:A family history of neuromuscular disease, Floppy (flaccid) muscles, No deep tendon reflexes, Twitches (muscle fasciculation) of the tongue muscle. Tests:Aldolase, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), CPK levels, DNA testing to confirm diagnosis, Electromyography \r\n (EMG), Lactate/pyruvate, MRI of the spine, Muscle biopsy, Nerve conduction, Serum amino acids, Thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH). ", "Treatment": "There is no treatment for the weakness caused by the disease. Supportive care is important. Attention must be paid to the respiratory system because affected people have trouble protecting themselves from choking. Breathing complications are common. Breathing can be assisted with invasive or noninvasive devices. Physical therapy is important to prevent contractions of muscles and tendons and abnormal curvature of the spine (scoliosis). Bracing may be needed. Surgery may be needed to correct skeletal deformities, such as scoliosis.", "Causes": "Spinal muscular atrophy (SMA) is a collection of different muscle diseases. Grouped together, it is the second leading cause of hereditary neuromuscular disease, after Duchenne muscular dystrophy. Most of the time, a person must get the defective gene from both parents to be affected.\u00a0About 4 out of every 100,000 people have the condition.The most severe form is SMA type I, also called Werdnig-Hoffman disease. Infants with SMA type II have less severe symptoms during early infancy, but they become weaker with time. SMA type III is the least severe form of the disease.Rarely, SMA may begin in adulthood. This is usually a milder form of the disease.A family history of spinal muscular atrophy is a risk factor for all types of the disorder.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for people with a family history of spinal muscular atrophy who want to have children."}, "Small bowel bacterial overgrowth": {"description": "Small bowel bacterial overgrowth is a condition in which very large numbers of bacteria grow in the small intestine.", "Possible Complications": "Severe cases lead to malnutrition. Other possible complications include:Dehydration, Excess bleeding due to vitamin deficiency, Liver disease, Osteomalacia or osteoporosis. ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Abdominal fullness\r\n  ", "\r\n  Abdominal pain and cramps\r\n  ", "\r\n  Bloating\r\n  ", "\r\n  Diarrhea (usually watery)\r\n  ", "\r\n  Gassiness\r\n  ", "\r\n  \r\n  Fatty stool\r\n  \r\n  ", "\r\n  Weight loss\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood chemistry tests (such as albumin level), Complete blood count (CBC), Fecal fat test, Small intestine x-ray, Vitamin levels in the blood, Small intestine biopsy or culture, Special breath tests. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to treat the cause of the bacterial overgrowth. Treatment most often consists of antibiotics. In some cases, drugs that speed intestinal movement (motility-speeding drugs) may be used. A low carbohydrate diet can be helpful.Treatment also involves getting enough fluids and nutrition. A person who is dehydrated may need intravenous (IV) fluids in a hospital. A person who is malnourished may also need nutrition given through a vein (total parenteral nutrition -- TPN). ", "Causes": "Unlike the large intestine, the small intestine does not have a high number of bacteria. When there are too many bacteria in the small intestine, these organisms use up the nutrients that would otherwise be absorbed into the body. A person with small bowel bacterial overgrowth may become malnourished as a result. The breakdown of nutrients in the small intestine by the excess bacteria can also damage the intestinal lining. This can make it even harder for the body to absorb nutrients.Conditions that can lead to overgrowth of bacteria in the small intestine include: Complications of diseases or surgery that create pouches or blockages in the small intestine. Crohn's disease is one of these conditions., Diseases that lead to movement problems in the small bowel, such as diabetes and scleroderma, Immunodeficiency such as AIDS or immunoglobulin deficiency, Short bowel syndrome caused by surgical removal of part of the small intestine, Small bowel diverticulosis, in which small sacs occur in the inner lining of the intestine. These sacs allow too many bacteria to grow. These sacs can occur anywhere along the intestinal tract, but they are much more common in the large bowel. , Surgical procedures that create a loop of small intestine where excess bacteria can grow. An example is a Billroth II type of stomach removal (gastrectomy). , Some cases of irritable bowel syndrome (IBS). "}, "Subarachnoid hemorrhage": {"description": "Subarachnoid hemorrhage is bleeding in the area between the brain and the thin tissues that cover the brain. This area is called the subarachnoid space.", "Possible Complications": "Repeated bleeding is the most serious complication. If a cerebral aneurysm bleeds for a second time, the outlook is much worse.Changes in consciousness and alertness due to a subarachnoid hemorrhage may become worse and lead to coma or death.Other complications include:Complications of surgery, Medication side effects, Seizures, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased consciousness and alertness", "Eye discomfort in bright light (photophobia)", "Mood and personality changes, including confusion and irritability", "Muscle aches (especially neck pain and shoulder pain)", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness in part of the body", "Seizure", "Stiff neck", "Vision problems, including double vision, blind spots, or temporary vision loss in one eye", "Eyelid drooping", "Pupil size difference", "Sudden stiffening of back and neck, with arching of the back (opisthotonos; not very common)"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs include:A physical exam may show a stiff neck, A brain and nervous system exam may show signs of decreased nerve and brain function (focal neurologic deficit), An eye exam may show decreased eye movements -- a sign of damage to the cranial nerves (in milder cases, no problems may be seen on an eye exam). If your doctor thinks you have a subarachnoid hemorrhage, a head CT scan (without contrast dye)\u00a0will\u00a0be done right away. In\u00a0some cases, the scan\u00a0is normal, especially if there\u00a0is only been a small bleed. If the CT scan is normal, a lumbar puncture (spinal tap) must be done.Other tests that may be done include:Cerebral angiography of blood vessels of the brain, CT scan angiography (using contrast dye), Transcranial Doppler ultrasound -- to look at blood flow in the arteries of the brain, Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) (occasionally). ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to:Save your life, Repair the cause of bleeding, Relieve symptoms, Prevent complications such as permanent brain damage (stroke). Surgery may be done to:Remove large collections of blood or relieve pressure on the brain if the hemorrhage is due to an injury, Repair the aneurysm if the hemorrhage is due to an aneurysm rupture. If the patient is critically ill, surgery may have to wait until the person is more stable.Surgery may involve:Craniotomy (cutting a hole in the skull) and aneurysm clipping -- to close the aneurysm, Endovascular coiling -- placing coils in the aneurysm and stents in the blood vessel to cage the coils reduces the risk of further bleeding. If no aneurysm is found, the person should be closely watched by a health care team and may need more imaging tests.Treatment for coma or decreased alertness includes:Draining tube placed in the brain to relieve pressure, Life support, Methods to protect the airway, Special positioning. A person who is is conscious may need to be on strict bed rest. The person will be told to avoid activities that can increase pressure inside the head, including:Bending over, Straining, Suddenly changing position. Treatment may also include:Medicines given through an IV line to control blood pressure, Nimodipine to prevent artery spasms, Painkillers and anti-anxiety medications to relieve headache and reduce pressure in the skull, Phenytoin or other medications to prevent or treat seizures, Stool softeners or laxatives to prevent straining during bowel movements . ", "Causes": "Subarachnoid hemorrhage can be caused by:Bleeding from an arteriovenous malformation (AVM), Bleeding disorder, Bleeding from a cerebral aneurysm, Head injury, Unknown cause (idiopathic), Use of blood thinners. Subarachnoid hemorrhage caused by injury is often seen in the elderly who have fallen and hit their head. Among the young, the most common injury leading to subarachnoid hemorrhage is motor vehicle crashes.Risks include:Aneurysm in other blood vessels, Fibromuscular dysplasia (FMD) and other connective tissue disorders, High blood pressure, History of polycystic kidney disease, Smoking. A strong family history of aneurysms may also increase your risk.", "Prevention": "Identifying and successfully treating an aneurysm can prevent subarachnoid hemorrhage."}, "Strep throat": {"description": "Strep throat is a disease that causes a sore throat (pharyngitis). It is an infection with a germ called Group A Streptococcus bacteria. ", "Possible Complications": "In rare cases, strep throat can lead to rheumatic fever if it is not treated. Strep throat may also cause a rare kidney complication called post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis.Other complications may include:Kidney disease caused by strep, A skin condition in which small, red, and scaly teardrop-shaped spots appear on the arms, legs, and middle of the body, called guttate psoriasis, Abscess in the area around the tonsils, Rheumatic fever, Scarlet fever. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever that may begin suddenly and is often the highest on the second day", "Chills", "Red, sore throat that may have white patches", "Pain when swallowing", "Swollen, tender neck glands ", "General ill feeling", "A loss of appetite and abnormal sense of taste", "Headache", "Nausea "], "Exams and Tests": "Many other causes of sore throat may have the same symptoms. Your health care provider must do a test to diagnose strep throat and decide whether to prescribe antibiotics.A rapid strep test can be done in most health care provider offices. However, the test may be negative, even if strep is present. If the rapid strep test is negative and your health care provider still suspects that the strep\u00a0bacteria is causing the sore throat, a throat swab can be tested (cultured) to see if strep grows from it. Results will take 1 to 2 days. ", "Treatment": "Most sore throats are caused by viruses, not bacteria. Sore throats should be treated with antibiotics only if the strep test is positive. Antibiotics are taken to prevent rare but more serious health problems, such as rheumatic fever.Penicillin or amoxicillin are most often the first drugs tried. Antibiotics should be taken for 10 days, even though symptoms are often gone within a few days.The following tips may help your sore throat feel better:Drink warm liquids, such as lemon tea or tea with honey., Gargle several times a day with warm salt water (1/2 tsp of salt in 1 cup water)., Drink cold liquids or suck on fruit-flavored ice pops., Suck on hard candies or throat lozenges. Young children should not be given these products because they can choke on them. , A cool-mist vaporizer or humidifier can moisten and soothe a dry and painful throat., Try over-the-counter pain medications, such as acetaminophen.. ", "Causes": "Strep throat is most common in children between ages 5 and 15, although anyone can get it.Strep throat is spread by person-to-person contact with fluids from the nose or saliva. It commonly spreads among family or household members.", "Prevention": "Most people with strep can spread the infection to others until they have been on antibiotics for 24 - 48 hours. They should stay home from school, daycare, or work until they have been on antibiotics for at least a day.Get a new toothbrush after two or three days, but before finishing the antibiotics. Otherwise, the bacteria can live on the toothbrush and re-infect you when the antibiotics are done. Also, keep your family's toothbrushes and utensils separate, unless they have been washed.If repeated cases of strep still occur in a family, you might check to see if someone is a strep carrier. Carriers have strep in their throats, but the bacteria do not make them sick. Sometimes, treating them can prevent others from getting strep throat."}, "Spinal injury": {"Symptoms": ["Head that is in an unusual position", "Numbness or tingling that spreads down an arm or leg", "Weakness", "Difficulty walking", "Paralysis (loss of movement) of arms or legs", "Loss of bladder or bowel control", "Shock (pale, clammy skin; bluish lips and fingernails; acting dazed or semiconscious)", "Lack of alertness (unconsciousness)", "Stiff neck, headache, or neck pain"], "Causes": "A spinal cord injury may be caused by: Bullet or stab wound, Traumatic injury to the face, neck, head, chest, or back (for example, a car accident), Diving accident, Electric shock, Extreme twisting of the middle of the body, Landing on the head during a sports injury, Fall from a great height. ", "description": "The spinal cord contains the nerves that carry messages between your brain and body. The cord passes through your neck and back. A spinal cord injury is very serious because it can cause loss of movement (paralysis) below the site of the injury.", "Prevention": "The following may lower your risk of spinal injury:Wear seat belts., Do not drink and drive., Do not dive into pools, lakes, rivers, and other bodies of water, particularly if you cannot determine the depth of the water or if the water is not clear., Do not tackle or dive into a person with your head.. "}, "Solder poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Kidney damage ", "Metallic taste", "Vision problems", "Yellow eyes (jaundice) ", "Abdominal pain", "Constipation", "Diarrhea", "Excessive thirst", "Loss of appetite", "Vomiting", "Weight loss ", "Collapse", "Convulsions", "High blood pressure", "Low blood pressure", "Paralysis", "Muscle aches", "Fatigue", "Weakness", "Joint pain ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Excitability", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Irritability", "Lack of desire to do anything", "Sleeping difficulty", "Tremor", "Twitching", "Uncoordinated movements", "Pale skin", "Yellow skin ", "Decreased urine output", "No urine output ", "Burns in mouth and throat", "Yellow eyes (jaundice) ", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting ", "Yellow skin ", "Disturbance in the acid balance of the blood (can lead to failure of many organs)", "Kidney failure ", "Kidney damage", "Reduced brain function or intelligence", "Reduced lung function", "Softening of the bones and kidney failure (itai-itai disease)", "Diarrhea", "Eye irritation", "Gingivitis", "Kidney damage", "Metallic taste", "Skin irritation", "Grayish-black staining of the skin and mucus membranes (argyria)", "Silver deposits in the eyes (argyrosis)", "Chemical burns", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Eczema", "Headache", "Irritation of mucous membranes", "Stomach problems", "Fever"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Shin splints - self-care": {"Symptoms": ["\r\n\r\n \r\nUsually pain in both legs\u00a0", "Sharp or dull, aching pain in the front of your shin\u00a0", "Pain\u00a0when you push on your shins\u00a0", "Pain that gets worse during and after exercise\u00a0", "Pain that gets better with rest\u00a0"], "description": "Learn what you can do to heal from shin splints and prevent them from getting worse. Know that untreated shin splits can turn into stress fractures that will keep you from activities even longer.\r\n", "Causes": "\r\n\r\n \r\nShin splints is an exercise problem. You get shin splints from overloading your shin bone.\u00a0Shin splints happen from overuse with too much activity or a change in training. Usually the activity is high impact and repetitive exercise of your lower legs. This is why runners, dancers, and gymnasts often get shin splints. Common activities that cause shin splints are:\u00a0Running, especially on hills. If you are a new runner, you are at greater risk for shin splints.\u00a0, Upping your number of days of training\u00a0, Increasing the amount of time in training, or going a longer distance\u00a0, Doing exercise that has frequent stops and starts, such as dancing, basketball, or military training\u00a0. You are more at risk for shin splints if you:\u00a0Have flat feet or a very rigid foot arches\u00a0, Work out on hard surfaces, such as running on the street or playing basketball or tennis on a hard court\u00a0, Don\u2019t wear the proper shoes\u00a0, Wear worn out shoes. Running shoes lose over half of their shock absorbing ability after 250 miles of use.\r\n. "}, "Schistosomiasis": {"description": "Schistosomiasis is an infection with a type of Schistosoma parasite.", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Bladder cancer, Chronic kidney failure, Chronic liver damage and an enlarged spleen, Colon (large intestine) inflammation, Kidney and bladder blockage, Pulmonary hypertension, Repeated blood infections, if bacteria enter the bloodstream through an irritated colon, Right-sided heart failure, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Many parasites may cause fever, chills, swollen lymph nodes, and swollen\u00a0liver and spleen.", "When the worm first gets into the skin, it\u00a0may cause itching and a rash (swimmer's itch). In this condition, the schistosome is destroyed within the skin.", "Intestinal symptoms include abdominal pain and diarrhea (which may be bloody).", "Urinary symptoms may include frequent urination, painful urination, and blood in the urine. "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. Tests that may be done include:Antibody test to check for signs of infection, Biopsy of tissue, Complete blood count (CBC) to check for signs of anemia, Eosinophil count to measure the number of certain white blood cells, Kidney function tests, Liver function tests, Stool examination to look for parasite eggs, Urinalysis to look for parasite eggs . ", "Treatment": "This infection is usually treated with the drug praziquantel. If the infection is severe or involves the brain, corticosteroids may be given.", "Causes": "You can get a schistosoma infection through contact with contaminated water. This parasite swims freely in open bodies of water.When the parasite comes into contact with humans, it burrows into the skin and matures into another stage. Then, it travels to the lungs and liver, where it grows into the adult form of the worm.The adult worm then travels to its preferred body part, depending on its species. These areas include the: Bladder, Rectum, Intestines, Liver, Veins that carry blood from the intestines to the liver, Spleen, Lungs . Schistosomiasis is not usually seen in the United States. It is common in many tropical and subtropical areas worldwide.", "Prevention": "Follow these steps to avoid getting this infection:Avoid swimming or bathing in contaminated or potentially contaminated water., Avoid bodies of water if you do not know whether they are safe.. Snails can host\u00a0this parasite. Getting rid of snails in bodies of water used by humans may help prevent infection."}, "Strabismus": {"Symptoms": ["Crossed eyes", "Double vision", "Eyes that do not align in the same direction", "Uncoordinated eye movements (eyes do not move together)", "Loss of vision or depth perception "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam that includes a detailed examination of the eyes.Tests will be done to determine how much the eyes are out of alignment.Corneal light reflex, Cover/uncover test, Retinal exam, Standard ophthalmic exam, Visual acuity. A brain and nervous system (neurological) exam will also be done.", "description": "Strabismus is a disorder in which both eyes do not line up in the same direction, so they do not look at the same object at the same time. The condition is more commonly known as \"crossed eyes.\"", "Causes": "Six different muscles surround each eye and work \"as a team.\" This allows both eyes to focus on the same object.In someone with strabismus, these muscles do not work together. As a result, one eye looks at one object, while the other eye turns in a different direction to focus on another object.When this occurs, two different images are sent to the brain -- one from each eye. This confuses the brain. In children, the brain may learn to ignore the image from the weaker eye.If the strabismus is not treated, the eye that the brain ignores will never see well. This loss of vision is called amblyopia. Another name for amblyopia is \"lazy eye.\" Sometimes amblyopia is present first, and it causes strabismus.In most children with strabismus, the cause is unknown. In more than half of these cases, the problem is present at or shortly after birth. This is called congenital strabismus.Most of the time, the problem has to do with muscle control, and not with muscle strength.Other disorders associated with strabismus in children include:Apert syndrome, Cerebral palsy, Congenital rubella, Hemangioma near the eye during infancy, Incontinentia pigmenti syndrome, Noonan syndrome, Prader-Willi syndrome, Retinopathy of prematurity, Retinoblastoma, Traumatic brain injury, Trisomy 18 . Strabismus that develops in adults can be caused by:Botulism, Diabetes (causes a condition known as acquired paralytic strabismus), Graves' disease, Guillain-Barr\u00e9 syndrome, Injury to the eye, Shellfish poisoning, Stroke, Traumatic brain injury, Vision loss from any eye disease or injury . A family history of strabismus is a risk factor. Farsightedness may be a contributing factor, especially in children. Any other disease that causes vision loss may also cause strabismus.", "Treatment": "The first step in treating strabismus in children is to prescribe glasses, if needed.Next, amblyopia or lazy eye must be treated. A patch is placed over the better eye. This forces the weaker eye to work harder and get better vision.Your child may not like wearing a patch or eyeglasses. A patch forces the child to see through the weaker eye at first. However, it is very important to use the patch or eyeglasses as directed.Eye muscle surgery may be needed if the eyes still do not move correctly. Different muscles in the eye will be made stronger or weaker.Eye muscle repair surgery does not fix the poor vision of a lazy eye. Muscle surgery will fail if amblyopia has not been treated. A child may still have to wear glasses after surgery. Surgery is more often successful if done when the child is younger. Adults with mild strabismus that comes and goes may do well with glasses and eye muscle exercises to help keep the eyes straight. More severe forms will require surgery to straighten the eyes. If strabismus has occurred because of vision loss, the vision loss will need to be corrected before strabismus surgery can be successful."}, "Snake bites": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding from wound", "Blurred vision", "Burning of the skin", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Excessive sweating", "Fainting", "Fang marks in the skin", "Fever", "Increased thirst", "Loss of muscle coordination", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness and tingling", "Rapid pulse", "Tissue death", "Severe pain", "Skin discoloration", "Swelling at the site of the bite", "Weakness", "Bleeding", "Breathing difficulty", "Blurred vision", "Eyelid drooping", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness", "Pain at site of bite", "Paralysis", "Rapid pulse", "Skin color changes", "Swelling", "Tingling", "Tissue damage", "Thirst", "Tiredness", "Weakness", "Weak pulse", "Bleeding", "Breathing difficulty", "Low blood pressure", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness and tingling", "Pain at site of bite", "Shock", "Skin color changes", "Swelling", "Thirst", "Tiredness", "Tissue damage", "Weakness", "Weak pulse", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Eyelid drooping", "Headache", "Low blood pressure", "Mouth watering (excessive salivation)", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness", "Pain and swelling at site of bite", "Paralysis", "Shock", "Slurred speech", " \r\n Swallowing difficulty \r\n ", "Swelling of tongue and throat", "Weakness", "Skin color changes", "Skin tissue damage", "Stomach or abdominal pain", "Weak pulse"], "Causes": "Venomous\u00a0snake bites include bites by any of the following:Cobra, Copperhead, Coral snake, Cottonmouth (water moccasin), Rattlesnake, Various snakes found at zoos. All snakes will bite when threatened or surprised, but most will usually avoid people if possible, and only bite as a last resort.Snakes found in and near water are often mistaken as being venomous. Most species of snake are harmless and many bites are not life-threatening, but unless you are absolutely sure that you know the species, treat it seriously.", "description": "Venomous animals account for a large number of deaths and injuries, worldwide. Snakes alone are estimated to inflict 2.5 million venomous bites each year, resulting in about 125,000 deaths. The actual number may be much larger. Southeast Asia, India, Brazil, and areas of Africa have the most deaths due to snakebite.", "Prevention": "Avoid areas where snakes may be hiding, such as under rocks and logs., Even though most snakes are not venomous, avoid picking up or playing with any snake unless you have been properly trained., If you hike often, consider buying a snake bite kit (available from hiking supply stores). Do not use older snake bite kits, such as those containing razor blades and suction bulbs., Don't provoke a snake. That is when many serious snake bites occur., Tap ahead of you with a walking stick before entering an area where you can't see your feet. Snakes will try to avoid you if given enough warning., When hiking in an area known to have snakes, wear long pants and boots if possible.. "}, "Speech disorders - children": {"description": "Speech disorders are different from language disorders in children, such as: ", "Possible Complications": "Speech disorders may lead to psychosocial problems associated with ineffective communication.", "Symptoms": ["Repetition of sounds, words, or parts of words or phrases after age 4 (I want...I want my doll. I...I see you.)", "Putting in (interjecting) extra sounds or words (We went to the...uh...store.)", "Making words longer (I am Boooobbby Jones.)", "Pausing during a sentence or words, often with the lips together", "Tension in the voice or sounds", "Frustration with attempts to communicate", "Head jerking while talking", "Eye blinking while talking", "Embarrassment with speech ", "Sounds may be distorted (changed)", "Sounds (most often consonants) will be substituted, left off, added, or changed", "Errors may make it hard for people to understand the person (only family members may be able to understand a child) ", "Hoarseness or raspiness to the voice", "Voice may break in or out", "Pitch of the voice may change suddenly", "Voice may be too loud or too soft", "Person may run out of air during a sentence", "Speech may sound odd because too much air is escaping through the hose (hypernasality) or too little air is coming out through the nose (hyponasality) "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests can help diagnose speech disorders:Denver Articulation Screening Examination, Early Language Milestone Scale, Denver II, Peabody Picture Test Revised. A hearing test may also be done.", "Treatment": "Milder forms of speech disorders may disappear on their own.Speech therapy may help with more severe symptoms or speech problems that do not improve.In therapy, the child will learn how to create certain sounds.", "Causes": "Speech is one of the main ways in which we communicate with those around us. It develops naturally, along with other signs of normal growth and development.Disfluencies are disorders in which a person repeats a sound, word, or phrase. Stuttering may be the most serious disfluency.Articulation disorders may have no clear cause. They may also occur in other family members. Other causes include:Problems or changes in the structure or shape of the muscles and bones used to make speech sounds. These changes may include cleft palate and tooth problems., Damage to parts of the brain or the nerves (such as from cerebral palsy) that control how the muscles work together to create speech.. Voice disorders are caused by problems when air passes from the lungs, through the vocal cords, and then through the throat, nose, mouth, and lips. A voice disorder may be due to:Acid from the stomach moving upward, Cancer of the throat, Cleft palate or other problems with the palate, Conditions that damage the nerves that supply the muscles of the vocal cords, Laryngeal webs or clefts (a birth defect in which a thin layer of tissue is between the vocal cords), Noncancerous growths (polyps, nodules, cysts, granulomas, papillomas, or ulcers) on the vocal cords, Overuse of the vocal cords from screaming, constantly clearing the throat, or singing. ", "Prevention": "Intellectual disability\u00a0and hearing loss make children more likely to develop speech disorders. At-risk infants should be referred to an audiologist for an audiology exam. Audiological and speech therapy can then be started, if necessary.As young children begin to speak, some disfluency is common. Children lack a large vocabulary and have difficulty expressing themselves. This results in broken speech. If you place excessive attention on the disfluency, a stuttering pattern may develop. The best way to prevent stuttering, therefore, is to avoid paying too much attention to the disfluency."}, "Seborrheic keratosis": {"description": "Seborrheic keratosis is a condition that causes wart-like growths on the skin. The growths are noncancerous (benign). ", "Possible Complications": "These complications may occur:Irritation, bleeding, or discomfort of growths, Mistake in diagnosis (growths may look like skin cancer tumors), Distress due to physical appearance, Many growths that come on suddenly (may be a sign of cancer inside the body) . ", "Symptoms": ["Are located on the face, chest, shoulders, back, or other areas", "Are painless, but may become irritated and itch", "Are most often tan, brown, or black", "Have a slightly raised, flat surface", "May have a rough texture (like a wart)", "Often have a waxy surface", "Are round or oval in shape", "May look \"pasted-on\"", "Often appear in clusters "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at the growths to determine if you have the condition. You may need a skin biopsy to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "You usually do not need treatment unless growths get irritated or affect your appearance.Growths may be removed with surgery or freezing (cryotherapy).", "Causes": "Seborrheic keratosis is a benign form of skin tumor. The cause is unknown.The condition commonly appears after age 40. It tends to run in families."}, "Scleroderma": {"Symptoms": ["Localized scleroderma. Often affects only the skin on the hands and face. It develops slowly, and rarely spreads in the body or causes serious problems.", "Systemic scleroderma, or sclerosis. May affect large areas of skin and organs such as the heart, lungs, or kidneys. There are two main types limited disease (CREST syndrome) and diffuse disease. ", "Fingers or toes that turn blue or white in response to cold temperatures (Raynaud's phenomenon) ", "Hair loss", "Skin that is darker or lighter than normal", "Stiffness, and tightness of skin of fingers, hands, forearm, and face", "Small white lumps beneath the skin that sometimes ooze a white substance that looks like toothpaste ", "Sores (ulcers) on the fingertips or toes ", "Tight and mask-like skin on the face ", "Joint pain", "Numbness and pain in the feet", "Pain, stiffness, and swelling of fingers and joints", "Wrist pain ", "Dry cough", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing", "Bloating after meals", "Constipation", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty swallowing", "Esophageal reflux or heartburn", "Problems controlling stools"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do a physical exam. The exam may show tight, thick skin.Your blood pressure will be checked. Scleroderma can cause small blood vessels in the kidneys to become inflamed. Problems with your kidneys can lead to high blood pressure.Blood and urine tests may include:Antinuclear antibody (ANA) panel, Antibody testing, ESR (sed rate), Rheumatoid factor, Complete blood count, Metabolic panel including creatinine, Urinalysis. Other tests may include:Chest x-ray, CT scan of the lungs, Echocardiogram, Tests to see how well your lungs and gastrointestinal (GI) tract are working, Skin biopsy. ", "description": "Scleroderma is a disease that involves the buildup of scar-like tissue in the skin. It also damages the cells that line the walls of the small arteries. ", "Causes": "Scleroderma is a type of autoimmune disorder in which the immune system mistakenly attacks and destroys healthy body tissue.The cause of scleroderma is unknown. A buildup of a substance called collagen in the skin and other organs leads to the symptoms of the disease.The disease most often affects people 30 to 50 years old. Women get scleroderma more often than men do. Some people with scleroderma have a history of being around silica dust and polyvinyl chloride, but most do not.Widespread scleroderma can occur with other autoimmune diseases, including systemic lupus erythematosus and polymyositis.These cases are referred to as mixed connective disease.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for scleroderma.Your doctor will prescribe medicines and other treatments to control your symptoms and prevent complications.Medicines used to treat scleroderma include:Corticosteroids, Drugs that suppress the immune system such as methotrexate and Cytoxan, Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs). Other treatments for specific symptoms may include:Medicines for heartburn or swallowing problems, Blood pressure medications (such as ACE inhibitors) for high blood pressure or kidney problems, Light therapy to relieve skin thickening, Medicines to improve breathing (bosentan), Treatments to improve Raynaud's phenomenon, including medicines, gloves to keep the hands warm, avoiding smoking. Treatment often involves physical therapy as well."}, "Skin abscess": {"description": "A skin abscess is a\u00a0build up\u00a0of pus in or on the skin.", "Possible Complications": "Spread of infection in the same area , Spread of the infection in the blood and\u00a0throughout the body, Tissue death (gangrene). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever or chills, in some cases", "Local swelling around the infected spot", "Hard of tissue (induration)", "Skin lesion that may be an open or closed sore, or domed nodule\r\n", "Redness, tenderness, and warmth in the area\r\n", "Fluid drainage"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can diagnose the problem by looking at the affected area. The drainage from the sore may be sent to the lab for a culture. This can help identify the cause of the infection.\u00a0\r\n", "Treatment": "You can apply moist heat (such as warm compresses) to help the abscess drain and heal faster.\u00a0DO NOT push and squeeze on the abscess.The\u00a0health care provider\u00a0may cut open\u00a0the abscess and drain it.Numbing medicine will be put on your skin., Packing material may be left in wound to help it heal. . You may need to take antibiotics by mouth to control the infection.", "Causes": "Skin abscesses are common. They occur when an infection causes pus\u00a0to collect in the skin.Skin abscesses may occur after: A bacterial infection (often staphylococcus), A minor wound or injury, Boils, Folliculitis. A skin abscess may occur anywhere on the body. The problem affects people of all ages.", "Prevention": "Keep the skin around minor wounds clean and dry to prevent infection. Call your health care provider if you notice signs of infection. Take care of\u00a0minor infections promptly."}, "Suicide and suicidal behavior": {"Symptoms": ["Having trouble concentrating or thinking clearly", "Giving away belongings", "Talking about going away or the need to \"get my affairs in order\"", "Suddenly changing behavior, especially calmness after a period of anxiety", "Losing interest in activities they used to enjoy", "Self-destructive behaviors, such as heavily drinking alcohol, using illegal drugs, or cutting their body", "Pulling away from friends or not wanting to go out", "Suddenly having trouble in school or work", "Talking about death or suicide, or even saying that they want to hurt themselves", "Talking about feeling hopeless or guilty", "Changing sleep or eating habits", "Arranging ways to take their own life (such as buying a gun or many pills) "], "Causes": "Suicide and suicidal behaviors usually occur in people with one or more of the following:Bipolar disorder, Borderline personality disorder, Depression, Drug or alcohol use, Post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD), Schizophrenia, Stressful life issues, such as serious financial or relationship problems. People who try to\u00a0take their own life\u00a0are often trying to get away from a situation that seems impossible to deal with. Many who\u00a0attempt\u00a0suicide are seeking relief from:Feeling ashamed, guilty, or like a burden to others, Feeling like a victim, Feelings of rejection, loss, or loneliness. Suicidal behaviors may occur when there is a situation or event that the person finds overwhelming, such as:Aging (the elderly have the highest rate of suicide), Death of a loved one, Drug or alcohol use, Emotional trauma, Serious physical illness, Unemployment or money problems. Risk factors for suicide in teenagers include:Access to guns, Family member who completed suicide, History of hurting themselves on purpose, History of being neglected or abused, Living in communities where there have been recent outbreaks of suicide in young people, Romantic breakup. Most suicide attempts do not result in death. Many of these attempts are done in a way that makes rescue possible. These attempts are often a cry for help.Some people attempt suicide in a way that is less likely to be fatal, such as poisoning or overdose. Men are more likely to choose violent methods, such as shooting themselves. As a result, suicide attempts by men are more likely to result in death.Relatives of people who attempt or complete suicide often blame themselves or become very angry. They may see the suicide attempt as selfish. However, people who\u00a0attempt suicide often mistakenly believe that they are doing their friends and relatives a favor by taking themselves out of the world.", "description": "Suicide is the act of taking one's own life on purpose. Suicidal behavior is any action that could cause a person to die, such as taking a drug overdose or crashing a car on purpose.", "Prevention": "Avoiding alcohol and drugs (other than prescribed medicines) can reduce the risk of suicide.In homes with children or teenagers:Keep all prescription medicines high up and locked., Do not keep alcohol in the home, or keep it locked up., Do not keep guns in the home. If you do keep guns in the home, lock them and keep the bullets separate.. Many people who try to\u00a0take their own life\u00a0talk about it before making the attempt. Sometimes, just talking to someone who cares and who does not judge them is enough to reduce the risk of suicide. However, if you are a friend, family member, or just know someone who you think may attempt suicide, never try to manage the problem on your own. Seek help. Suicide prevention centers have telephone \"hotline\" services.Never ignore a suicide threat or attempted suicide.", "Treatment": "People who are at risk of suicidal behavior may not seek treatment for many reasons, including:They believe nothing will help, They do not want to tell anyone they have problems, They think asking for help is a sign of weakness, They do not know where to go for help. A person may need emergency treatment after a suicide attempt. They may need first aid, CPR, or more intensive treatments.People who try to\u00a0take their own life\u00a0may need to stay in a hospital for treatment and to reduce the risk of future attempts. Therapy is one of the most important parts of treatment.Any mental health disorder that may have led to the suicide attempt should be evaluated and treated. This includes:Bipolar disorder, Borderline personality disorder, Drug or alcohol dependence, Major depression, Schizophrenia. Always take suicide attempts and threats seriously. If you or someone you know is thinking about suicide, there are numbers that you can call from anywhere in the United States, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week: 1-800-SUICIDE or 1-800-999-9999.Call the local emergency number (such as 911) right away if someone you know has attempted suicide. Do not leave the person alone, even after you have called for help."}, "Syringomyelia": {"description": "Syringomyelia is a fluid-filled hole that forms in the spinal cord. Over time, it damages the spinal cord.", "Possible Complications": "Without treatment, the condition may lead to:Loss of nervous system function, Permanent disability . Possible complications of surgery include:Infection, Other complications of surgery. ", "Symptoms": ["Headache", "Loss of muscle mass (wasting, atrophy), often in the arms and hands", "Muscle function loss, loss of ability to use arms or legs", "Numbness that decreases the feeling of pain or temperature; lowers the ability to feel when the skin is being touched; occurs in the neck, shoulders, upper arms, and trunk in a cape-like pattern; and slowly gets worse over time", "Pain down the arms, neck, or into the middle back or legs", "Weakness (decreased muscle strength) in the arms or legs ", "Spasms or tightness in the leg or hand and arm muscles", "Uncoordinated movement"], "Exams and Tests": "A nervous system (neurologic) exam may show a loss of feeling or movement caused by pressure on the spinal cord.Other tests that may be done include:MRI of the spine, MRI of the head, Spinal CT scan with myelogram (rarely) . ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to stop the spinal cord damage from getting worse and to improve function. Surgery may be needed to relieve pressure in the spinal cord. Physical therapy may be needed to improve muscle function.A person with syringomyelia may need to have ventriculoperitoneal shunting, in which a catheter (thin, flexible tube) is inserted to drain the fluid buildup.", "Causes": "The fluid buildup in syringomyelia may be caused by: Birth defects (especially \"chiari malformation,\" in which part of the brain pushes down onto the spinal cord at the base of the skull), Spinal cord trauma, Tumors of the spinal cord . The fluid-filled hole usually begins in the neck area. It expands slowly, putting pressure on the spinal cord and slowly causing damage.", "Prevention": "There is no known\u00a0way to prevent this condition,\u00a0other than avoiding\u00a0injuries to the spinal cord. Getting treated right away slows the disorder from getting worse."}, "Scarlet fever": {"description": "Scarlet fever is a disease caused by an infection with bacteria in the group A Streptococcus (the same bacteria that cause strep throat).", "Possible Complications": "Complications are rare with the right treatment, but can include:Acute rheumatic fever, Bone or joint problems, Ear infection, Kidney damage, Liver damage, Pneumonia, Sinus infection, Swelling around the brain and spinal cord (meningitis), Swollen lymph glands or abscess. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Bright red color in the creases of the underarm and groin", "Chills", "Fever", "General discomfort (malaise)", "Headache", "Muscle aches", "Sore throat", "Swollen, red tongue (strawberry tongue)", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination, Throat culture that shows bacteria from group A Streptococcus, Rapid antigen detection (throat swab) . ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to kill the bacteria that cause the throat infection. This is crucial to prevent rheumatic fever, a serious complication of strep throat and scarlet fever.", "Causes": "Scarlet fever was once a very serious childhood disease, but now it is easy to treat. The streptococcal bacteria that cause it produce a toxin that leads to the hallmark red rash of the illness.The main risk factor for getting scarlet fever is infection with the bacteria that cause strep throat. A history of strep throat or scarlet fever in the community, neighborhood, or school may increase the risk of infection.", "Prevention": "Bacteria are spread by direct contact with infected people, or by droplets exhaled by an infected person. Avoid contact with infected people."}, "Spinal stenosis": {"Symptoms": ["Numbness, cramping, or pain in the back, buttocks, thighs, or calves, or in the neck, shoulders, or arms", "Weakness of part of a leg or arm", "Difficulty or poor balance when walking", "Problems controlling urine or bowel movements"], "Exams and Tests": "During\u00a0a physical exam, your doctor will try to find the location of the pain and\u00a0determine how it affects your movement. You will be asked to:Sit, stand, and walk. While you walk, your doctor may ask you to try walking on your toes and then your heels., Bend forward, backward, and sideways., Lift your legs straight up while lying down. If the pain is worse when you do this, you may have sciatica, especially if you also feel numbness or tingling in one of your legs.. Your doctor will also move your legs in different positions, including bending and straightening your knees.\u00a0This\u00a0is to check your strength and ability to move.To test nerve function, the doctor uses a rubber hammer to check your reflexes. To test how well your nerves sense feeling, the doctor touches your legs in many places with a pin, cotton swab, or feather. A brain and nervous system (neurologic) examination\u00a0helps confirm leg weakness and decreased sensation in the legs. The following tests may be done:EMG, Spinal MRI or spinal CT scan , X-ray of the spine. ", "description": "Spinal stenosis is narrowing of the spinal column that causes pressure on the spinal cord, or narrowing of the openings (called neural foramina) where spinal nerves leave the spinal column.", "Causes": "Spinal stenosis usually occurs as a person ages.The disks become drier and start to bulge. , The bones and ligaments of the spine thicken or grow larger. This is caused by arthritis or long-term swelling.. Spinal stenosis may also be caused by:Arthritis of the spine, usually in middle-aged or elderly people, Bone diseases, such as Paget disease\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Defect or growth in the spine that was present from birth, Herniated or slipped disk, which often happened in the past, Injury that causes pressure on the nerve roots or the spinal cord, Tumors in the spine, Fracture or injury of a spinal bone. ", "Treatment": "Your doctor and other health professionals will help you manage your pain and keep you as active as possible.Your doctor may refer you for physical therapy. The physical therapist will\u00a0teach you\u00a0stretches and exercises that make your\u00a0back\u00a0muscles stronger., You may also see a chiropractor, a massage therapist, and someone who performs acupuncture. Sometimes a few visits will help your back or neck pain., Cold packs and heat therapy may help your pain during flare-ups.. Treatments for back pain caused by spinal stenosis include:Medicines that may help with your back pain. , A type of talk therapy called cognitive behavioral therapy\u00a0to help you better understand your pain and teach you how to manage back pain., An epidural spinal injection (ESI) involves injecting medicine directly into the space around your spinal nerves or spinal cord.. Spinal stenosis symptoms often become worse over time, but this may happen slowly. If the pain does not respond to these treatments, or you lose movement or feeling, you may need surgery.Surgery is done to relieve pressure on the nerves or spinal cord., You and your doctor can decide when you need to have surgery for these symptoms.. Surgery may include removing a bulging disc, removing part of the vertebra bone, or widening the opening where your spinal nerves are\u00a0located.During some spinal surgeries, the surgeon will remove some bone to create more room for your spinal nerves or spinal column. The surgeon will then fuse some of the spine bones to make your spine more stable. But this will make your back more stiff.\r\n"}, "Simple pulmonary eosinophilia": {"description": "Simple pulmonary eosinophilia is inflammation of the lungs from an increase in eosinophils, a type of white blood cell.", "Possible Complications": "A rare complication of simple pulmonary eosinophilia is a severe type of pneumonia called acute idiopathic eosinophilic pneumonia.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Dry cough", "Fever", "General ill feeling", "Rapid respiratory rate", "Rash", "Shortness of breath", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will listen to your chest with a stethoscope. Crackle-like sounds called rales may be heard. Rales suggest inflammation of the lung tissue.A complete blood count (CBC) may show increased white blood cells, particularly eosinophils.Chest x-ray usually shows abnormal shadows called infiltrates. They may disappear with time or reappear in different areas of the lung.A bronchoscopy with washing may show a large number of eosinophils.Gastric lavage may show signs of the Ascaris worm or another parasite.", "Treatment": "If you are allergic to a medicine, the doctor may tell you to stop taking it. Never stop taking a medicine without first talking with your doctor.If the condition is due to an infection, you may be treated with an antibiotic or anti-parasitic medicine.Sometimes, you may need corticosteroids (anti-inflammatory medicines).", "Causes": "Most cases of simple pulmonary eosinophilia are due to an allergic reaction from:A medicine, such as a sulfonamide antibiotic or nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), Infection with a fungus such as Aspergillus fumigatus or Pneumocystis jirovecii, A parasite, including the roundworms Ascariasis lumbricoides, Necator americanus, or Ancylostoma duodenale (hookworms). ", "Prevention": "This is a rare disorder. Many times, the cause cannot be found. Minimizing exposure to possible risk factors, such as certain medicines or parasites, may reduce risk."}, "Substance use disorder": {"description": "This disorder is also called substance abuse.", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Continuing to use drugs even when health, work, or family are being harmed", "Episodes of violence", "Hostility when confronted about drug dependence", "Lack of control over drug abuse - being unable to stop or reduce alcohol intake", "Making excuses to use drugs", "Missing work or school, or a decrease in performance", "Need for daily or regular drug use to function", "Neglecting to eat", "Not caring\u00a0about physical appearance", "No longer taking part in activities because of drug abuse", "Secretive behavior to hide drug use", "Using drugs even when alone\u00a0\r\n "], "Exams and Tests": "Drug tests (toxicology screens) on blood and urine samples can show many chemicals and drugs in the body. How sensitive the test is depends on the drug itself, when the drug was taken, and the testing laboratory. Blood tests are more likely to find a drug than urine tests, though urine drug screens are done more often.", "Causes": "\r\nThe exact cause of substance use disorder is not known. A person's genes, the action of the drug, peer pressure, emotional distress, anxiety, depression, and environmental stress can all be factors.At least half of those who become addicted have depression, attention deficit disorder, post-traumatic stress disorder, or another mental problem. A stressful or chaotic lifestyle and low self-esteem are also common.Children who grow up seeing their parents using drugs may have a high risk of developing an addiction later in life for both environmental and genetic reasons.Commonly abused substances include:Opiates and narcotics are powerful painkillers that cause drowsiness and sometimes intense feelings of well-being, elation, happiness, excitement, and joy. These include heroin, opium, codeine, and narcotic pain medicines that may be prescribed by a doctor or bought illegally., Stimulants are drugs that stimulate the brain and nervous system. They include amphetamines, cocaine, and drugs used to treat ADHD, such as methylphenidate (Ritalin). A person can start needing higher amounts of these drugs to feel the same effect., Depressants cause drowsiness and reduce anxiety. They include alcohol, barbiturates, benzodiazepines (Valium, Ativan, Xanax), chloral hydrate, and paraldehyde. Using these substances can lead to addiction., LSD, mescaline, psilocybin (\"mushrooms\"), and phencyclidine (PCP or \"angel dust\")\u00a0 can cause a person to see things that are not there (hallucinations) and can lead to psychological addiction., Marijuana (cannabis) and hashish. There are several stages of drug use that may lead to addiction. Young people seem to move more quickly through the stages than do adults. Stages are:Experimental use -- typically involves peers, done for recreational use; the user may enjoy defying parents or other authority figures., Regular use -- the user misses more and more school or work; worries about losing drug source; uses drugs to \"fix\" negative feelings; begins to stay away from friends and family; may change friends to those who are regular users; shows increased tolerance and ability to \"handle\" the drug., Problem or risky use -- the user loses any motivation; does not care about school and work; has obvious behavior changes; thinking about drug use is more important than all other interests, including relationships; the user becomes secretive; may begin dealing drugs to help support habit; use of other, harder drugs may increase; legal problems may increase., Addiction (dependence) -- cannot face daily life without drugs; denies problem; physical condition gets worse; loss of \"control\" over use; may become suicidal; financial and legal problems get worse; may have broken ties with family members or friends.. ", "Prevention": "Drug education programs can be helpful. Parents can have a strong influence on their children by teaching them about the harms of using substances.", "Treatment": "\r\n\r\nSubstance use disorder is a serious condition and not easy to treat. The best care and treatment involves trained professionals.Treatment\u00a0begins with recognizing the problem. Though \"denial\" is a common symptom of addiction, people who are addicted have far less denial if they are treated with empathy and respect, rather than told what to do or being confronted.The substance may either be slowly withdrawn or stopped abruptly. Support for physical and emotional symptoms, as well as staying drug free (abstinence) are also key to treatment:People with drug overdose may need emergency treatment in the hospital. The exact treatment depends on the drug used., Detoxification (detox) is the withdrawal of the substance abruptly in an environment where there is good support. Detoxification can be done on an inpatient or outpatient basis., At times, another drug with a similar action or effect on the body is taken, as the dose is slowly decreased to reduce the side effects and risks of withdrawal.\u00a0 For example, with narcotic addiction, methadone or similar drugs may be used to prevent withdrawal and continued use.. Residential treatment programs monitor and address possible withdrawal symptoms and behaviors. These programs use techniques to get users to recognize their behaviors and learn how not to go back to using (relapse).If the person also has depression or another mental health disorder, it should be treated. In many cases, a person starts using drugs to try to self-treat mental illness."}, "Sclerosing cholangitis": {"description": "Sclerosing cholangitis refers to swelling (inflammation), scarring, and destruction of the bile ducts inside and outside of the liver.", "Possible Complications": "Bleeding esophageal varices, Cancer in the bile ducts (cholangiocarcinoma), Cirrhosis and liver failure, Infection of the biliary system (cholangitis), Narrowing of the bile ducts (strictures), Vitamin deficiencies. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Itching", "Yellowing of the skin and eyes (jaundice)", "Enlarged liver", "Enlarged spleen", "Loss of appetite and weight loss", "Repeat episodes of cholangitis"], "Exams and Tests": "Some people do not have symptoms, but blood work shows that they have abnormal liver function. The doctor will look for:Diseases that cause similar problems, Diseases that often occur with this condition (especially inflammatory bowel disease), Gallstones. Tests that show cholangitis include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Liver biopsy, Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), Percutaneous transhepatic cholangiogram (PTC). Blood tests include:Liver enzymes (liver function tests). ", "Treatment": "Medications that may be used include:Cholestyramine, Ursodeoxycholic acid (ursodiol), Fat-soluble vitamins (D, E, A, K), Antibiotics for infections in the bile ducts, Medications that quiet the immune system (prednisone, azathioprine, cyclosporine, methotrexate). Surgical procedures:Inserting a long, thin tube with a balloon at the end to open up narrowing (endoscopic balloon dilation of strictures), Placement of a drain or tube for major narrowing (strictures) of biliary ducts, Proctocolectomy (for those who have both ulcerative colitis and sclerosing cholangitis), Liver transplant. ", "Causes": "The cause of this condition is usually unknown.The disease may be seen in patients who have:Autoimmune disorders, Chronic pancreatitis, Inflammatory bowel disease (Crohn's disease and ulcerative colitis), Sarcoidosis. Genetic factors may also be responsible. Sclerosing cholangitis occurs more often in men than women. This disorder is rare in children.Sclerosing cholangitis may also be caused by:Choledocholithiasis, Infections in the liver, gallbladder, and bile ducts. "}, "Strongyloidiasis": {"description": "Strongyloidiasis is an infection with the roundworm Strongyloides stercoralis (S. stercoralis).", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Disseminated strongyloidiasis, especially in people with HIV or an otherwise weakened immune system, Strongyloidiasis hyperinfection syndrome, also more common in people with a weakened immune system, Eosinophilic pneumonia, Malnutrition due to problems absorbing nutrients from the gastrointestinal tract . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain (upper abdomen)", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Rash", "Red hive-like areas near the anus", "Vomiting", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be done:Blood antigen test for S. stercoralis, Complete blood count with differential \r\n, Total eosinophil count in the blood (eosinophils are a type of white blood cell), Duodenal aspiration (removing a small amount of tissue from the first part of the small intestine) to check for S. stercoralis, Sputum culture to check for S. stercoralis, Stool sample exam to check for S. stercoralis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to eliminate the worms with anti-worm medicines.Sometimes people with no symptoms are treated. This includes people who take drugs that suppress the immune system, such as those who are going to have, or have had, a transplant.", "Causes": "S. stercoralis is a roundworm that is fairly common in warm, moist areas. In rare cases, it can be found as far north as Canada.People catch the infection when their skin comes in contact with soil that is contaminated with the worms.The tiny worm is barely visible to the naked eye. Young roundworms can move through a person's skin and into the bloodstream to the lungs and airways.They then move up to the throat, where they are swallowed into the stomach. From the stomach, the worms move to the small intestine, where they attach to the intestinal wall. Later, they produce eggs, which hatch into tiny larvae (immature worms) and pass out of the body.Unlike other worms, these larvae can re-enter the body through the skin around the anus, which allows an infection to grow. Areas where the worms go through the skin can become red and painful.This infection is uncommon in the United States, but it does occur in the southeastern U.S. Most cases in North America are brought by travelers who have visited or lived in South America or Africa.Some people are at risk for a severe type called strongyloidiasis hyperinfection syndrome. In this form of the condition, there are more worms and they multiply more quickly than normal. It can occur in people who have a weakened immune system. This includes people who have had an organ or blood-product transplant, and those who take steroid medicine or immune-suppressing drugs.", "Prevention": "Good personal hygiene can reduce the risk of strongyloidiasis. Public health services and sanitary facilities provide good infection control."}, "Sassafras oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Rapid breathing", "Shallow breathing", "Dizziness", "Hallucinations", "Unconsciousness", "Burns"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Spondylolisthesis": {"Symptoms": ["Lower back pain", "Muscle tightness (tight hamstring muscle)", "Pain, numbness, or tingling\u00a0in the thighs and buttocks", "Stiffness", "Tenderness in the area of the vertebra that is out of place", "Weakness in the legs"], "Possible Complications": "If too much\u00a0movement occurs, the bones may begin to press on nerves. Surgery may be necessary to correct the condition.Other complications may include:Chronic back pain, Infection, Temporary or permanent damage of spinal nerve roots, which may cause sensation changes, weakness, or paralysis of the legs . ", "description": "Spondylolisthesis is a condition in which a bone (vertebra) in the spine\u00a0moves forward\u00a0out of the proper position onto the bone below it.", "Causes": "In children, spondylolisthesis usually occurs between the fifth bone in the lower back (lumbar vertebra) and the first bone in the sacrum (pelvis) area. It is often due to a birth defect in that area of the spine or sudden injury (acute trauma).In adults, the most common cause is abnormal wear on the cartilage and bones, such as arthritis. Bone disease and fractures can also cause\u00a0spondylolisthesis.\u00a0Certain sport activities, such as gymnastics, weight lifting, and football, put a great deal of stress on the bones in the lower back. They also require that the athlete constantly overstretch (hyperextend) the spine. This can lead to a stress fracture on one or both sides of the vertebra. A stress fracture can cause a spinal bone to become weak and shift out of place.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on how severely the vertebra has shifted out of place. Most persons get better with exercises to stretch and strengthen lower back muscles.If the shift is not severe, you can play most sports if there is no pain. Most of the time, you can\u00a0slowly resume activities.You may be asked to avoid contact sports or to change activities to protect your back from being overextended.You will have follow-up x-rays to make sure the problem is not getting worse.Your health care provider may also recommend:A back brace to limit spine movement , Pain medicine (taken by mouth or injected into the back), Physical therapy. Surgery may be needed to fuse the shifted vertebrae if you have:Severe pain\u00a0that does not get better with treatment, A severe shift\u00a0of a spine bone, Weakness of muscles in one or both of your legs. There is a chance of nerve injury with such surgery.\u00a0However, the results can be very successful.\r\n\u00a0\u00a0\r\n"}, "Spider angioma": {"Symptoms": ["May have a red dot in the center", "Has reddish extensions that reach out from the center", "Disappears when pressed on and comes back when pressure is released", "Is seen most often on the face and neck"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time you do not need tests to diagnose the condition. But sometimes a skin biopsy may be needed to confirm the diagnosis. Blood tests may be done if a liver problem is suspected.", "description": "Spider angioma is an abnormal collection of blood vessels near the surface of the skin.", "Causes": "Spider angiomas are very common. They often occur in pregnant women and in people with liver disease. They can appear in both children and adults.", "Treatment": "Most of the time you do not need treatment, but burning (electrocautery) or laser treatment is sometimes done."}, "Sachet poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Eye irritation ", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty swallowing", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rapid breathing ", "Shallow breathing", "Stomach pain", "Throat irritation "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Subacute combined degeneration": {"description": "Subacute combined degeneration is a disorder of the spine, brain, and nerves. It involves weakness, abnormal sensations, mental problems, and vision difficulties.", "Possible Complications": "Complications can include permanent, progressive loss of nerve and mental functions.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal sensations (tingling and numbness)", "Weakness of the legs, arms, or other areas", "Clumsiness, stiff, or awkward movements", "Change in mental state such as memory problems, irritability, apathy, confusion, or dementia", "Decreased vision", "Depression", "Sleepiness", "Unsteady gait and loss of balance"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam.\u00a0The exam usually shows muscle weakness and sensation\u00a0problems on both sides of the body, especially in the legs. Knee jerk reflexes are often decreased. Muscles may develop spasticity.\u00a0There may be reduced senses of touch, pain, and temperature.Mental changes range from mild forgetfulness to severe dementia or psychosis. Severe dementia is uncommon, but in some cases, it is the first symptom of the disorder.An eye exam may show damage to the optic nerve, a condition called optic neuritis. Signs of nerve inflammation may be seen during a retinal exam. There may also be abnormal pupil responses, decreased visual acuity, and other changes.Blood teststhat may be ordered include:Complete blood count (CBC)Vitamin B12 blood levelMethylmalonic acid blood level", "Treatment": "Early treatment improves the chance of a good outcome.Vitamin B12 is given, usually by injection into a muscle. Injections are often given once a day for a week, then weekly for about 1 month, and then monthly. Vitamin B12 supplements either by injection or high dose pills must continue throughout life to prevent symptoms from returning.", "Causes": "Subacute combined degeneration is caused by a vitamin B12 deficiency. It mainly affects the spinal cord. But its effects on the brain and the peripheral (body) nerves are the reason for use of the term \u201ccombined.\u201d At first, the covering of the nerves (myelin sheath) is damaged. Later, the entire nerve cell is affected.Doctors do not know exactly how a lack of vitamin B12 damages the nerves. It is possible the lack of this vitamin causes abnormal fatty acids to form around cells and nerves.A person has a high risk of this condition if vitamin B12 cannot be absorbed from the intestine or if a person has:Pernicious anemia, Disorders of the small intestine, including Crohn's disease, \r\n  Problems absorbing nutrients, which can occur after gastrointestinal surgery. ", "Prevention": "Some vegetarian diets may be low in vitamin B12. Taking a supplement can prevent the disorder."}, "Strains ": {"Symptoms": ["Pain and difficulty moving the injured muscle", "Discolored and bruised skin", "Swelling"], "Causes": "A strain may be caused by:Too much\u00a0physical activity or effort, Improperly warming up before a physical activity, Poor flexibility . ", "description": "A strain is when a muscle is stretched too much and tears. It is also called a pulled muscle. A strain is a painful injury. It can be caused by an accident,\u00a0overusing a muscle, or using a muscle in\u00a0the wrong way.", "Prevention": "The following tips may help you reduce your risk of a strain:Warm-up properly before exercise and sports., Keep your muscles strong and flexible.. "}, "Smallpox": {"description": "Smallpox is a serious disease that is easily passed from person to person (contagious). It is caused by a virus.", "Possible Complications": "Arthritis and bone infections, Brain swelling (encephalitis), Death, Eye infections, Pneumonia, Scarring, Severe bleeding, Skin infections (from the sores). ", "Symptoms": ["Backache\r\n  ", "Delirium", "Diarrhea\r\n  ", "Excessive bleeding\r\n  ", "Fatigue\r\n  ", "High fever\r\n  ", "Malaise", "Raised pink rash -- turns into sores that become crusty on day 8 or 9", "Severe headache", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests include:DIC panel\r\n  , Platelet count, White blood cell count. Special laboratory tests can be used to identify the virus.", "Treatment": "\r\nThe smallpox vaccine may prevent illness or lessen symptoms if it is given within 1 - 4 days after a person is exposed to the disease. Once symptoms have started, treatment is limited.\r\nThere is no specific drug for treating smallpox. Antibiotics may be given for infections that occur in people who have smallpox. Taking antibodies against a disease similar to smallpox (vaccinia immune globulin) may help shorten the duration of the disease.\r\nPeople who have been diagnosed with smallpox and people they have been in close contact with need to be isolated right away. They will need to receive the vaccine and be watched closely.\r\n", "Causes": "Smallpox spreads from one person to another from saliva droplets. It may also be spread from bed sheets and clothing. It is most contagious during the first week of the infection. It may continue to be contagious until the scabs from the rash fall off. The virus can stay alive between 6 and 24 hours.People were once vaccinated against this disease. However, the disease has been mostly wiped out.The United States stopped giving the smallpox vaccine in 1972. In 1980, the World Health Organization (WHO) recommended that all countries stop vaccinating for smallpox.There are two forms of smallpox:Variola major is a serious illness that can be life threatening in people who have not been vaccinated\r\n  , Variola minor is a milder infection that rarely causes death\r\n  . A massive program by the World Health Organization (WHO) wiped out all known smallpox viruses from the world in the 1970s, except for a few samples saved for government research. Researchers continue to debate whether or not to kill the last remaining samples of the virus, or to preserve it in case there may be some future reason to study it.You are more likely to develop smallpox if you:Are a laboratory worker who handles the virus (rare)\r\n  , Are in a location where the virus was released as a biological weapon\r\n  . It is unknown how long past vaccinations stay effective. People who received the vaccine many years ago may no longer be fully protected against the virus.THE RISK OF TERRORISMThere is a concern that the smallpox virus could be spread as part of a terrorism attack. The virus could be spread in spray (aerosal) form.\r\n", "Prevention": "Many people were vaccinated against smallpox in the past. The vaccine is no longer given to the general public because the virus has been wiped out. If the vaccine needs to be given to control an outbreak, it can have a small risk of complications. Currently, only military personnel, health care workers, and emergency responders may receive the vaccine. "}, "Seborrheic dermatitis": {"description": "Cradle cap is the term used when seborrheic dermatitis affects the scalp of infants.", "Possible Complications": "Psychological distress, low self-esteem, embarrassment \r\n, Secondary bacterial or fungal infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Skin lesions", "Plaques over large area", "Greasy, oily areas of skin", "Skin scales -- white and flaking, or yellowish, oily, and\u00a0sticky dandruff", "Itching -- may become more itchy if infected", "Mild redness", "Hair loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis is based on appearance and location of the skin lesions. Further tests, such as skin biopsy, are rarely needed.", "Treatment": "Flaking and dryness can be treated with over-the-counter dandruff or medicated shampoos. You can buy these at the drugstore without a prescription. Look for a product that says on the label it treats seborrheic dermatitis. Such products contain ingredients such as salicylic acid, coal tar, zinc, resorcin, ketoconazole, or selenium sulfide. Use the shampoo according to label instructions.For severe cases, your healthcare provider will likely prescribe a shampoo or lotion containing a stronger dose of selenium sulfide, ketoconazole, or corticosteroid. A cream that contains an immunomodulator may be prescribed. This medicine suppresses the immune system to treat inflammation. It is thought that sunlight improves seborrheic dermatitis. In some persons the condition gets better in the summer, especially after outdoor activities.", "Causes": "The exact cause of\u00a0 seborrheic dermatitis\u00a0is unknown. Doctors think it may be due to a combination hormone levels, weakened immune system, lack of certain nutrients, or nervous system problems. Irritation from a yeast called Malassezia may also lead to this condition. Seborrheic dermatitis appears to run in families. Risk factors include:Stress or fatigue , Weather extremes, Oily skin, or skin problems such as acne, Infrequent shampoos or skin cleaning, Using lotions that contain alcohol, Obesity, Neurologic conditions, including Parkinson's disease, head injury\u00a0or stroke, Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). ", "Prevention": "The severity of seborrheic dermatitis can be lessened by controlling the risk factors and by paying careful attention to skin care."}, "Skin lesion of blastomycosis": {"description": "A skin lesion of blastomycosis is a symptom of an infection with the fungus Blastomyces dermatitidis. The skin becomes infected as the fungus spreads throughout the body. Another form of blastomycosis is only on the skin and usually gets better on its own with time. This article deals with the more widespread form of the infection.", "Possible Complications": "Abscesses (pockets of pus), Another (secondary) skin infection caused by bacteria, Complications related to medicines (for instance, amphotericin B can have severe side effects), Spontaneously draining nodules . ", "Symptoms": ["They may look like warts or ulcers.", "They are usually painless.", "They may vary from gray to violet in color.", "Form ulcers", "Bleed easily", "Occur in the nose or mouth"], "Exams and Tests": "The infection is diagnosed by identifying the fungus in a culture taken from a skin lesion. This usually requires a skin biopsy.", "Treatment": "This infection is treated with antifungal drugs such as amphotericin B, itraconazole, ketoconazole, or fluconazole. Either oral or intravenous (directly in the vein) drugs are used, depending on the form and stage of the disease.", "Causes": "Blastomycosis is a rare fungal infection. It is most\u00a0often found\u00a0in: Africa, Canada, Central and southeastern United States, India, Israel, Saudi Arabia . A person gets infected by\u00a0breathing in particles of the fungus that are found in moist soil, especially where there is rotting vegetation. People with immune system disorders are at highest risk for this infection.The fungus enters the body through the lungs and infects them. In some people, the fungus then spreads (disseminates) to other areas of the body. The infection may affect the skin, bones and joints,\u00a0genitals and urinary\u00a0tract, and other systems. Skin symptoms are a sign of widespread (disseminated) blastomycosis."}, "Sodium carbonate poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing problems due to throat swelling", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Drooling", "Eye irritation, redness, and pain", "Hoarseness", "Low blood pressure (may develop rapidly)", "Severe pain in the mouth, throat, chest, or abdominal area", "Shock", "Skin irritation", "Swallowing difficulty", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Salivary gland infections": {"description": "All of the salivary glands empty saliva into the mouth. The saliva enters the mouth through ducts that open into the mouth in different places. ", "Possible Complications": "Abscess of salivary gland, Infection returns, Spread of infection (cellulitis, Ludwig's angina) . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal tastes, foul tastes", "Decreased ability to open the mouth", "Dry mouth", "Fever", "Mouth or facial pain, especially when eating", "Redness over the side of the face or the upper neck", "Swelling of the face (particularly in front of the ears, below the jaw, or on the floor of the mouth)"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider or dentist will do an exam to look for enlarged glands. You may also have pus that drains into the mouth. The gland may be painful. A CT scan, MRI scanor ultrasound may be done if the doctor suspects an abscess. ", "Treatment": "In some cases, no treatment is needed. Treatment from your health care provider may include:Antibiotics if you have a fever or pus drainage, or if the infection is caused by bacteria. Antibiotics are not useful against viral infections. , Surgery or aspiration to drain an abscess if you have one. . Self-care steps you can take at home to help with recovery include:Practice good oral hygiene. Brush your teeth and floss well at least twice a da. This may help with healing and prevent an infection from spreading., Rinse your mouth with warm salt water rinses (1/2 teaspoon of salt in 1 cup of water) to ease pain keep the mouth moist. , Stop smoking if you are a smoker, to speed up healing. , Drink lots of water and use sugar-free lemon drops to increase the flow of saliva and reduce swelling. , Massaging the gland with heat.. ", "Causes": "Salivary gland infections are somewhat common, and they can return in some people. Viral infections such as mumps often affect the salivary glands. Mumps most often involves parotid salivary gland). Mumps is a rare problem today because of the MMR vaccine. Bacterial infections are most often the result of a: Blockage from salivary duct stones., Poor cleanliness in the mouth (oral hygiene), Low amounts of water in the body, most often while in the hospital., Smoking, Chronic illness . ", "Prevention": "In many cases, salivary gland infections cannot be prevented. Good oral hygiene may prevent some cases of bacterial infection."}, "Separation anxiety in children": {"Symptoms": ["Excessive distress when separated from the primary caregiver", "Nightmares", "Reluctance to go to school or other places because of fear of separation", "Reluctance to go to sleep without the primary caregiver nearby", "Repeated physical complaints", "Worry about losing or harm coming to the primary caregiver"], "Exams and Tests": "There are no tests for this condition, because it is normal.If severe separation anxiety persists past age 2, an evaluation with a psychiatrist may be needed to determine if the child has an anxiety disorder or other condition.", "description": "Separation anxiety in children is a developmental stage during which the child experiences anxiety when separated from the primary caregiver (usually the mother).", "Causes": "As infants develop, they experience various emotions, usually in a predictable order. Before 8 months, infants are so new to the world that they have little knowledge of what is ordinary and what may be dangerous, so new situations or experiences seem usual, and not frightening.In normal development, during this early period the infant becomes familiar with the home environment, and feels comfortable when parents or other known caretakers are present. After this time, lack of familiarity often produces fear because the infant recognizes that something unusual is going on.From 8\u00a0to 14 months, children often become frightened when they meet new people or visit new places. They recognize their parents as familiar and safe. When separated from their parents, particularly when away from home, they feel threatened and unsafe.Separation anxiety is a normal developmental stage. It helped keep our ancestors alive and helps children learn how to master their environment.It usually ends when the child is around 2 years old. At this age, toddlers begin to understand that parents may be out of sight now, but will return later. There is also a normal desire to test their independence.To get over separation anxiety, children must:Feel safe in their home environment, Trust people other than their parents, Trust that their parents will return. Even after children have successfully mastered this developmental stage, separation anxiety may return during periods of stress. Most children will experience some degree of separation anxiety when in unfamiliar situations, especially when separated from their parents.When children are in situations (such as hospitals) and are experiencing stress (such as illness or pain), they seek the safety, comfort, and protection of their parents. When parents cannot be with their children in these situations, the children experience distress.This is why it is important to stay with your child as much as is possible during any medical procedures. Your presence can actually reduce the amount of pain the child experiences, as anxiety of any kind makes pain worse.", "Treatment": "No treatment is necessary for ordinary separation anxiety.Parents can help their infant or toddler learn to adjust to their absence by letting trusted caregivers babysit the child. This helps the child learn to trust and bond with other adults and understand that their parents will return.If medical procedures are needed while a child is in this stage, it is helpful for a parent to go with the child whenever possible. When a parent cannot come with the child, exposing the child to the situation beforehand is helpful; for example, visiting the doctor's office before a test. When this is not possible, the child may display severe anxiety by crying, resisting treatment, begging, and screaming.Some hospitals provide Child Life specialists who can explain procedures and medical conditions to children of all ages. If your child is particularly anxious and needs significant medical care, it may help to ask your health care provider about such services.When separation from parents is necessary, but exposing the child to it beforehand is not possible (such as for surgical treatment), many physicians will recommend the child take mild sedating or tranquilizing medications to help reduce the trauma.Explain the situation and experience to the child and assure him or her that a parent is waiting, and specifically, where the parent is waiting.For older children who have not outgrown separation anxiety within the normal developmental timetable or who have regressed to it under stress, effective treatments may include:Anti-anxiety medications, Changes in parenting techniques, Counseling for the parents and child. Treatment for severe cases may include:Family education, Family therapy, Individual psychotherapy. "}, "Stingray": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Irregular heartbeat", "Low blood pressure", "Fainting", "Generalized cramps", "Headache", "Paralysis", "Weakness", "Bleeding", "Pain and swelling of lymph nodes near the area of the sting", "Severe pain at site of sting", "Sweating", "Swelling", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "If scuba diving or snorkeling, learn to identify potentially poisonous or otherwise dangerous sea creatures and their habits."}, "Stoddard solvent poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burns in mouth", "Severe throat pain", "Severe pain or burning in the eyes, ears, nose, and mouth area", "Vision loss", "Abdominal pain", "Bloody stools", "Burns in the esophagus", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Rapid heartbeat", "Collapse", "Weakness", "Breathing difficulty (severe)", "Throat swelling", "Burning sensations", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Fever", "Memory problems", "Nervousness", "Numbness in arms and legs", "Unconsciousness", "Burns", "Irritation", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Spinal cord trauma": {"description": "Spinal cord trauma is damage to the spinal cord. It may result from direct injury to the cord itself or indirectly from disease of the surrounding bones, tissues, or blood vessels.", "Possible Complications": "The following are possible complications of a spinal cord injury:Blood pressure changes - can be extreme (autonomic hyperreflexia), Increased risk of injury to numb areas of the body, Increased risk of urinary tract infections, Long-term kidney disease, Loss of bladder control, Loss of bowel control, Loss of feeling, Loss of sexual function (male impotence), Pain, Paralysis of breathing muscles, Paralysis (paraplegia, quadriplegia), Pressure sores, Problems due to not being able to move, such as deep vein thrombosis, lung infections, skin breakdown, and muscle stiffness, Shock. People living at home with spinal cord injury should do the following to prevent complications:Get lung (pulmonary) care each day (if they need it)., Follow all instructions\u00a0for bladder care to avoid infections and damage to the kidneys., Follow all instructions\u00a0for routine wound care to avoid pressure sores., Keep immunizations up to date., Maintain routine health visits with their doctor.. ", "Symptoms": ["Increased muscle tone (spasticity)", "Loss of normal bowel and bladder control (may include constipation, incontinence, bladder spasms)", "Numbness", "Sensory changes", "Pain", "Weakness, paralysis "], "Exams and Tests": "Spinal cord injury is a medical emergency that needs immediate medical attention.The health care provider will perform a physical exam, including a brain and nervous system (neurological) exam. This will help identify the exact location of the injury, if it is not already known. Some of the reflexes may be abnormal or missing. Once swelling goes down, some reflexes may slowly recover.Tests that may be ordered include:CT scan or MRI of the spine, Myelogram (an x-ray of the spine after\u00a0injecting dye), Spine x-raysElectromyography (EMG), Nerve conduction studies. ", "Treatment": "A spinal cord\u00a0injury needs to be treated right away. The time between the injury and treatment can affect the outcome.Medicines called corticosteroids are sometimes\u00a0used to reduce swelling that may damage the spinal cord. If spinal cord\u00a0pressure is caused by a\u00a0growth that can be removed or reduced before\u00a0the spinal nerves are completely destroyed, paralysis may improve. Surgery may be needed to:Realign the spinal bones (vertebrae), Remove fluid or tissue that presses on the spinal cord (decompression laminectomy), Remove bone fragments, disk fragments, or foreign objects, Fuse broken spinal bones or place spinal braces . Bedrest may be needed to allow the bones of the spine to heal.Spinal traction may be recommended. This can help keep the spine from moving. The skull may be held in place with tongs. These are\u00a0metal braces placed in the skull and attached to weights or to a harness on the body (halo vest). You may need to wear the spine braces for many months.The health care team will also tell you what to do for muscle spasms and bowel and bladder dysfunction.\u00a0They will also teach you how to care for your skin and protect it from pressure sores.You will probably need\u00a0physical therapy, occupational therapy, and other rehabilitation after the injury has healed. Rehabilitation will help you cope with the\u00a0disability from your spinal cord injury.", "Causes": "The spinal cord contains the nerves that carry messages between your brain and body. The cord passes through your neck and back.Spinal cord trauma can be caused by injuries to the spine, such as: Assault, Falls, Gunshot wounds, Industrial accidents, Motor vehicle accidents, Sports injuries . A minor injury can damage the spinal cord if the spine is weakened, such as from rheumatoid arthritis or osteoporosis. Injury can also occur if the spinal canal protecting the spinal cord has become too narrow (spinal stenosis) due to the normal aging process.Direct injury, such as bruises, can occur to the spinal cord if the bones or disks have been weakened. Fragments of bone (such as from broken vertebrae, which are the spine bones) or fragments of metal (such as from a traffic accident or gunshot) can damage the spinal cord.Direct damage can occur if the spinal cord is pulled, pressed sideways, or compressed. This may occur if the head, neck, or back\u00a0is twisted abnormally during an accident or intense chiropractic manipulation.Bleeding, fluid buildup, and swelling can occur inside or outside the spinal cord (but within the spinal canal). The\u00a0buildup of blood or fluid can\u00a0press on\u00a0the spinal cord and damage it.Most spinal cord trauma happens to young, healthy individuals. Men ages 15\u00a0to 35 are most\u00a0often affected. The death rate tends to be higher in young children with spinal injuries.Risk factors include: Participating in risky physical activities, Riding in high-speed vehicles\u00a0, Diving into shallow water . Older people with weakened\u00a0bones (from osteoporosis) or persons with other medical problems (such as stroke) that make them more likely to fall\u00a0may also have spinal cord injury.", "Prevention": "Proper safety practices during work and\u00a0play can prevent many spinal cord injuries. Use proper protective equipment\u00a0for any activity in which\u00a0an injury is possible.Diving into shallow water is a major cause of spinal cord trauma. Check water depth before diving, and look for rocks or other possible objects in the way., Football and sledding\u00a0can often involve sharp blows or abnormal twisting and bending of the back or neck, which can\u00a0cause spinal cord injury. Before sledding down a hill, check the area for obstacles. Use\u00a0the right\u00a0techniques and equipment when playing football or other contact sports., Defensive driving and wearing a seat belt reduces the risk of serious injury if there is a car accident. . "}, "Scrotal masses": {"description": "A scrotal mass is a lump or bulge that can be felt in the scrotum, the sac that contains the testicles.", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the cause of the scrotal mass.", "Symptoms": ["Enlarged scrotum", "Painless or painful testicle lump"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the health care provider may feel a growth in the scrotum. This growth may:Feel tender, Be smooth, twisted, or irregular, Feel liquid, firm, or solid, Be only on one side of the body . The inguinal lymph nodes in the groin on the same side as the growth may be enlarged or tender.The following tests may be done:Biopsy, Ultrasound of the scrotum. ", "Treatment": "A health care provider should evaluate all scrotal masses. However, many types of masses are harmless and do not need to be treated unless you are having symptoms.In some cases, the condition may improve with self-care, antibiotics, or pain relievers. You need to get medical attention right away for a growth in the scrotum that is painful.If the scrotal mass is part of the testicle, it has a higher risk of being cancerous. Surgery may be needed to remove the testicle if this is the case. A jock strap scrotal support may help relieve the pain or discomfort from the scrotal mass. A hematocele, hydrocele, or spermatocele may sometimes need surgery to remove the collection of blood, fluid, or dead cells.", "Causes": "A scrotal mass can be noncancerous (benign) or cancerous (malignant).Benign scrotal masses include:Hematocele -- blood collection in the scrotum, Hydrocele -- fluid collection in the scrotum, Spermatocele -- a cyst-like growth in the scrotum that contains fluid and dead sperm cells, Varicocele -- a varicose vein along the spermatic cord. Scrotal masses can be caused by:Abnormal bulge in the groin (inguinal hernia), Diseases such as epididymitis, Injury to the scrotum, Testicular torsion, Tumors. ", "Prevention": "You can prevent scrotal masses caused by sexually transmitted diseases by practicing safe sex.To prevent scrotal masses caused by injury, wear an athletic cup during exercise."}, "Sulfuric acid poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty due to throat swelling", "Burns in the mouth and throat", "Drooling", "Fever", "Rapid development of low blood pressure", "Severe pain in the mouth and throat", "Speech problems", "Vomiting, with blood", "Vision loss", "Bluish skin, lips, and fingernails", "Breathing difficulty", "Body weakness", "Chest pain (tightness)", "Choking", "Coughing", "Coughing up blood", "Dizziness", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid pulse", "Shortness of breath"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local a poison control center\u00a0at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Swallowing chalk": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Constipation", "Cough", "Diarrhea ", "Nausea and vomiting", "Shortness of breath "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Swallowing difficulty": {"Symptoms": ["Cough or wheezing that becomes worse", "Coughing up food that has not been digested", "Heartburn", "Nausea", "Sour taste in the mouth "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will order tests to look for: Something that is blocking or narrowing the esophagus, Problems with the muscles, Changes in the lining of the esophagus . A test called upper endoscopy (EGD) is often done.An endoscope is a flexible tube with a light on the end. It is inserted through the mouth and down through the esophagus to the stomach., You will be given a sedative and feel no pain. . Other tests may include:Barium swallow and other swallowing tests, Chest x-ray, Esophageal pH monitoring (measures acid in the esophagus), Esophageal manometry (measures pressure in the esophagus), Neck x-ray . You may also need to have blood tests to look for disorders that could cause swallowing problems.", "description": "Difficulty with swallowing is the feeling that food or liquid is stuck in the throat or at any point before the food enters the stomach. This problem is also called dysphagia.", "Causes": "The process of swallowing involves several steps. These include Chewing food, Moving it into the back of the mouth, Moving it down the esophagus (the tube that moves food to the stomach) . There are many nerves that help the muscles of the mouth, throat, and esophagus work together. Much of swallowing occurs without you being aware of what you are doing.A brain or nerve disorder can alter the workings of the muscles of the mouth and throat.Swallowing is a complex act. Many nerves work in a fine balance to control how the muscles of the mouth, throat, and esophagus work together. Much of swallowing occurs without you being aware of what you are doing.A brain or nerve disorder can alter this fine balance in the muscles of the mouth and throat.Damage to the brain may be caused by multiple sclerosis, Parkinson's disease, or stroke, Nerve damage may be due to spinal cord injuries, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS or Lou Gehrig's disease), or myasthenia gravis. Stress or anxiety may cause some people to feel tightness in the throat, or feel as if something is stuck in the throat. This is called globus hystericus.Problems that involve the esophagus often cause swallowing problems. These may include:An abnormal ring of tissue that forms where the esophagus and stomach meet (called Schatzki's ring), Abnormal spasms of the esophagus muscles, Cancer of the esophagus, Failure of the muscle ring at the bottom of the esophagus to relax (Achalasia), Scarring that narrows the esophagus. This may be due to radiation, chemicals, medicines, chronic swelling, ulcers, or infection., Something stuck in the esophagus, such as a piece of food., Scleroderma, a disorder in which the immune system mistakenly attacks the esophagus, Tumors in the chest that press on the esophagus . ", "Treatment": "The treatment for your swallowing problem depends on the cause. It is important to learn how to eat and drink safely. Incorrect swallowing may lead to choking or breathing food or liquid into your main airway. This can lead to pneumonia.To manage swallowing problems at home:Your health care provider may suggest changes to your diet. You may also get a special liquid diet to help you stay healthy., You may need to learn new chewing and swallowing techniques. . Medicines that may be used depend on the cause, and may include:Certain medicines that relax the muscles in the esophagus. These include nitrates, a type of medicine used to treat blood pressure, and dicyclomine, Injection of botulinum toxin, Medicines to treat heartburn and gastroesophageal reflux (GERD), Medicines to treat an anxiety disorder, if present . Procedures and surgeries that may be used include:Upper endoscopy. The health care provider can dilate or widen a narrowed area of your esophagus using this procedure. For some people, this needs to be done again, and sometimes more than once., Radiation or surgery. These treatments may be used if cancer is causing the swallowing problem. Achalasia or spasms of the esophagus may also respond to surgery. . If your symptoms are severe and you are unable to eat and drink enough, or you have problems choking or pneumonia, you may need a feeding tube. "}, "Sprains": {"Symptoms": ["Joint pain or muscle pain", "Swelling", "Joint stiffness", "Discoloration of the skin, especially bruising"], "Causes": "Sprains are caused when a joint is forced to move into an unnatural position. For example, \"twisting\" one's ankle causes a sprain to the ligaments around the ankle.", "description": "A sprain is an injury to the ligaments around a joint. Ligaments are strong, flexible fibers that hold bones together. When a ligament is stretched too far or tears, the joint will become painful and swell.", "Prevention": "The following steps may lower your risk of a sprain: \r\nWear protective footwear during activities that place stress on your ankle and other joints., Make sure that shoes fit your feet properly., Avoid high-heeled shoes., Always warm-up and stretch\u00a0before doing\u00a0exercise and sports., Avoid sports and activities for which you have not trained. . "}, "Serum sickness": {"description": "Serum sickness is a reaction that is similar to an allergy. The immune system reacts to medications that contain proteins used to treat immune conditions. Or it can react to antiserum, the liquid part of blood that contains antibodies given to a person to help protect them against germs or poisonous substances.", "Possible Complications": "If you use the drug or antiserum that caused serum sickness again in the future, your risk of having another similar reaction is high.Complications include:Anaphylactic shock, an immediate, life-threatening reaction, Inflammation of the blood vessels, Swelling of the face, arms, and legs (angioedema). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "General ill feeling", "Hives", "Itching", "Joint pain", "Rash", "Swollen lymph nodes "], "Exams and Tests": "The lymph nodes may be enlarged and tender to the touch. The urine may contain blood or protein. Blood tests may show immune complexes or signs of blood vessel inflammation.", "Treatment": "Corticosteroid creams or ointments or other soothing skin medications may relieve discomfort from itching and a rash.Antihistamines may shorten the length of the illness and help ease a rash and itching.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen or naproxen may relieve joint pain. However, NSAIDs should be used carefully because of the risk for kidney damage. Corticosteroids taken by mouth (such as prednisone) may be prescribed for severe cases.The medicine that caused the problem should be stopped. Avoid using that medication\u00a0or antiserum in the future.", "Causes": "Plasma is the clear fluid portion of blood. It does not contain blood cells. But it does contain many proteins, including antibodies, which are formed as part of the immune response to protect against infection.Antiserum is produced from the plasma of a person or animal that has immunity against an infection or poisonous substance. Antiserum may be used to protect a person who has been exposed to a germ he or she has not been vaccinated against. For example, you may receive a certain type of antiserum injection if you have been exposed to tetanus or rabies. This is called passive immunization. It gives you immediate, but temporary, protection while your body develops an active immune response against the toxin or germ.During serum sickness, the immune system falsely identifies a protein in antiserum as a potentially harmful substance (antigen). The result is an immune system response that attacks the antiserum. Immune system elements and the antiserum combine to form immune complexes, which cause the inflammation and other symptoms of serum sickness.Certain medications (such as penicillin, cefaclor, and sulfa) can cause a similar reaction. Unlike other drug allergies, which occur very soon after receiving the medication, serum sickness develops 7 to 21 days after the first exposure to a medication.Injected proteins such as antithymocyte globulin (used to treat organ transplant rejection) and rituximab (used to treat immune disorders and cancers) can cause serum sickness reactions.Blood products may also cause serum sickness.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent the development of serum sickness. People who have experienced serum sickness, anaphylactic shock, or drug allergy should avoid future use of the antiserum or drug."}, "Stereotypic movement disorder": {"description": "Stereotypic movement disorder is a condition in which a person makes repetitive, purposeless movements (such as hand waving, body rocking, or head banging). The movements interfere with normal activity or have the potential to cause bodily harm.", "Possible Complications": "Severe stereotypic movements may interfere with normal social functioning.", "Symptoms": ["Biting self", "Hand shaking or waving", "Head banging", "Hitting own body", "Mouthing of objects", "Nail biting", "Rocking "], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor can usually diagnose this condition with a physical exam. Tests should be done to rule out other potential causes of such behaviors, including: Autism, Chorea disorders, Obsessive compulsive disorder, Tourette syndrome\u00a0or other tic disorder . ", "Treatment": "Treatment should focus on the cause, specific symptoms, and patient's age.The environment should be changed so that it is safer for patients who cause injury to themselves.Behavioral techniques and psychotherapy may be helpful.Medicines\u00a0may also help reduce symptoms related to this condition. Antidepressants have been used in some cases.", "Causes": "Stereotypic movement disorder is more common among boys than girls. The repetitive movements often increase with stress, frustration, and boredom.The cause of this disorder, when it does not occur with\u00a0other conditions, is unknown.Stimulant drugs such as cocaine and amphetamines can\u00a0cause a severe, short period of stereotypic movement behavior. The behavior may include repetitive and purposeless picking, hand wringing, head tics, or lip-biting. Long-term stimulant use\u00a0may lead to longer periods of the behavior.Head injuries may also cause stereotypic movements."}, "Sturge-Weber syndrome": {"description": "Sturge-Weber syndrome is a rare disorder that is present at birth. A child with this condition will have a port-wine stain birthmark (usually on the face) and may have nervous system problems.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal blood vessel growth in the skull, Continued growth of the port-wine stain, Developmental delays, Emotional and behavioral problems, Glaucoma, which may lead to blindness, Paralysis, Seizures. ", "Symptoms": ["Port-wine stain (more common on the face than the body)", "Seizures", "Paralysis or weakness on one side", "Learning disabilities"], "Exams and Tests": "Glaucoma may be one sign of the condition.Tests may include:CT scan, MRI scan, X-rays. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is based on the patient's signs and symptoms, and may include:Anticonvulsant medicines for seizures, Eye drops or surgery to treat glaucoma, Laser therapy for port-wine stains, Physical therapy for paralysis or weakness, Possible brain surgery to prevent seizures. ", "Causes": "The cause of Sturge-Weber is unknown. It is not thought to be passed down (inherited) through families.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention."}, "Schizophrenia - paranoid type": {"Symptoms": ["Becoming socially isolated", "Feeling tense, suspicious, guarded, and reserved", "Having an exaggerated sense of self importance (grandiose delusions)", "Having unrealistic feelings of jealousy (delusional jealousy)", "\"Hearing things\" (auditory hallucinations)"], "description": "Paranoid type schizophrenia is a mental illness that involves false beliefs of being persecuted or plotted against."}, "Scorpion fish sting": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing ", "Collapse ", "Bleeding", "Severe pain at the site of the sting", "Whitened color of the area around the site of the sting", "Color of the area changes as the amount of oxygen supplying the area decreases ", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting ", "Delirium", "Fainting", "Fever (from infection)", "Headache", "Muscle twitching", "Seizures", "Paralysis "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "If scuba diving or snorkeling, learn to identify potentially poisonous or otherwise dangerous sea creatures and their habits."}, "Serotonin syndrome": {"description": "Serotonin syndrome is a potentially life threatening drug reaction that causes the body to have too much serotonin, a chemical produced by nerve cells.", "Possible Complications": "Uncontrolled muscle spasms can cause severe muscle breakdown. The products produced when the muscles break down are released into your blood and eventually go through the kidneys. This can cause severe kidney damage if not recognized and treated appropriately. With appropriate treatment, the condition is reversible.", "Symptoms": ["Agitation or restlessness", "Diarrhea", "Fast heartbeat and high blood pressure", "Hallucinations", "Increased body temperature", "Loss of coordination", "Nausea", "Overactive reflexes", "Rapid changes in blood pressure", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "The diagnosis is usually made by asking questions about your medical history, including the types of drugs you take.To be diagnosed with serotonin syndrome, you must have been taking a drug that changes the body's serotonin levels (serotonergic drug) and have at least three of the following signs or symptoms:Agitation, Diarrhea, Heavy sweating not due to activity, Fever, Mental status changes such as confusion or hypomania, Muscle spasms (myoclonus), Overactive reflexes (hyperreflexia), Shivering, Tremor, Uncoordinated movements (ataxia) . Serotonin syndrome is not diagnosed until all other possible causes have been ruled out, including infections, intoxication, metabolic and hormone problems, and drug withdrawal. Some symptoms of serotonin syndrome can mimic those due to an overdose of cocaine, lithium, or an MAOI.If you have just start taking or increased the dosage of a tranquilizer (neuroleptic drug), other conditions such as neuroleptic malignant syndrome will be considered.Tests may include:Blood cultures (to check for infection), Complete blood count (CBC), CT scan of the brain, Drug (toxicology) and alcohol screen, Electrolyte levels, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Kidney and liver function tests, Thyroid function tests. ", "Treatment": "People with serotonin syndrome should stay in the hospital for at least 24 hours for close observation.Treatment may include:Benzodiazepines such as diazepam (Valium) or lorazepam (Ativan) to decrease agitation, seizure-like movements, and muscle stiffness, Cyproheptadine (Periactin), a drug that blocks serotonin production, Intravenous (through the vein) fluids, Withdrawal of medicines that caused the syndrome . In life-threatening cases, medicines that keep your muscles still (paralyze them) and a temporary breathing tube and breathing machine will be needed to prevent further muscle damage.", "Causes": "Serotonin syndrome most often occurs when two drugs that affect the body's level of serotonin are taken together at the same time. The drugs cause too much serotonin to be released or to remain in the brain area.For example, you can develop this syndrome if you take migraine medicines called triptans together with antidepressants called selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) and selective serotonin/norepinephrine reuptake inhibitors (SSNRIs). Popular SSRIs include citalopram (Celexa), sertraline (Zoloft), fluoxetine (Prozac), paroxetine (Paxil), and escitalopram (Lexapro). SNRIs include duloxetine (Cymbalta) and venlafaxine (Effexor). Brand names of triptans include sumatriptan (Imitrex), zolmitriptan (Zomig), frovatriptan (Frova), rizatriptan (Maxalt), almotriptan (Axert), naratriptan (Amerge), and eletriptan (Relpax).The FDA recently asked the manufacturers of these types of drugs to include warning labels on their products that tell you about the potential risk of serotonin syndrome. Talk to your doctor before stopping any medication.Serotonin syndrome is more likely to occur when you first start or increase the medicine.Older antidepressants called monoamine oxidase inhibitors (MAOIs) can also cause serotonin syndrome with the medicines described above, as well as meperidine (Demerol, a painkiller) or dextromethorphan (cough medicine).Drugs of abuse, such as ecstasy and LSD have also been associated with serotonin syndrome.", "Prevention": "Always tell all of your providers what medicines you take. People who take triptans with SSRIs or SNRIs should be closely followed, especially right after starting a medicine or increasing its dosage."}, "Sickle cell anemia": {"Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Paleness", "Rapid heart rate", "Shortness of breath", "Yellowing of the eyes and skin (jaundice) ", "Painful and prolonged erection (priapism)", "Poor eyesight or blindness", "Problems with thinking or confusion caused by small strokes", "Ulcers on the lower legs (in adolescents and adults) ", "Bone infection (osteomyelitis)", "Gallbladder infection (cholecystitis)", "Lung infection (pneumonia)", "Urinary tract infection ", "Delayed growth and puberty", "Painful joints caused by arthritis", "Heart failure due to too much iron (from blood transfusions)"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests commonly done diagnose and monitor patients with sickle cell anemia include:Bilirubin, Blood oxygen saturation, Complete blood count (CBC), Hemoglobin electrophoresis, Serum creatinine, Serum potassium, Sickle cell test. ", "description": "Sickle cell anemia is a disease passed down through families. The red blood cells that are normally shaped like a disc take on a sickle or crescent shape. Red blood cells carry oxygen throughout the body.", "Causes": "Sickle cell anemia is caused by an abnormal type of hemoglobin called hemoglobin S. Hemoglobin is a protein inside red blood cells that carries oxygen. Hemoglobin S changes the red blood cells. The red blood cells become fragile and shaped like crescents or sickles., The abnormal cells deliver less oxygen to the body's tissues., They can also easily get stuck in small blood vessels and break into pieces. This can interrupt healthy blood flow and cut down even more on the amount of oxygen flowing to body tissues. . Sickle cell anemia is inherited from both parents. If you get the\u00a0sickle cell\u00a0gene from only one parent, you will have sickle cell trait. People with sickle cell trait do not have the symptoms of sickle cell anemia.Sickle cell disease is much more common in people of African and Mediterranean descent. It is also seen in people from South and Central America, the Caribbean, and the Middle East.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to manage and control symptoms, and to limit the number of crises. People with sickle cell disease need ongoing treatment, even when not having a crisis.People with this condition should take folic acid supplements. Folic acid helps make new\u00a0red blood cells.Treatment for a sickle cell crisis includes:Blood transfusions (may also be given regularly to prevent stroke), Pain medicines, Plenty of fluids . Other treatments for sickle cell anemia may include:Hydroxyurea (Hydrea), which helps reduce the number of pain episodes (including chest pain and breathing problems) in some people, Antibiotics, which help prevent bacterial infections that are common in children with sickle cell disease, Medicines that reduce the amount of iron in the body.. Treatments that may be needed to manage complications of sickle cell anemia include:\r\n  Dialysis or kidney transplant for kidney disease\r\n  , \r\n  Counseling for\u00a0psychological complications\r\n  , Gallbladder removal in\u00a0people with gallstone disease\r\n  , Hip replacement for avascular necrosis of the hip\r\n  , \r\n  Surgery for eye problems\r\n  , \r\n  Treatment for overuse or abuse of narcotic pain medicines\r\n  , \r\n  Wound care for leg ulcers\r\n  . Bone marrow or stem cell transplants can cure sickle cell anemia, but this treatment is not an option for most people. Sickle cell anemia patients often cannot find well-matched stem cell donors.People with sickle cell disease should have the following vaccinations to lower the risk of infection:Haemophilus influenzae vaccine (Hib), Pneumococcal conjugate vaccine (PCV), Pneumococcal polysaccharide vaccine (PPV) . "}, "Syphilitic aseptic meningitis": {"description": "Syphilitic aseptic meningitis is a complication of untreated syphilis. It\u00a0involves inflammation of the tissues covering the brain and spinal cord. ", "Possible Complications": "Inability to care for self, Inability to communicate or interact, Injury caused during seizures, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in vision, blurred vision, decreased vision", "Fever", "Headache", "Mental status changes, including confusion, decreased attention span, and irritability", "Nausea and vomiting", "Neck pain", "Seizures", "Sensitivity to light (photophobia)", "Sensitivity to loud noises", "Sleepiness, lethargy, hard to wake up", "Stiff neck", "Stiffness of shoulders, other muscle aches "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. This may show problems with your nerves, including\u00a0nerves that control eye movement.Tests may include:Cerebral angiography, Electroencephalogram (EEG), Head CT scan, Spinal tap to remove a sample of cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) for examination, VDRL blood test or RPR blood test (to screen for a syphilis infection)\u00a0 . If screening tests show a syphilis infection, more tests are done to confirm the diagnosis. Tests include:FTA-ABS, MHA-TP, TP-PA, TP-EIA . ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to cure the infection and stop symptoms from getting worse. Treating the infection helps prevent new nerve damage and may reduce symptoms. Treatment does not reverse existing damage.You will receive:Penicillin or other antibiotics (such as tetracycline or erythromycin) for a long time to make sure the infection goes away, Spinal tap to remove a sample of spinal fluid for testing to see if the antibiotic worked, Medicines for seizures . Some people may need help eating, dressing, and caring for themselves. Confusion and other mental changes may either improve or continue long-term after antibiotic treatment.", "Causes": "Syphilis is a sexually transmitted disease caused by the spirochete bacteria\u00a0Treponema pallidum. Syphilis has three main stages:Primary syphilis, Secondary syphilis, Tertiary syphilis. Syphilitic aseptic meningitis is a form of meningovascular neurosyphilis. This condition is a life-threatening complication of syphilis infection.Syphilitic aseptic meningitis is similar to meningitis caused by other conditions.Risks for syphilitic aseptic meningitis include\u00a0a past\u00a0infection with syphilis or other sexually transmitted illnesses such as gonorrhea. Syphilis infections are mainly spread through sex with an infected person. Sometimes they may be passed by nonsexual contact.", "Prevention": "Proper treatment and follow-up of primary syphilis infections will reduce your risk of developing this type of meningitis.If you are sexually active, practice safe sex and always use condoms.All pregnant women should be screened for syphilis."}, "Shock": {"Symptoms": ["Anxiety or agitation/restlessness", "Bluish lips and fingernails", "Chest pain", "Confusion", "Dizziness, lightheadedness, or faintness", "Pale, cool, clammy skin", "Low or no urine output", "Profuse sweating, moist skin", "Rapid but weak pulse", "Shallow breathing", "Unconsciousness"], "Causes": "Shock can be caused by any condition that reduces blood flow, including:Heart problems (such as heart attack or heart failure), Low blood volume (as with heavy bleeding or dehydration), Changes in blood vessels (as with infection or severe allergic reactions), Certain medications that significantly reduce heart function or blood pressure . Shock is often associated with heavy external or internal bleeding from a serious injury. Spinal injuries can also cause shock.Toxic shock syndrome is an example of a type of shock from an infection.", "description": "Shock is a life-threatening condition that occurs when the body is not getting enough blood flow. Lack of blood flow means that the cells and organs do not get enough oxygen and nutrients to function properly. Multiple organs can suffer damage as a result. Shock requires immediate medical treatment and can get worse very rapidly. As many 1 in 5 people who suffer shock will die from it. ", "Prevention": "Learn ways to prevent heart disease, falls, injuries, dehydration, and other causes of shock. If you have a known allergy (for example, to insect bites or stings), carry an epinephrine pen. Your doctor will teach you how and when to use it."}, "Sulindac overdose": {"Symptoms": ["LungsSlow, labored breathing, Slow or rapid breathing, Wheezing. ", "Slow, labored breathing", "Slow or rapid breathing", "Wheezing", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nRinging in the ears, Blurred vision, Sensitivity to light. ", "Ringing in the ears", "Blurred vision", "Sensitivity to light", "Skin \r\n\r\nRash. ", "Rash", "Stomach and intestines \r\n\r\nDiarrhea, Nausea, Stomach or abdominal pain, Vomiting. ", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach or abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Heart and blood \r\n\r\nLow blood pressure. ", "Low blood pressure", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Coma, Confusion, Convulsions, Dizziness, Drowsiness, Headache (severe), Incoherence (not understandable), Movement disorder, Unsteadiness. ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Headache (severe)", "Incoherence (not understandable)", "Movement disorder", "Unsteadiness", "Other \r\n\r\nChills. ", "Chills"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 to find a local poison control center near you. "}, "Scoliosis": {"description": "Scoliosis is an abnormal curving of the spine. Your spine is your backbone. It runs straight down your back. Everyone\u2019s spine naturally curves a bit. But people with scoliosis have a spine that curves too much. The spine might look like the letter C or S.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of scoliosis can include:Breathing problems (in severe scoliosis), Low back pain, Lower self-esteem, Persistent pain if there is wear and tear of the spine bones, Spinal infection after surgery, Spine or nerve damage from an uncorrected curve or spinal surgery. ", "Symptoms": ["Backache or low-back pain", "Tired feeling in the spine after sitting or standing for a long time", "Uneven hips or shoulders (one shoulder may be higher than the other)", "Spine curves more to one side"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. You will be asked to bend forward. This makes your spine easier to see. It may be hard to see changes in the early stages of scoliosis.\u00a0The exam may show:One shoulder is higher than the other, The pelvis is tilted. X-rays of the spine are done. X-rays are important because the actual curving of the spine may be worse than what your doctor can see during an exam.Other tests may include:Spinal curve measurement (scoliometer screening), MRI of the spine. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on many things:The cause of scoliosis, Where the curve is in your spine, How big the curve is, If your body is still growing. Most people with idiopathic scoliosis do not need treatment. But you should still be checked by a doctor about every 6 months.If you are still growing, your doctor might recommend a back brace. A back brace prevents further curving. There are many different types of braces. What kind you get depends on the size and location of your curve. Your health care provider will pick the best one for you and show you how to use it. Back braces can be adjusted as you grow.Back braces work best in people over age 10. Braces do not work for those with congenital or neuromuscular scoliosis.\u00a0Sometimes, surgery is needed:Scoliosis surgery involves correcting the curve as much as possible., The spine bones are held in place with one or two metal rods.\u00a0The rods\u00a0are held down with hooks and screws until the bone heals together., Surgery may be done with a cut through the back, belly area, or beneath the ribs.. After surgery, you may need to wear a brace for a while to keep the spine still.You may need surgery if the spine curve is severe or getting worse very quickly. The surgeon may want to wait until all your bones stop growing, but this is not always possible.Scoliosis treatment may also include:Emotional support. Some children, especially teens, may be self-conscious when using a back brace., Physical therapy and other specialists to help explain the treatments and make sure the brace fits correctly.. ", "Causes": "Most of the time, the cause of scoliosis is unknown. This is called idiopathic scoliosis. It is the most common type. It is grouped by age.In children age 3 and younger, it is called infantile scoliosis., In\u00a0children age 4\u00a0through 10, it is called juvenile scoliosis., In\u00a0children age 11\u00a0through 18, it is called adolescent scoliosis.. Scoliosis most often affects girls. Some people are more likely to have curving of the spine. Curving generally gets worse during a growth spurt.Other types of scoliosis are:Congenital scoliosis: This type of scoliosis is present at birth. It occurs when the baby\u2019s ribs or spine bones do not form properly., Neuromuscular scoliosis: This type is caused by a nervous system problem that affects\u00a0the muscles. Problems can include cerebral palsy, muscular dystrophy, spina bifida, and polio.. ", "Prevention": "Routine scoliosis screening is now done in middle schools.Such screening has helped detect early scoliosis in many children."}, "Spasmus nutans": {"description": "See also: Nystagmus", "Possible Complications": "There are usually no complications.", "Symptoms": ["Small, quick, side-to-side eye movements (nystagmus) - both eyes are involved, but each eye may move differently", "Head nodding", "Head tilting"], "Exams and Tests": "A neurologic examination confirms the presence of the symptoms.Tests may include:CT scan of the head, MRI scan of the head. ", "Treatment": "The benign form of spasmus nutans requires no treatment. If the symptoms are caused by another condition, that condition must be treated appropriately.", "Causes": "Most cases of spasmus nutans begin between age 4 months and 1 year. It usually goes away by itself in several months to years.The cause is unknown, although it may be associated with other medical conditions. An association with iron or vitamin\u00a0D deficiency has been suggested. Rarely, symptoms similar to spasmus nutans may be due to certain types of brain tumors or other serious conditions."}, "Severe acute respiratory syndrome (SARS)": {"description": "SARS appears to be here to stay. It has changed the way that the world responds to infectious diseases during a time of widespread international travel. The 2003 outbreak had an estimated 8,000 cases and 750 deaths. Deaths occurred mainly in older patients. ", "Possible Complications": "Respiratory failure\r\n, Liver failure\r\n, Heart failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough", "Difficulty breathing", "Fever greater than 100.4 degrees F (38.0 degrees C)", "Other breathing symptoms", "Chills and shaking", "Cough -- usually starts 2-3 days after other symptoms", "Fever", "Headache", "Muscle aches", "Cough that produces phlegm (sputum)", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Nausea and vomiting", "Runny nose", "Sore throat"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may hear abnormal lung sounds while listening to your chest with a stethoscope. In most people with SARS, changes on a chest x-ray or chest CT show pneumonia, which is typical with SARS.Tests used to diagnose SARS might include:Arterial blood tests, Blood clotting tests, Blood chemistry tests, Chest x-ray or chest CT scan, Complete blood count (CBC). Tests used to quickly identify the virus that causes SARS include:Antibody tests for SARS, Direct isolation of the SARS virus, Rapid polymerase chain reaction (PCR) test for SARS virus. All current tests have some limitations. They may not be able to easily identify a SARS case during the first week of the illness, when it is most important. ", "Treatment": "People who are thought to have SARS should be checked right away by a health care provider. If they are suspected of having SARS, they should be kept isolated in the hospital.Treatment may include:Antibiotics to treat bacteria that cause pneumonia, Antiviral medications (although how well they work for SARS is unknown), High doses of steroids to reduce swelling in the lungs, Oxygen, breathing support (mechanical ventilation), or chest therapy. In some serious cases, the liquid part of blood from people who have already recovered from SARS has been given as a treatment.There is no strong evidence that these treatments work well. There is evidence that the antiviral medication, ribavirin, does not work.", "Causes": "SARS is caused by a member of the coronavirus family of viruses (the same family that can cause the common cold). It is believed the 2003 epidemic started when the virus spread from small mammals in China.When someone with SARS coughs or sneezes, infected droplets spray into the air. You can catch the SARS virus if you breathe in or touch these particles. The SARS virus may live on hands, tissues, and other surfaces for up to 6 hours in these droplets and up to 3 hours after the droplets have dried.While the spread of droplets through close contact caused most of the early SARS cases, SARS might also spread by hands and other objects the droplets has touched. Airborne transmission is a real possibility in some cases. Live virus has even been found in the stool of people with SARS, where it has been shown to live for up to 4 days. The virus may be able to live for months or years when the temperature is below freezing.With other coronaviruses, becoming infected and then getting sick again (re-infection) is common. This may also be the case with SARS.Symptoms usually occur about 2 to 10 days after coming in contact with the virus. There have been some cases where the illness started sooner or later after first contact. People with active symptoms of illness are contagious, but it is not known for how long a person may be contagious before or after symptoms appear.", "Prevention": "Reducing your contact with people who have SARS lowers your risk for the disease. Avoid travel to places where there is an uncontrolled SARS outbreak. When possible, avoid direct contact with persons who have SARS until at least 10 days after their fever and other symptoms are gone.Hand hygiene is the most important part of SARS prevention. Wash your hands or clean them with an alcohol-based instant hand sanitizer., Cover your mouth and nose when you sneeze or cough. Droplets that are released when a person sneezes or coughs are infectious., Do not share food, drink, or utensils., Clean commonly touched surfaces with an EPA-approved disinfectant.. In some situations, masks and goggles may be useful for preventing the spread of the disease. You may use gloves when handling any items that may have touched infected droplets."}, "Syphilitic myelopathy": {"description": "Syphilitic myelopathy is a complication of untreated syphilis that involves muscle weakness and abnormal sensations.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of late-stage syphilis infection may include: Damage to bones, skin, and other organs, Disease of the heart valves, Inflammation of the aorta (aortitis) with aortic aneurysm. Other complications include:Complications of neurosyphilis, including dementia, stroke, and eye disease, Difficulty with walking and balance, Paralysis . ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal sensations (paresthesia), often called \"lightning pains\"", "Difficulty walking", "Loss of coordination", "Loss of reflexes", "Muscle weakness", "Wide-based gait (the person walks with the legs far apart)", "Mental illness", "Stroke", "Vision changes"], "Exams and Tests": "Physical examination may show:Damage to the spinal cord (myelopathy), Pupils that react abnormally to light, Reduced or absent reflexes due to nerve damage. Tests may include the following:Cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) examination, Head CT, spine CT, or MRI scans of the brain and spinal cord to rule out other diseases, Serum VDRL or serum RPR (used as a screening test for syphilis infection) . If the serum VDRL or serum RPR test is positive, one of the following tests will be needed to confirm the diagnosis: FTA-ABS, MHA-TP, TP-EIA, TP-PA . ", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to cure the infection and slow the disorder from getting worse. Treating the infection helps prevent new nerve damage and may reduce symptoms. Treatment does not reverse existing nerve damage.For neurosyphilis, aqueous penicillin G (by injection) is the drug of choice. Some patients (for example, pregnant women) with penicillin allergies may have to be desensitized to penicillin so that they can be safely treated with it.Symptoms of existing\u00a0nervous system\u00a0damage need to be treated. People who are unable to eat, dress themselves, or take care of themselves may need help. Rehabilitation, physical therapy, and occupational therapy may help people who have muscle weakness.You may need analgesics to control pain. These may include over-the-counter medications such as aspirin or acetaminophen for mild pain, or narcotics for more severe pain. Anti-epilepsy drugs such as carbamazepine may help treat lightning pains.", "Causes": "Syphilitic myelopathy is a form of neurosyphilis, which is a complication of late or tertiary syphilis infection. Syphilis is a sexually transmitted infection. A\u00a0condition called tabes dorsalis includes syphilitic myelopathy and other symptoms of nerve damage.The infection damages the spinal cord and peripheral nervous tissue.Syphilitic myelopathy is now very rare because syphilis is usually treated early in the disease. Blood tests can identify the disease in its silent (latent) form. People who donate blood and pregnant women are tested for syphilis.", "Prevention": "Proper treatment and follow-up of primary syphilis infections reduces the risk of developing syphilitic myelopathy.If you are sexually active, practice safe sex and always use a condom.All pregnant women should be screened for syphilis."}, "Starch poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Intestinal blockage", "Stomach area pain ", "Significantly decreased urine output (or no urine output) ", "Jaundice (eyes become yellow) ", "Diarrhea", "Vomiting ", "Convulsions", "Collapse", "Fever", "Low blood pressure", "Blisters", "Bluish skin, lips, or fingernails", "Flaking skin", "Yellow skin ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Twitching of the arms, hands, legs, or feet", "Twitching of the facial muscles"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Shaving cream poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision ", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat ", "Burns to the eye ", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody) or vomiting", "Stomach pain", "Rash "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Shingles": {"description": "Shingles (herpes zoster) is a painful, blistering skin rash. It is caused by the varicella-zoster virus. This is\u00a0the virus that also causes chickenpox.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Another attack of shingles, Bacterial skin infections, Blindness (if shingles occurs in the eye), Deafness, Infection, including encephalitis of sepsis (blood infection) in persons with a weakened immune system, Ramsay Hunt syndrome if shingles affects the nerves of the face or ear . ", "Symptoms": ["The blisters break, forming small\u00a0sores that begin to dry and form crusts. The crusts fall off in 2 to 3 weeks. Scarring is rare.", "The rash usually involves a narrow area from the spine around to the front of the abdomen or chest.", "The rash may involve the\u00a0face, eyes, mouth, and ears.", "Fever and chills", "General ill feeling", "Headache", "Joint pain", "Swollen glands (lymph nodes)", "Difficulty moving some of the muscles in the face", "Drooping eyelid (ptosis)", "Hearing loss", "Loss of eye motion", "Taste problems", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can make the diagnosis by looking at your skin and asking about your medical history.Tests are rarely needed, but may include taking a skin sample to see if the skin is infected with the virus.Blood tests may show an increase in white blood cells and antibodies to the chickenpox virus. But the tests\u00a0cannot confirm that the rash is due to shingles.", "Treatment": "Your health care provider may prescribe a medicine that fights the virus, called an antiviral drug. This drug helps reduce pain, prevent complications, and shorten the course of the disease.The medicines should be started within\u00a072 hours of when you first feel pain or burning. It is best to start taking them before the blisters appear. The medicines are usually given in pill form. Some people may need to receive the medicine through a vein (by IV).Strong anti-inflammatory medicines called corticosteroids, such as prednisone, may be used to reduce swelling and pain. These medicines do not work in all patients.Other medicines may include:Antihistamines to reduce itching (taken by mouth or applied to the skin), Pain medicines, Zostrix, a cream containing capsaicin (an extract of pepper) to reduce pain . Follow your health care provider's instructions about how to care for yourself at home. Other measures may include:Caring for your skin by applying cool, wet compresses to reduce pain, and taking soothing baths, Resting in bed until the fever goes down . Stay away from people while your sores are oozing to avoid infecting those who have never had chickenpox -- especially pregnant women.", "Causes": "After you get chickenpox, the virus remains inactive (becomes dormant) in certain nerves in the body. Shingles occurs after the virus becomes active again in these nerves after many years. Many people had such a mild case of chickenpox that they do not realize they have had the infection.The reason the virus suddenly becomes active again is not clear. Often only one attack occurs.Shingles can develop in any age group. You are more likely to develop the condition if:You are older than age 60, You had chickenpox before age 1, Your immune system is weakened by medications or disease . If an adult or child has direct contact with the shingles rash and did not have chickenpox as a child or get\u00a0the chickenpox vaccine, they can develop chickenpox, not shingles.", "Prevention": "Do not touch the rash and blisters on persons with shingles or chickenpox if you have never had chickenpox or the chickenpox vaccine.A herpes zoster vaccine is available. It is different than the chickenpox vaccine. Older adults who receive the herpes zoster vaccine are less likely to have complications from shingles.\u00a0\r\n \r\n"}, "Sheehan syndrome": {"description": "Sheehan syndrome is a condition that\u00a0can occur in a woman who bleeds severely during childbirth. Sheehan syndrome is a type of hypopituitarism. \r\n ", "Possible Complications": "This condition can be life threatening if not treated.", "Symptoms": ["Inability to breast-feed (breast milk never \"comes in\")", "Fatigue", "Lack of menstrual bleeding", "Loss of pubic and axillary hair", "Low blood pressure"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests to measure hormone levels, MRI of the head to rule out other pituitary problems, such as a tumor. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves estrogen and progesterone hormone replacement therapy. These hormones\u00a0must be taken at least until the normal age of menopause. Thyroid and adrenal hormones must also be taken. These will be needed for the rest of your life.", "Causes": "Severe bleeding during childbirth can\u00a0result in\u00a0tissue death in the pituitary gland. This causes the gland to lose its ability to work properly.The pituitary gland is\u00a0at the base of the brain. It makes hormones that stimulate growth,\u00a0production of\u00a0breast milk, reproductive functions, the thyroid, and the adrenal glands. A lack of these hormones can lead to a variety of symptoms.Conditions that increase the risk of bleeding during childbirth and Sheehan syndrome include multiple pregnancy (twins or triplets) and problems with the placenta. The placenta is\u00a0the organ that develops during pregnancy to feed the fetus.Sheehan syndrome is very rare.", "Prevention": "Extreme bleeding during childbirth can often be prevented by proper medical care. Otherwise, Sheehan syndrome is not preventable."}, "Subacute thyroiditis": {"description": "Subacute thyroiditis involves swelling (inflammation) of the thyroid gland that usually follows an upper respiratory infection.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent hypothyroidism, Subacute thyroiditis returns after treatment. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Hoarseness", "Tenderness when gentle pressure is applied to the thyroid gland (palpation)", "Weakness", "Diarrhea", "Hair loss", "Heat intolerance", "Irregular menstrual periods in women", "Mood changes", "Nervousness", "Palpitations", "Sweating", "Tremor", "Weight loss ", "Cold intolerance", "Constipation", "Fatigue"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests that may be done include:Thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) level, T4 (thyroid hormone, thyroxine) level, Radioactive iodine uptake, Thyroglobulin level, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR). In some cases, thyroid biopsy may be done. ", "Treatment": "The purpose of treatment is to reduce pain and inflammation and treat hyperthyroidism, if it occurs. Anti-inflammatory medications such as aspirin or ibuprofen are used to control pain in mild cases.More serious cases may need temporary treatment with steroids (for example, prednisone) to control inflammation. Symptoms of hyperthyroidism are treated with a class of drugs called beta-blockers.", "Causes": "Subacute thyroiditis is a rare condition. It is thought to be caused by a viral infection. The condition often occurs after a viral infection of the upper respiratory tract, such as mumps and influenza, or a common cold.Subacute thyroiditis occurs most often in middle-aged women with recent (within the last month) symptoms of a viral respiratory tract infection.", "Prevention": "Vaccines that prevent viral infections such as the flu may help prevent subacute thyroiditis. Other causes may not be preventable."}, "Scleritis": {"description": "Scleritis is an inflammation of the sclera (the white outer wall of the eye).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Return of scleritis, Side effects of long-term corticosteroid therapy, Perforation of the eyeball, leading to vision loss if the condition is left untreated. ", "Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Eye pain and tenderness - severe", "Red patches on the normally white part of the eye", "Sensitivity to light - very painful", "Tearing of the eye"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform the following tests:Eye exam, Physical exam and blood tests to look for conditions that may be causing the problem. It is important for your provider to determine if you have scleritis or a less severe form of inflammation, such as episcleritis.", "Treatment": "Treatments for scleritis may include:Corticosteroid eye drops to help reduce the inflammation , Corticosteroid pills , Newer, nonsteroid anti-inflammatory (NSAID) drugs in some cases, Certain anti-cancer drugs (immune-suppressants)\u00a0for severe cases. If scleritis is caused by an underlying disease, treatment of that disease may be needed.", "Causes": "Inflammation of the sclera is often linked to autoimmune diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis and systemic lupus erythematosus. Sometimes the cause is unknown.Scleritis occurs most often in people between the ages of 30 and 60. It is rare in children.", "Prevention": "Most cases cannot be prevented.People with autoimmune diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis, may need to have regular check-ups with an ophthalmologist familiar with the condition. "}, "Schizophrenia": {"description": "Schizophrenia is a mental disorder that makes it hard to:", "Possible Complications": "Having schizophrenia increases the risk of:Developing a problem with alcohol or drugs (substance abuse). Using alcohol or other drugs increases the chances that symptoms will return., Physical illness. This is due to an inactive lifestyle and side effects of medication., Suicide . ", "Symptoms": ["Irritable or tense feeling", "Trouble concentrating", "Trouble sleeping ", "Hearing or seeing things that are not there (hallucinations)", "Isolation", "Reduced emotion", "Problems paying attention", "Strongly held beliefs that are not real (delusions)", "Talking in a way that does not make sense", "Thoughts that \"jump\" between different topics (\u201cloose associations\u201d) "], "Exams and Tests": "There are no medical tests to diagnose schizophrenia. A psychiatrist should examine the person and make the diagnosis. The diagnosis is made based on an interview of the person and family members. The psychiatrist will ask about:How long the symptoms have lasted, How ability to function has changed, Developmental background, Genetic and family history, How well medicines have worked, Substance abuse, Medical conditions . Brain scans (such as CT or MRI) and blood tests may help rule out other conditions that have similar symptoms.", "Treatment": "During an episode of schizophrenia, the person may need to stay in the hospital for safety reasons.MEDICATIONSAntipsychotic medicines are the most effective treatment for schizophrenia. They change the balance of chemicals in the brain and can help control symptoms.While helpful, these medicines can cause side effects. But many side effects can be managed. For this reason, they should not prevent the person from getting treated for this serious condition.Common side effects from antipsychotics may include:\r\n Dizziness\r\n , \r\n Feelings of restlessness or jitteryness\r\n , \r\n Sleepiness (sedation)\r\n , \r\n Slowed movements\r\n , \r\n Tremor\r\n , \r\n Weight gain\r\n . Long-term use of antipsychotic medicines may increase the risk of a movement disorder called tardive dyskinesia. This condition causes repeated movements that the person cannot control. Call the health care provider right away if you think you or your family member may have this condition due to the medicine.When schizophrenia does not improve with antipsychotics, other medicines may be tried.Schizophrenia is a life-long illness. Most people with this condition need to stay on antipsychotic medication for life.SUPPORT PROGRAMS AND THERAPIESSupport therapy may be helpful for many people with schizophrenia. Behavioral techniques, such as social skills training, can help the person function better in social and work situations. Job training and relationship-building classes are also important.Family members and caregivers are very important in the treatment of schizophrenia. Important skills that may be learned at such programs include:Coping with symptoms that are present, even while taking medicines, A healthy lifestyle, including getting enough sleep and staying away from recreational drugs, Taking medicines correctly and how to manage side effects, Watching for the return of symptoms, and knowing what to do when they return, Getting the right support services . ", "Causes": "Schizophrenia is a complex illness. Mental health experts are not sure what causes it. Genes may play a role.Schizophrenia occurs in just as many men as in women. It usually begins in the teen years or young adulthood, but it may begin later in life. In women, it tends to begin later and is a milder condition.Schizophrenia in children usually begins after age 5. Childhood schizophrenia is rare and can be hard to tell apart from other developmental problems such as autism.", "Prevention": "Schizophrenia cannot be prevented.Symptoms may be prevented by taking medication exactly as instructed by the doctor. Symptoms are likely to return if medication is stopped.Changing or stopping medications should only be done by the doctor who prescribed them."}, "Secondary amenorrhea": {"Symptoms": ["Breast size changes", "Weight gain or weight loss", "Discharge from the breast or change in breast size", "Acne and increased hair growth in a male pattern", "Vaginal dryness", "Voice changes "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam and pelvic exam must be done to check for pregnancy. A pregnancy test will be done.Blood tests may be done to check hormone levels, including:Estradiol levels, Follicle stimulating hormone (FSH level), Luteinizing hormone (LH level), Prolactin level, Serum hormone levels such as testosterone levels, Thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) . Other tests that may be performed include:CT scan or MRI scan of the head to look for tumors, Biopsy of the lining of the uterus, Genetic testing, Ultrasound of the pelvis or hysterosonogram (pelvic ultrasound that involves putting saline solution inside the uterus) . ", "description": "Women who are pregnant, breastfeeding, or in menopause are not considered to have secondary amenorrhea.", "Causes": "Women who take birth control pills or who receive hormone shots such as Depo-Provera may not have any monthly bleeding. When they stop taking these hormones, their periods may not return for more than 6 months.You are more likely to have amenorrhea if you:Are obese, Exercise too much and for long periods of time, Have very low body fat (less than 15 - 17%), Have severe anxiety or emotional distress, Lose a lot of weight suddenly (for example, from strict or extreme diets or after gastric bypass surgery) . Other causes include:Brain (pituitary) tumors, Chemotherapy drugs for cancer, Drugs to treat schizophrenia or psychosis, Overactive thyroid gland, Polycystic ovarian syndrome, Reduced function of the ovaries . Also, procedures such as a dilation and curettage (D and C) can cause scar tissue to form. This tissue may cause a woman to stop menstruating. This is called Asherman syndrome. Scarring may also be caused by some severe pelvic infections.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of amenorrhea. Normal monthly periods usually return after the condition is treated.A lack of menstrual period due to obesity, vigorous exercise, or weight loss may respond to a change in exercise routine or weight control (gain or loss, as needed)."}, "Schizophrenia - disorganized type": {"Symptoms": ["Active behavior, but in an aimless and not constructive way", "Bizarre and inappropriate emotional responses (laughter)", "Difficulty feeling pleasure", "False, fixed beliefs (delusions)", "Grimacing", "Lack of motivation", "Seeing or hearing things that aren't there (hallucinations)", "Strange or silly behavior", "Speech that makes no sense"], "description": "Disorganized schizophrenia is a type of schizophrenia in which behavior is disturbed and has no purpose.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. This type of schizophrenia usually begins before age 25."}, "Sodium hypochlorite poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nCoughing (from the fumes). ", "Coughing (from the fumes)", "Eyes, ears, nose, mouth, and throat \r\n\r\nBurning, red eyes, Gagging sensation, Pain in the mouth, Pain in the throat, Possible burns on esophagus. ", "Burning, red eyes", "Gagging sensation", "Pain in the mouth", "Pain in the throat", "Possible burns on esophagus", "Heart and blood vessels \r\n\r\nChest pain, Low blood pressure, Slow heartbeat, Shock. ", "Chest pain", "Low blood pressure", "Slow heartbeat", "Shock", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nDelirium, Coma. ", "Delirium", "Coma", "Skin \r\n\r\nIrritation of the exposed area, Burns, Blistering. ", "Irritation of the exposed area", "Burns", "Blistering", "Stomach and intestines \r\n\r\nStomach or abdominal pain, Vomiting. ", "Stomach or abdominal pain", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Systemic lupus erythematosus": {"description": "Systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE) is an autoimmune disease in which the body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue. It can affect the skin, joints, kidneys, brain, and other organs. ", "Possible Complications": "Some people with SLE have abnormal deposits in the kidney cells. This leads to a condition called lupus nephritis. Patients with this problem may go on to develop kidney failure and need dialysis or a kidney transplant.SLE can cause damage in many different parts of the body, including:Blood clots in the legs or lungs , Destruction of red blood cells or anemia of chronic disease, Fluid around the heart endocarditis, or inflammation of the heart (myocarditis), Fluid around the lungs and damage to lung tissue, Pregnancy problems, including miscarriage, Stroke, Severely low blood platelet count (platelets are needed to stop any bleeding), Inflammation of the blood vessels . ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain when taking a deep breath", "Fatigue", "Fever with no other cause", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Hair loss", "Mouth sores", "Sensitivity to sunlight", "Skin rash -- a \"butterfly\" rash in about half people with SLE. The rash is most often seen over the cheeks and bridge of the nose, but can be widespread. It gets worse in sunlight.", "Swollen lymph nodes", " \r\n Brain and nervous system: headaches, numbness, tingling, seizures, vision problems, personality changes", " \r\n Digestive tract: abdominal pain, nausea, and vomiting", " \r\n Heart: abnormal heart rhythms (arrhythmias)", " \r\n Lung: coughing up blood and difficulty breathing", " \r\n Skin: patchy skin color, fingers that change color when cold (Raynaud's phenomenon)", " \r\n Kidney: swelling in the legs, weight gain"], "Exams and Tests": "To be diagnosed with lupus, you must have 4 out of 11 common signs of the disease.Your doctor will do a physical exam and listen to your chest. An abnormal sound called a heart friction rub or pleural friction rub may be heard. A nervous system exam will also be done.Tests used to diagnose SLE may include:Antibody tests, including antinuclear antibody (ANA) panel, CBC, Chest x-ray, Kidney biopsy, Urinalysis. You may also have other tests to learn more about your condition. Some of these are:Antithyroglobulin antibody, Antithyroid microsomal antibody, Complement components (C3 and C4), Coombs' test - direct, Cryoglobulins, ESR, Kidney function blood tests, Liver function blood tests, Rheumatoid factor, Antiphospholipid antibodies. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for SLE. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms. Severe symptoms that involve the heart, lungs, kidneys, and other organs often need treatment from specialists. Mild forms of the disease may be treated with:NSAIDs for joint symptoms and pleurisy, after talking with your doctor, Corticosteroid creams for skin rashes, A drug also used to treat malaria (hydroxychloroquine) and low-dose corticosteroids for skin and arthritis symptoms . Treatments for more severe\u00a0SLE may include:High-dose corticosteroids, Cytotoxic drugs (drugs that block cell growth or drugs which dampen or suppress the immune system): These medicines are used if you do not get better with corticosteroids, or if your symptoms get worse when you stop taking them. Side effects from these drugs can be severe, so you need to be monitored closely if you take them. . If you have SLE, it is also important to:Wear protective clothing, sunglasses, and sunscreen when in the sun, Get preventive heart care, Stay up-to-date with immunizations, Have tests to screen for thinning of the bones (osteoporosis) . ", "Causes": "The underlying cause of autoimmune diseases is not fully known.SLE is much more common in women than men. It may occur at any age, but appears most often in people between the ages of 10 and 50. African Americans and Asians are affected more often than people from other races.SLE may also be caused by certain drugs. "}, "Septic shock": {"description": "Septic shock is a serious condition that occurs when a body-wide infection leads to dangerously low blood pressure.", "Possible Complications": "Respiratory failure, cardiac failure, or any other organ failure can occur. Gangrene may occur, possibly leading to amputation.", "Symptoms": ["Cool, pale arms and legs", "High or very low temperature, chills", "Light-headedness", "Little or no urine", "Low blood pressure, especially when standing", "Palpitations", "Rapid heart rate", "Restlessness, agitation, lethargy, or confusion", "Shortness of breath", "Skin rash or discoloration "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests may be done to check for:Infection around the body, Low blood oxygen level, Disturbances in the body's acid-base balance, Poor organ function or organ failure . Other tests may include:A chest x-ray to look for pneumonia or fluid in the lungs (pulmonary edema), A urine sample to look for infection. Additional studies, such as blood cultures, may not become positive for several days after the blood has been taken, or for several days after the shock has developed.", "Treatment": "Septic shock is a medical emergency. In most cases, people are admitted to the intensive care unit of the hospital.Treatment may include:Breathing machine (mechanical ventilation), Dialysis, Drugs to treat low blood pressure, infection, or blood clotting, Fluids given directly into a vein (intravenously), Oxygen, Sedatives, Surgery . The pressure in the heart and lungs may be checked. This is called hemodynamic monitoring. This can only be done with special equipment and intensive care nursing.", "Causes": "Septic shock occurs most often in the very old and the very young. It may also occur in people with weakened immune systems. Any type of bacteria can cause septic shock. Fungi and (rarely) viruses may also cause the condition. Toxins released by the bacteria or fungi may cause tissue damage. This may lead to low blood pressure and poor organ function. Some researchers think that blood clots in small arteries cause the lack of blood flow and poor organ function. The body has a strong inflammatory response to the toxins that may contribute to organ damage.Risk factors for septic shock include:Diabetes, Diseases of the genitourinary system, biliary system, or intestinal system, Diseases that weaken the immune system, such as AIDS, Indwelling catheters (those that remain in place for extended periods, especially intravenous lines and urinary catheters and plastic and metal stents used for drainage), Leukemia, Long-term use of antibiotics, Lymphoma, Recent infection, Recent surgery or medical procedure, Recent use of steroid medications, Solid organ or bone marrow transplantation. ", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of bacterial infections is helpful. However, many cases of septic shock cannot be prevented."}, "Secobarbital overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty, including slow or no breathing", "Coma", "Confusion", "Delirium", "Deep sleep", "Excitement", "Headache", "Low blood pressure", "Slurred speech", "Unsteady gait", "Weak pulse"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Subareolar abscess": {"description": "Subareolar abscess is an abscess, or growth, on the areolar gland. The areolar gland is located in the breast under or below the areola (colored area around the nipple).", "Possible Complications": "Subareolar abscess may return until the affected gland is surgically removed. Any infection in a female who is not nursing has the potential to be a rare cancer. You may need to have a biopsy or other tests if standard treatment fails.", "Symptoms": ["Swollen, tender lump beneath the areolar area", "Drainage and possible pus from this lump", "Fever", "General ill feeling"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a breast exam. Sometimes an ultrasound or other imaging test of the breast is recommended. A blood count and a culture of the abscess, if drained, may be ordered.", "Treatment": "Subareolar abscesses are treated with antibiotics and by opening and draining the infected tissue. This can be done in a doctor's office with local numbing medicine. If the abscess returns, the affected glands should be surgically removed. The abscess can also be drained using a sterile needle. This is often done under ultrasound guidance.", "Causes": "Subareolar abscess is caused by a blockage of the small glands or ducts below the skin of the areola. This blockage leads to infection of the glands.This is an uncommon problem that affects younger or middle-aged women who are not breastfeeding. Risk factors include:Diabetes, Nipple piercing, Smoking. "}, "Sinusitis": {"description": "Sinusitis is inflammation of the sinuses. It occurs as the result of an infection from a virus, bacteria, or fungus.", "Possible Complications": "Although very rare, complications may include:Abscess, Bone infection (osteomyelitis), Meningitis, Skin infection around the eye (orbital cellulitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Bad breath or loss of smell", "Cough, often worse at night", "Fatigue and general feeling of being ill", "Fever", "Headache", "Pressure-like pain, pain behind the eyes, toothache, or tenderness of the face", "Nasal stuffiness and discharge", "Sore throat and postnasal drip ", "Cold or respiratory illness that has been getting better and then begins to get worse", "High fever, along with a darkened nasal discharge, that lasts for at least 3 days", "Nasal discharge, with or without a cough, that has been present for more than 10 days and is not improving "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine you or your child for sinusitis by:Looking in the nose for signs of polyps, Shining a light against the sinus (transillumination) for signs of inflammation, Tapping over a sinus area to find infection . The doctor may view the sinuses through a fiberoptic scope (called nasal endoscopy or rhinoscopy)\u00a0to diagnose sinusitis. This is often done by doctors who specialize in ear, nose, and throat problems (ENTs).Imaging tests that may be used to decide on treatment are:A CT scan of the sinuses to help diagnose sinusitis or view the bones and tissues of the sinuses more closely, An MRI of the sinuses if there might be a tumor or fungal infection . Most of the time, regular x-rays of the sinuses do not diagnose sinusitis well.If you or your child has sinusitis that does not go away or keeps returning, other tests may include:Allergy testing, Blood tests for HIV or other tests for poor immune function, Ciliary function test, Nasal culture, Nasal cytology, Sweat chloride tests for cystic fibrosis . ", "Treatment": "SELF CARETry the following steps to reduce congestion in your sinuses:Apply a warm, moist washcloth to your face several times a day., Drink plenty of fluids to thin the mucus., Inhale steam 2 - 4 times per day (for example, while sitting in the bathroom with the shower running)., Spray with nasal saline several times per day., Use a humidifier., Use a Neti pot to flush the sinuses. . Be careful with use of over-the-counter spray nasal decongestants. They may help at first, but using them for more than 3 - 5 days can make nasal stuffiness worse.To help ease sinus pain or pressure:Avoid flying when you are congested., Avoid temperature extremes, sudden changes in temperature, and bending forward with your head down., Try acetaminophen or ibuprofen. . MEDICINE AND OTHER TREATMENTSMost of the time, antibiotics are not needed for acute sinusitis. Most of these infections go away on their own. Even when antibiotics do help, they may only slightly reduce the time it takes for the infection to go away. Antibiotics may be prescribed sooner for:Children with nasal discharge, possibly with a cough, that is not getting better after 2 - 3 weeks, Fever higher than 102.2\u00b0 Fahrenheit (39\u00b0 Celsius), Headache or pain in the face, Severe swelling around the eyes . Acute sinusitis should be treated for 10 - 14 days. Chronic sinusitis should be treated for 3 - 4 weeks. Some people with chronic sinusitis may need special medicines to treat fungal infections.At some point, your doctor will consider: Other prescription medicines, More testing, Referral to an ear, nose, and throat (ENT) or allergy specialist . Other treatments for sinusitis include:Allergy shots (immunotherapy) to help prevent the disease from returning, Avoiding allergy triggers, Nasal corticosteroid sprays and antihistamines to decrease swelling, especially if there are nasal polyps or allergies . Surgery to enlarge the sinus opening and drain the sinuses may also be needed. You mayo consider this procedure if:Your symptoms do not go away after 3 months of treatment., You have more than two or three episodes of acute sinusitis each year. . Most fungal sinus infections need surgery. Surgery to repair a deviated septum or nasal polyps may prevent the condition from returning.", "Causes": "The sinuses are air-filled spaces in the skull. They are located behind the forehead, nasal bones, cheeks, and eyes. Healthy sinuses contain no bacteria or other germs. Most of the time, mucus is able to drain out and air is able to flow through the sinuses.When the sinus openings become blocked or too much mucus builds up, bacteria and other germs can grow more easily.Sinusitis can occur from one of these conditions:Small hairs (cilia) in the sinuses fail to properly to move mucus out. This may be due to some medical conditions., Colds and allergies may cause too much mucus to be made or block the opening of the sinuses., A deviated nasal septum, nasal bone spur, or nasal polyps may block the opening of the sinuses.. There are two types of sinusitis:Acute sinusitis is when\u00a0symptoms are present for 4 weeks or less. It is caused by bacteria growing in the sinuses., Chronic sinusitis is when swelling and inflammation of the sinuses are present for longer than 3 months.\u00a0It may be caused by bacteria or a fungus. . The following may increase the risk that an adult or child will develop sinusitis:Allergic rhinitis or hay fever, Cystic fibrosis, Going to day care, Diseases that prevent the cilia from working properly, Changes in altitude (flying or scuba diving), Large adenoids, Smoking, Weakened immune system from HIV or chemotherapy. ", "Prevention": "The best way to prevent sinusitis is to avoid colds and flu or treat problems quickly.Eat plenty of fruits and vegetables, which are rich in antioxidants and other chemicals that could boost your immune system and help your body resist infection., Get an influenza vaccine each year., Reduce stress., Wash your hands often, particularly after shaking hands with others. . Other tips for preventing sinusitis:Avoid smoke and pollutants., Drink plenty of fluids to increase moisture in your body., Take decongestants during an upper respiratory infection., Treat allergies quickly and appropriately., Use a humidifier to increase moisture in your nose and sinuses. . "}, "Swallowing sunscreen": {"Symptoms": ["Eye irritation if it touched the eyes", "Nausea and vomiting", "Rash", "Shortness of breath (more common in allergic reactions)", "Slowed breathing (in extremely high doses)", "\r\n Wheezing (more common in allergic reactions)"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Syphilis - primary": {"description": "Syphilis is a bacterial infection that is most often spread through sexual contact.", "Possible Complications": "Cardiovascular complications (aortitis and aneurysms), Destructive sores of skin and bones (gummas), Neurosyphilis, Syphilitic myelopathy - a complication that involves muscle weakness and abnormal sensations, Syphilitic meningitis. In addition, untreated secondary syphilis during pregnancy may spread the disease to the developing baby. This is called congenital syphilis.", "Symptoms": ["Small, painless open sore or ulcer (called a chancre) on the genitals, mouth, skin, or rectum that heals by itself in 3\u00a0to 6 weeks", "Enlarged lymph nodes in the area of the sore ", "Skin rash, usually on the palms of the hands and soles of the feet", "Sores called mucous patches in or around the mouth, vagina, or penis", "Moist, warty patches (called condylomata lata) in the genitals or skin folds", "Fever", "General ill feeling", "Loss of appetite", "Muscle aches", "Joint pain", "Swollen lymph nodes", "Vision changes", "Hair loss", "Damage to the heart, causing aneurysms or valve disease", "Central nervous system disorders (neurosyphilis)", "Tumors of skin, bones, or liver "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. Tests that may be done include:Examination of fluid from sore, Echocardiogram, aortic angiogram, and cardiac catheterization to look at the major blood vessels and the heart, Spinal tap and examination of spinal fluid, Blood tests to screen for syphillis bacteria (RPR, VDRL, or TRUST). If the RPR, VDRL, or TRUST tests are positive, one of the following tests will be needed to confirm the diagnosis: FTA-ABS (fluorescent treponemal antibody test), MHA-TP, TP-EIA, TP-PA . ", "Treatment": "Syphilis can be treated with antibiotics, such as: Doxycycline, Penicillin G benzathine, Tetracycline (for patients who are allergic to penicillin) . Length of treatment depends on how severe the syphilis is, and factors such as the patient's overall health.To treat syphilis during pregnancy, penicillin is the drug of choice. Tetracycline cannot be used for treatment because it is dangerous to the unborn baby. Erythromycin may not prevent congenital syphilis in the baby. People who are allergic to penicillin should ideally be desensitized to it, and then treated with penicillin.Several hours after getting treatment for the early stages of syphilis, people may experience the Jarisch-Herxheimer reaction. This process is caused by an immune reaction to the breakdown products of the infection.Symptoms and signs of this reaction include:Chills, Fever, General ill feeling (malaise), Headache, Joint aches, Muscle aches, Nausea, Rash . These symptoms usually disappear within 24 hours.Follow-up blood tests must be done at 3, 6, 12, and 24 months to ensure that the infection is gone. Avoid sexual contact when the chancre is present. Use condoms until two follow-up tests have shown that the infection has been cured, to reduce the chance of transmitting the infection.All sexual partners of the person with syphilis should also be treated. Syphilis is extremely contagious in the primary and secondary stages.", "Causes": "Syphilis is a sexually transmitted, infectious disease caused by the spirochete bacterium Treponema pallidum. This bacterium causes infection when it gets into broken skin or mucus membranes, usually of the genitals. Syphilis is most often transmitted through sexual contact, although it also can be transmitted in other ways.Syphilis occurs worldwide, most commonly in urban areas. The number of cases is rising fastest in men who have sex with men. Young adults ages 15\u00a0to 25 are the highest-risk population. People have no natural resistance to syphilis.Because people may be unaware that they are infected with syphilis, many states require tests for syphilis before marriage. All pregnant women who receive prenatal care should be screened for syphilis to prevent the infection from passing to their newborn (congenital syphilis).Syphilis has three stages:Primary syphilis, Secondary syphilis, Tertiary syphilis (the late phase of the illness). Secondary syphilis, tertiary syphilis, and congenital syphilis are not seen as often in the United States as they were in the past because of the availability of:Free, government-sponsored sexually transmitted infection (STI) clinics, Screening tests for syphilis, Public education about STIs, Prenatal screening. ", "Prevention": "If you are sexually active, practice safe sex and always use a condom.All pregnant women should be screened for syphilis."}, "Stonefish sting": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing ", "Collapse ", "Bleeding", "Severe pain at the site of the sting", "Whitened color of the area around the site of the sting", "Color of the area changes as the amount of oxygen supplying the area decreases ", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting ", "Delirium", "Fainting", "Fever (from infection)", "Headache", "Muscle twitching", "Seizures", "Paralysis "], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "If scuba diving or snorkeling, learn to identify potentially poisonous or otherwise dangerous sea creatures and their habits."}, "Selective deficiency of IgA": {"description": "Selective deficiency of IgA is the most common immune deficiency disorder. Persons with this disorder have a low or absent level of a blood protein called immunoglobulin A.", "Possible Complications": "Autoimmune disorders such as rheumatoid arthritis, systemic lupus erythematosus, and celiac sprue may develop.Patients with IgA deficiency may develop antibodies to IgA, and can have severe, even life-threatening reactions to transfusions of blood and blood products. If transfusions are necessary, washed cells may be cautiously given.", "Symptoms": ["Bronchitis", "Chronic diarrhea", "Conjunctivitis (eye infection)", "Gastrointestinal inflammation, including ulcerative colitis, Crohn's disease, and a sprue-like illness", "Mouth infection", "Otitis media (middle ear infection)", "Pneumonia", "Sinusitis", "Skin infections", "Upper respiratory tract infections ", "Bronchiectasis (a disease in which the small air sacs in the lungs become damaged and enlarged)", "Unexplained asthma"], "Exams and Tests": "There may be a family history of IgA deficiency. Tests that may be done include:IgA, IgG, IgG subclass measurements, IgM, Quantitative immunoglobulins, Serum immunoelectrophoresis. ", "Treatment": "No specific treatment is available. Some people gradually develop normal levels of IgA without treatment.Infections should be treated with antibiotics. In some cases, longer courses of antibiotics may be needed to prevent infections from coming back.Those with selective IgA deficiency who also have IgG subclass deficiencies may be helped with intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIG), given through a vein. Subcutaneous immunoglobulin (SCIG) treatments given under the skin may also help.Autoimmune disease treatment is based on the specific problem.Note: People with complete IgA deficiency may develop anti-IgA antibodies if given blood products and IVIG. This may lead to allergies or life-threatening anaphylactic shock. These individuals can safely be given IgA-depleted IVIG.", "Causes": "IgA deficiency is usually inherited, which means it is passed down through families. However, cases of drug-induced IgA deficiency have been reported.It may be inherited as an autosomal dominant or autosomal recessive trait. It is found in approximately 1 in 700 individuals of European origin. It is less common in people of other ethnicities.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be of value to prospective parents with a family history of selective IgA deficiency."}, "Smashed fingers": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty moving the tip of the finger", "Discoloration or bruising of the finger or fingernail", "Finger pain", "Loss of fingernail", "Swelling"], "Causes": "Finger(s) can be smashed by a hammer blow, a car door, a desk drawer, a baseball, or some other force.", "description": "Smashed fingers is an injury involving trauma to one or more fingers.", "Prevention": "Teach safety to young children. Use caution when shutting doors to make sure fingers are not in danger."}, "Seasonal affective disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Hopelessness", " \r\n Increased appetite with weight gain (weight loss is more common with other forms of depression)", "Increased sleep (too little sleep is more common with other forms of depression)", "Less energy and ability to concentrate", "Loss of interest in work or other activities", "Sluggish movements", "Social withdrawal", "Unhappiness and irritability "], "Exams and Tests": "There is no test for SAD. Your health care provider can make a diagnosis by asking about your history of symptoms.The health care provider may also perform a physical exam and blood tests to rule out other disorders that are similar to SAD.", "description": "Seasonal affective disorder (SAD) is\u00a0a\u00a0type\u00a0of depression that occurs at a certain time of the year, usually in winter.", "Causes": "SAD may begin during the teen years or in\u00a0adulthood. Like other forms of depression, it occurs more often in women than in men.People who live in places with long winter nights are at high risk of SAD. A less common form of the disorder involves depression during the summer months.", "Treatment": "As with other types of depression, antidepressant medicines and talk therapy can be effective.MANAGING YOUR DEPRESSION AT HOMETo manage your symptoms at home:Get enough sleep., Eat a healthy foods., Take medicines the right way. Ask your health care provider how to manage side effects., Learn to watch for early signs that your depression is getting worse. Have a plan if it does get worse., Try to exercise more often. Do activities that make you happy. . Do not use alcohol or illegal drugs. These can make depression worse. They can also cause you to think about suicide.When you are struggling with depression, talk about how you are feeling with someone you trust. Try to be around people who are caring and positive. Volunteer or get involved in group activities.LIGHT THERAPYYour health care provider may prescribe light therapy. Light therapy uses a special lamp with a very bright light that mimics light from the sun:Treatment is started in the fall or early winter, before the symptoms of SAD begin., Follow your health care provider's instructions about how to use light therapy. One way that may be recommended is to sit a couple of feet away from the light box for about 30 minutes each day. This is usually done in the early morning, to mimic sunrise., Keep your eyes open, but do not look straight into the light source. . If light therapy is going to help, symptoms of depression should improve within 3 to 4 weeks.Side effects of light therapy include:Eye strain or headache, Mania, rare . People who take medicines that make them more sensitive to light, such as certain psoriasis drugs, antibiotics, or antipsychotics, should not use light therapy.A checkup with your eye doctor is recommended before starting treatment.With no treatment, symptoms usually get better on their own with the change of seasons. Symptoms can improve more quickly with treatment."}, "Swimmer's ear ": {"description": "Swimmer's ear may be acute or chronic. ", "Possible Complications": "The infection may spread to other areas around the ear, including the skull bone. In elderly people or those who have diabetes, a severe infection called malignant otitis externa may occur. This condition is treated with high-dose antibiotics given through a vein.", "Symptoms": ["Drainage from the ear -- yellow, yellow-green, pus-like, or foul smelling", "Ear pain, which may get worse when you pull on the outer ear", "Hearing loss", "Itching of the ear or ear canal "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will look inside your ears. The ear canal area will look red and swollen. The skin inside the ear canal may be scaly or shedding.Touching or moving the outer ear will increase the pain. The eardrum may be hard to see because of a swelling in the outer ear. Or, the eardrum may have a hole in it. This is called a perforation.A sample of fluid may be removed from the ear and sent to a lab to look for bacteria or fungus.", "Treatment": "In most cases, you will need to use ear drops containing antibiotics for 10 to 14 days. If the ear canal is very swollen, a wick may be put into the ear to allow the drops to travel to the end of the canal. Your doctor or nurse can show you how to do this.Other treatments may include:\r\n Antibiotics taken by mouth if you have a middle ear infection or infection that spreads beyond the ear\r\n , \r\n Corticosteroids to reduce itching and inflammation\r\n , \r\n Pain medication, such as acetaminophen (Tylenol) or ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin)\r\n , \r\n Vinegar (acetic acid) ear drops\r\n . People with chronic swimmer's ear may need long-term or repeated treatments to avoid complications.Placing something warm against the ear may reduce pain.", "Causes": "Swimmer's ear is more common among teenagers and young adults. It may occur with a middle ear infection or a respiratory infection such as a cold.Swimming in unclean water can lead to swimmer's ear. Pseudomonas and other bacteria commonly often found in water can cause ear infections. Rarely, the infection may be caused by a fungus.Other causes of swimmer's ear include:\r\n Scratching the ear or inside the ear\r\n , \r\n Getting something stuck in the ear\r\n . Trying to clean wax from the ear canal with cotton swabs or small objects can damage the skin.Long-term (chronic) swimmer's ear may be due to:\r\n Allergic reaction to something placed in the ear\r\n , \r\n Chronic skin conditions, such as eczema or psoriasis\r\n . ", "Prevention": "These steps can help protect your ears from further damage.Do not scratch the ears or insert cotton swabs or other objects in the ears., Keep ears clean and dry, and do not let water enter the ears when showering, shampooing, or bathing., Dry your ear very well after it has gotten wet., Avoid swimming in polluted water., Use earplugs when swimming., Try mixing 1 drop of alcohol with 1 drop of white vinegar and placing the mixture into the ears after they get wet. The alcohol and acid in the vinegar help prevent bacterial growth.. "}, "Septic arthritis": {"description": "Septic arthritis is inflammation of a joint due to a bacterial or fungal infection. Septic arthritis that is due to the bacteria that cause gonorrhea has different symptoms and is also called gonococcal arthritis.", "Possible Complications": "\r\n \r\nJoint degeneration (arthritis)", "Symptoms": ["Cries when infected joint is moved (example: diaper change causes crying if hip joint is infected)", "Fever", "Inability to move the limb with the infected joint (pseudoparalysis)", "Irritability", "Inability to move the limb with the infected joint (pseudoparalysis)", "Intense joint pain", "Joint swelling", "Joint redness", "Fever"], "Exams and Tests": "Aspiration of joint fluid for cell count, examination of crystals under the microscope, gram stain, and culture, Blood culture, X-ray of affected joint. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are used to treat the infection.Resting, keeping the joint still, raising the joint, and using cool compresses may help relieve pain. Exercising the affected joint helps the recovery process.If joint (synovial) fluid builds up quickly due to the infection, a needle may be inserted into the joint often to aspirate the fluid. Severe cases may need surgery to drain the infected joint fluid.", "Causes": "Septic arthritis develops when bacteria or other tiny disease-causing organisms (microorganisms) spread through the blood to a joint. It may also occur when the joint is directly infected with a microorganism from an injury or during surgery.\u00a0Joints that are commonly affected are the knee and hip.\u00a0Most cases of acute septic arthritis are caused by bacteria such as Staphylococcus or Streptococcus.Chronic septic arthritis (which is less common) is caused by organisms such as Mycobacterium tuberculosis and Candida albicans.The following conditions increase your risk for septic arthritis:Artificial joint implants, Bacterial infection somewhere else in your body, Presence of bacteria in your blood, Chronic illness or disease (such as diabetes, rheumatoid arthritis, and sickle cell disease), Intravenous (IV) or injection drug use, Medications that suppress your immune system, Recent joint injury, Recent joint arthroscopy or other surgery. Septic arthritis may be seen at any age. In children, it occurs most often in those younger than 3 years. The hip is often the site of infection in infants.Septic arthritis is uncommon from age 3 to adolescence. Children with septic arthritis are more likely than adults to be infected with Group B streptococcus or Haemophilus influenza, if they have not been vaccinated.", "Prevention": "Preventive (prophylactic) antibiotics may be helpful for people at high risk."}, "Subacute sclerosing panencephalitis": {"description": "Subacute sclerosing panencephalitis (SSPE) is a progressive, debilitating, and deadly brain disorder related to measles (rubeola) infection.", "Possible Complications": "Prior to death, there may be:Behavior changes\r\n, Dementia\r\n, Stupor and coma\r\n, Seizures and subsequent injuries. ", "Symptoms": ["Bizarre behavior", "Dementia (loss of mental, emotional, and social abilities)", "Coma", "Gradual behavioral changes", "Myoclonic jerking (quick muscle jerking or spasms)", "School problems", "Seizures", "Unsteady gait", "Very tense muscles or muscles that lack tone, with weakness in both legs "], "Exams and Tests": "There may be a history of measles in an unvaccinated child. A physical examination may reveal: Damage to the optic nerve, which is responsible for sight, Damage to the retina, the part of the eye that receives light, Muscle twitching, Poor performance on motor (movement) coordination tests . The following tests may be performed:Electroencephalogram (EEG), Brain MRI, Serum antibody titer to look for signs of previous measles infection, Spinal tap . ", "Treatment": "No cure for SSPE exists. However, certain antiviral drugs may slow the progression of the disease.", "Causes": "Ordinarily, the measles virus does not cause brain damage. But an abnormal immune response to measles or, possibly, certain mutant forms of the virus may cause severe illness and death. This response leads to brain inflammation (swelling and irritation) that may last for years.SSPE has been reported in all parts of the world, but in western countries it is considered a rare disease.Fewer than 10 cases per year are reported in the United States. This dramatic decrease followed the nationwide measles immunization program. However, in some countries like India, over 20 cases of SSPE per million people are reported each year.SSPE tends to occur several years after an individual has measles, even though the person seems to have fully recovered from the illness. Males are more often affected than females. The disease generally occurs in children and adolescents.", "Prevention": "Immunization against measles is the only known prevention for SSPE. The measles vaccine has been highly effective in reducing the numbers of affected children.Measles immunization should be done according to the recommended American Academy of Pediatrics and Centers for Disease Control schedule. "}, "Shaken baby syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Convulsions (seizures)", "Decreased alertness", "Extreme irritability or other changes in behavior", "Lethargy, sleepiness, not smiling", "Loss of consciousness", "Loss of vision", "No breathing", "Pale or bluish skin", "Poor feeding, lack of appetite", "Vomiting "], "Causes": "In most cases, an angry parent or caregiver shakes the baby to punish or quiet the child. Such shaking usually takes place when the infant is crying inconsolably and the frustrated caregiver loses control. Many times the caregiver did not intend to harm the baby. Still, it is a form of child abuse.Injuries are most likely to happen when the baby is shaken and then the baby's head hits something. Even hitting a soft object, such as a mattress or pillow, may be enough to injure newborns and small infants. Children's brains are softer, their neck muscles and ligaments are weak, and their heads are large and heavy in proportion to their bodies. The result is a type of whiplash, similar to what occurs in some auto accidents.Shaken baby syndrome does not result from gentle bouncing, playful swinging or tossing the child in the air, or jogging with the child. It also is very unlikely to occur from accidents such as falling off chairs or down stairs, or accidentally being dropped from a caregiver's arms. Short falls may cause other types of head injuries, although these are often minor.", "description": "Shaken baby syndrome is a severe form of child abuse caused by violently shaking an infant or child.", "Prevention": "Never shake a baby or child in play or in anger. Even gentle shaking can become violent shaking when you are angry., Do\u00a0not hold your baby during an argument., If you find yourself becoming annoyed or angry with your baby, put him in the crib and leave the room. Try to calm down. Call someone for support., Call a friend or relative to come and stay with the child if you feel out of control., Contact a local crisis hotline or child abuse hotline for help and guidance., Seek the help of a counselor and attend parenting classes., Do\u00a0not ignore the signs if you suspect child abuse in your home or in the home of someone you know. . "}, "Stroke": {"description": "If blood flow is cut off for longer than a few seconds, the brain cannot get nutrients and oxygen. Brain cells can die, causing lasting damage. ", "Symptoms": ["Starts suddenly and may be severe", "May be worse\u00a0when you are lying flat", "Wakes you up from sleep", "Gets worse when you change positions or when you bend, strain, or cough ", "Change in alertness (including sleepiness, unconsciousness, and coma)", "Changes in hearing", "Changes in taste", "Changes that affect touch and the ability to feel pain, pressure, or different temperatures", "Clumsiness", "Confusion or loss of memory", "Difficulty swallowing", "Difficulty writing or reading", "Dizziness or abnormal feeling of movement (vertigo)", "Eyesight problems, such as decreased vision, double vision, or total loss of vision", "Lack of control over the bladder or bowels", "Loss of balance", "Loss of coordination", "Muscle weakness in the face, arm, or leg (usually just on one side)", "Numbness or tingling on one side of the body", "Personality, mood, or emotional changes", "Trouble speaking or understanding others who are speaking", "Trouble walking "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will do a physical exam to:\r\nCheck for problems with vision, movement, feeling, reflexes, understanding, and speaking. Your doctor and nurses will repeat this exam over time to see if your stroke is getting worse or improving.\r\n  , Listen for an abnormal sound, called a \"bruit,\" when using a stethoscope to listen to the carotid arteries in the neck. A bruit is caused by abnormal blood flow.\r\n  , Check for high blood pressure\r\n  . You may have the following tests to help find the type, location, and cause of the stroke and rule out other disorders:\r\nAngiogram of the head to look for a blood vessel that is blocked or bleeding\r\n  , Carotid duplex (ultrasound) to see if the carotid arteries in your neck have narrowed\r\n  , Echocardiogram to see if the stroke could have been caused by a blood clot from the heart\r\n  , Magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) or CT angiography to check for abnormal blood vessels in the brain\r\n  . Other tests include:\r\nBlood tests\r\n  , Electrocardiogram (ECG) and heart rhythm monitoring\r\n  . ", "Causes": "There are two major types of stroke: Ischemic stroke, Hemorrhagic stroke . Ischemic stroke occurs when a blood vessel that supplies blood to the brain is blocked by a blood clot. This may happen in two ways: A clot may form in an artery that is already very narrow. This is called a thrombotic stroke., A clot may break off from another place in the blood vessels of the brain, or from some other part of the body, and travel up to the brain. This is called cerebral embolism, or an embolic stroke. . Ischemic strokes may also be caused by a sticky substance called plaque that can clog arteries. Watch this video about:StrokeWatch this video about:Stroke - secondary to cardiogenic embolismA hemorrhagic stroke occurs when a blood vessel in part of the brain becomes weak and bursts open. This causes blood to leak into the brain. Some people have defects in the blood vessels of the brain that make this more likely. These defects may include: Aneurysm, Arteriovenous malformation (AVM) . Hemorrhagic strokes may also occur when someone is taking blood thinners, such as warfarin (Coumadin). Very high blood pressure may cause blood vessels to burst, leading to hemorrhagic stroke. An ischemic stroke can develop bleeding and become a hemorrhagic stroke.High blood pressure is the main risk factor for strokes. The other major risk factors are:Atrial fibrillation, Diabetes\u00a0, Family history of stroke, High cholesterol, Increasing age, especially after age 55, Race (black people are more likely to die of a stroke) . Stroke risk is also higher in: People who have heart disease or poor blood flow in their legs caused by narrowed arteries, People who have unhealthy lifestyle habits such as smoking, a high fat diet, and lack of exercise, Women who take birth control pills (especially those who smoke and are older than 35) . ", "Prevention": "Reducing your stroke\r\nrisk factors lessen your chances of a having stroke.\r\n", "Treatment": "A stroke is a medical emergency. Quick treatment is needed. Call 911 or your local emergency number or seek urgent medical care at the first signs of a stroke. People who are having stroke symptoms need to get to a hospital as quickly as possible. If the stroke is caused by a blood clot, a clot-busting drug may be given to dissolve the clot., To be effective, this treatment must be started within 3 to 4 1/2 hours of when the symptoms first started. The sooner this treatment is started, the better chances of a good outcome. . Other treatments given in the hospital will depend on the cause of the stroke. These may include: Blood thinners such as heparin, warfarin (Coumadin), aspirin, or clopidogrel (Plavix), Medicine to control risk factors, such as high blood pressure, diabetes, and\u00a0high cholesterol, Special procedures or surgery to relieve symptoms or prevent more strokes, Nutrients and fluids . Physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech therapy, and swallowing therapy will all begin in the hospital. If the person has severe swallowing problems, a feeding tube in the stomach (gastrostomy tube) will likely be needed.The goal of treatment after a stroke is to help you recover as much function as possible and prevent future strokes. Recovery from your stroke will begin while you are still in the hospital or at a rehabilitation center. It will continue when you go home from the hospital or center. "}, "Shigellosis": {"description": "Shigellosis is an acute bacterial infection of the lining of the intestines.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include: Dehydration - severe, Hemolytic-uremic syndrome (HUS), a form of kidney failure with anemia and clotting problems, Reactive arthritis. About 1 in 10 children with severe Shigella enteritis develop neurological problems, including febrile seizures (also called a \"fever fit\") when body temperature rises quickly and the child has seizures,\u00a0or a brain disease (encephalopathy) with headache, lethargy, confusion, and stiff neck.", "Symptoms": ["Acute (sudden) abdominal pain or cramping", "Acute fever", "Blood, mucus, or pus in the stool", "Crampy rectal pain", "Nausea and vomiting", "Watery diarrhea"], "Exams and Tests": "If you have symptoms of shigellosis, your health care provider will check for:Dehydration (not enough fluids in your body) with a fast heart rate and low blood pressure, Abdominal tenderness, Elevated level of white blood cells in the blood, Stool culture\r\n  to check for white blood cells. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to replace fluids and electrolytes (salt and minerals) that are lost in diarrhea.Medications that stop diarrhea are generally not given, because they can cause the infection to take longer to go away.Self-care measures to avoid dehydration include drinking electrolyte solutions to replace the fluids lost by diarrhea. Several varieties of electrolyte solutions are available over the counter (without a prescription).Antibiotics can help shorten the length of the illness and help prevent it from spreading to others in group living or day care settings. They may also be prescribed for patients with severe symptoms.If you have diarrhea and cannot drink fluids by mouth because of severe nausea, you may need medical attention and fluids through a vein (IV, or intravenously). This is especially common in small children who have shigellosis.People who take diuretics (\"water pills\") may need to stop taking\u00a0these medicines if they have acute\u00a0Shigella enteritis. Never stop taking any medicine without first talking to your health care provider.", "Causes": "Shigellosis is caused by a group of bacteria called Shigella.There are several types of Shigella bacteria, including.Shigella sonnei, also called \"group D\" Shigella, is responsible for most cases of shigellosis in the United States., Shigella flexneri, or \"group B\" Shigella, causes almost all other cases., Shigella dysenteriae, or \"group A\" Shigella\u00a0is rare in the U.S., but can lead to deadly outbreaks in developing countries.. People infected with the bacteria release it into their stool. They can spread the\u00a0bacteria to water or food, or directly to another person. Getting just a little bit of the Shigella bacteria into your mouth is enough to cause infection.Outbreaks of shigellosis are\u00a0linked with poor sanitation, contaminated food and water, and crowded living conditions.Shigellosis is common among travelers in developing countries and workers or residents in refugee camps.In the U.S., the condition is most commonly seen in day care centers and places where groups of people live, such as nursing homes.", "Prevention": "Prevention includes properly handling, storing, and preparing food,\u00a0and good personal hygiene. Hand washing is the most effective way to prevent shigellosis. Avoid food and water that may be contaminated."}, "Somatic symptom disorder": {"description": "The pain and other symptoms people with this disorder feel are real, and are not created or faked on purpose.", "Possible Complications": "You can become dependent on pain relievers or sedatives.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Amnesia", "Back pain", "Bloating", "Chest pain", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty swallowing", "Dizziness", "Headaches", "Impotence", "Joint pain", "Nausea and sometimes vomiting", "Pain during intercourse", "Pain during urination", "Painful menstruation\u00a0", "Pain in the legs or arms", "Palpitations", "Paralysis or muscle weakness", "Shortness of breath", "Vision changes"], "Exams and Tests": "A thorough physical examination and diagnostic tests are performed to identify physical causes. The types of tests that are done depend on what symptoms you have.A psychological evaluation is performed to identify related disorders.After you have a thorough evaluation, if no physical cause is found to explain the symptoms, SSD may be diagnosed.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you learn to control your symptoms.Having a supportive relationship with a health care provider is the most important part of treatment.You should have only one primary care provider, to avoid having too many tests and procedures., Schedule regular appointments to review your symptoms and how you are coping. The health care provider should explain any test results., Talk to your provider about any medicines you take for your pain or other symptoms. Ask if you should keep taking these medicines, or try other symptom-relief methods.. Finding a mental health provider who has experience treating SSD with talk therapy (psychotherapy) can be helpful. Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT), a kind of talk therapy, can help you deal with your pain or other symptoms. During therapy, you will learn:To recognize what seems to make the pain or other symptoms worse, To develop methods of coping with the pain or other symptoms, To keep yourself more active, even if you still have pain or other symptoms. If you have depression or an anxiety disorder, it may respond to antidepressant medications.You should not be told that your symptoms are imaginary. Many health care providers now recognize that real physical symptoms can result from\u00a0emotional stress.", "Causes": "Somatic symptom\u00a0disorder (SSD) usually begins\u00a0after age 30. SSD\u00a0occurs more often in women than in men. In the past, this disorder was thought to be related to emotional stress. The pain was dismissed as being \"all in\u00a0the person's\u00a0head.\"But patients who have SSD seem to experience pain or other symptoms in a way that increases the level of pain. Pain and worry create a cycle that is hard to break.People who have a history of physical or sexual abuse are more likely to have this disorder.\u00a0But not every person with SSD has a history of abuse.As researchers study the connections between the brain and body, there is more evidence that emotional well-being affects the way people perceive pain and other symptoms.Somatic symptom disorder is different\u00a0from illness anxiety disorder. With illness anxiety disorder, persons are overly focused on their health. They worry that physical symptoms or signs of normal body function mean they have a medical problem, but the medical cause is not found.", "Prevention": "Counseling may help people who are prone to\u00a0SSD learn other ways of dealing with stress. This may help reduce the intensity of symptoms."}, "Schizoaffective disorder": {"description": "Schizoaffective disorder is a mental condition that causes both a loss of contact with reality (psychosis) and mood problems (depression or mania).", "Possible Complications": "Complications are similar to those for schizophrenia and major mood disorders. These include:Drug use, Problems following medical treatment and therapy, Problems due to manic behavior (for example, spending sprees, overly sexual behavior), Suicidal behavior . ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in appetite and energy", "Disorganized speech that is not logical", "False beliefs (delusions), such as thinking someone is trying to harm you (paranoia) or thinking that special messages are hidden in common places (delusions of reference)", "Lack of concern with hygiene or grooming", "Mood that is either too good, or depressed or irritable", "Problems sleeping", "Problems with concentration", "Sadness or hopelessness", "Seeing or hearing things that are not there (hallucinations)", "Social isolation", "Speaking so quickly that others cannot interrupt you "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a mental health assessment to find out about your behavior and symptoms. You may be referred to a psychiatrist to confirm the diagnosis.To be diagnosed with schizoaffective disorder, the person has symptoms of both psychotic and a mood disorder. In addition, the person must have psychotic symptoms during a period of normal mood for at least 2 weeks.The combination of psychotic and mood symptoms in schizoaffective disorder can be seen in other illnesses, such as bipolar disorder. Extreme disturbance in mood is an important part of schizoaffective disorder.Before diagnosing schizoaffective disorder, the health care provider will rule out medical and drug-related conditions. Other mental disorders that cause psychotic or mood symptoms must also be ruled out. For example, psychotic or mood disorder symptoms can occur in people who:\r\n  \r\n  Abuse cocaine, amphetamines, or phencyclidine (PCP)\r\n  \r\n  , \r\n  \r\n  Have seizure disorders\r\n  \r\n  , \r\n  Take steroid medications\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "Treatment can vary. In general, your health care provider will prescribe medicines to improve your mood and treat psychosis:Antipsychotic medicines are used to treat psychotic symptoms., Antidepressant medicines, or mood stabilizers, may be prescribed to improve mood. . Talk therapy can help with creating plans, solving problems, and maintaining relationships. Group therapy can help with social isolation.Support and work training may be helpful for work skills, relationships, money management, and living situations.", "Causes": "The exact cause of schizoaffective disorder is unknown. Changes in genes and chemicals in the brain (neurotransmitters) may play a role.Schizoaffective disorder is thought to be less common than schizophrenia and mood disorders. Women may have the condition more often than men. Schizoaffective disorder tends to be rare in children."}, "Superficial thrombophlebitis": {"description": "Superficial thrombophlebitis is inflammation of a vein located just below the skin\u2019s surface. The inflammation is due to a blood clot.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of superficial thrombophlebitis are rare. Possible problems may include the following:\r\nInfections (cellulitis)\r\n\r\n, Deep vein thrombosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Skin redness, inflammation, tenderness, or pain along a vein just below the skin", "Warmth of the area", "Limb pain", "Hardening of the vein "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will diagnose superficial thrombophlebitis based mainly on the appearance of the affected area. Frequent checks of the pulse, blood pressure, temperature, skin condition, and blood flow may be needed.Duplex ultrasound helps confirm the condition.If there are signs of an infection, skin or blood cultures may be done.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment are to reduce pain and inflammation and prevent complications.To reduce discomfort and swelling, your health care provider may recommend that you:Wear support stockings, if your leg is affected, Keep the affected leg or arm raised above heart level , Apply a warm compress to the area . If you have a catheter or IV line, it will likely be removed if it is the cause of the thrombophlebitis.Medicines that may be prescribed include:Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) to reduce inflammation, Painkillers. If deeper clots (deep vein thrombosis) are also present, your provider may prescribe medicines to thin your blood. These medicines are called anticoagulants. Antibiotics are prescribed if you have an infection.Surgical removal (phlebectomy), stripping, or sclerotherapy of the affected vein are occasionally needed to treat large varicose veins or to prevent further episodes of thrombophlebitis in high-risk patients.", "Causes": "This condition may occur after injury to the vein. Or it may occur after having an intravenous (IV) line or catheter. If you have a high risk of this condition, you may develop it for no apparent reason. Risks of superficial thrombophlebitis include:Chemical irritation of the area, Disorders that involve increased blood clotting, Infection, Pregnancy, Sitting or staying still for a prolonged period, Use of birth control pills, Varicose veins. Superficial thrombophlebitis may be associated with:Abdominal cancers (such as pancreatic cancer), Deep vein thrombosis, Factor V Leiden, Prothrombin gene mutation, Thromboangiitis obliterans. Other rare disorders associated this condition include antithrombin III (AT-III), protein C and protein S deficiencies.", "Prevention": "If you need to have an IV, the risk of superficial thrombophlebitis may be reduced by regularly changing the location of the IV and by immediate removal of the IV line if signs of inflammation develop.Whenever possible, avoid keeping your legs and arm still for long periods. Move your legs often or take a stroll during long plane trips, car trips, and other situations in which you are sitting or lying down for long periods. Walking and staying active as soon as possible after surgery or during a long-term medical illness can also reduce your risk of thrombophlebitis."}, "Sebaceous cyst": {"description": "A sebaceous cyst is a closed sac under the skin filled with a cheese-like or oily material.", "Possible Complications": "Cysts may become infected and form painful abscesses.Cysts may return, even\u00a0after they are surgically removed.", "Symptoms": ["Skin redness", "Tender or sore skin", "Warm skin in the affected area", "Grayish-white, cheesy, foul-smelling material that drains from the cyst"], "Exams and Tests": "In most cases, your doctor can make a diagnosis\u00a0by examining your skin. Sometimes, a biopsy may be needed to rule out other conditions.", "Treatment": "Sebaceous cysts are not dangerous and can usually be ignored. Placing a warm moist cloth (compress) over the area may help the cyst drain and heal.If you have a small inflamed cyst, your doctor may inject it with a steroid medicine that reduces swelling.If the cyst becomes swollen, tender, or large, your doctor may drain it or perform surgery to remove it.", "Causes": "Sebaceous cysts most often arise from swollen hair follicles. Skin trauma can also\u00a0cause a cyst to form. A sac of cells is created into which a protein called keratin is secreted."}, "Schizotypal personality disorder": {"description": "Schizotypal personality disorder is a mental health condition in which a person has trouble with relationships and disturbances in thought patterns, appearance, and behavior.", "Possible Complications": "Poor social skills\r\n, Lack of interpersonal relationships. ", "Symptoms": ["Discomfort in social situations", "Inappropriate displays of feelings", "No close friends", "Odd behavior or appearance", "Odd beliefs, fantasies, or preoccupations", "Odd speech"], "Exams and Tests": "Schizotypal personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "Talk therapy is an important part of treatment. Social skills training can help some people cope with social situations. Medicines may also be a helpful addition.", "Causes": "Cause\u00a0of schizotypal personality disorder is\u00a0unknown. Genes are thought to be involved because this condition is more common in relatives of schizophrenics.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Awareness of risk, such as a family history of schizophrenia, may allow early diagnosis."}, "Secondary parkinsonism": {"description": "Parkinsonism refers to any condition that involves the types of movement\u00a0problems seen in Parkinson disease. These problems include tremors, slow movement, and stiffness of the arms and legs.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty doing daily activities, \r\n  Difficulty swallowing (eating), Disability (varying degrees) , Injuries from falls, Side effects of medications used to treat the condition. Side effects from loss of strength (debilitation):\r\n  Breathing in food, fluid, or mucus (aspiration)\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , \r\n  Blood clot in a deep vein (deep vein thrombosis)\r\n  , Malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Decrease in facial expressions", "Difficulty starting and controlling movement", "Loss or weakness of movement (paralysis)", "Soft voice", "Stiffness of the trunk, arms, or legs", "Tremor"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask questions about\u00a0the person's\u00a0medical history and symptoms.\u00a0Be aware that\u00a0the symptoms may be\u00a0hard to assess, particularly in the elderly.Examination may show:Difficulty starting or stopping voluntary movements, Tense muscles, Problems with posture, Slow, shuffling walk, Tremors (shaking). Reflexes are usually normal.Tests may be\u00a0ordered to confirm or rule out other\u00a0problems that can cause similar symptoms.", "Treatment": "If the condition is caused by a medicine, the doctor may recommend changing or stopping the medicine.Treating underlying conditions such as stroke or infections can reduce symptoms or prevent the condition from getting worse.If symptoms make it hard to do everyday activities,\u00a0the doctor may recommend medicine. Medicines used to treat this condition can cause severe side effects. It is important to see the doctor for check-ups. Secondary parkinsonism tends to be less responsive to medical therapy than Parkinson disease.", "Causes": "Secondary parkinsonism may be caused by health problems, including:Brain injury, Diffuse Lewy body disease (a type of dementia), Encephalitis, HIV/AIDS, Meningitis, Multiple system atrophy, Progressive supranuclear palsy, Stroke, Wilson disease. Other causes of secondary parkinsonism include:Brain damage caused by anesthesia drugs (such as during surgery), Carbon monoxide poisoning, Certain medicines used to treat mental disorders or nausea, Mercury poisoning and other chemical poisonings, Overdoses of narcotics, MPTP (a contaminant in some street drugs) . There have been cases of secondary parkinsonism among IV drug users who injected a substance called MPTP, which can be produced when making a form of heroin. These cases are rare and have mostly affected long-term\u00a0IV drug users.", "Prevention": "Treating conditions that cause secondary parkinsonism may decrease the risk. People taking medicines that can cause secondary parkinsonism should be carefully monitored by the doctor to prevent the condition from developing."}, "Sodium hydroxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Lung inflammation", "Sneezing", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe) and stomach", "Diarrhea", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Drooling", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure (develops rapidly)", "Severe change in pH (too much or too little acid in the blood)", "Shock", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in their original and/or childproof container, with labels visible, and out of the reach of children."}, "Schizoid personality disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Appears aloof and detached", "Avoids social activities that involve emotional intimacy with other people", "Does not want or enjoy close relationships, even with family members"], "Exams and Tests": "Schizoid personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "description": "Schizoid personality disorder is a mental health condition in which a person has a lifelong pattern of indifference to others and social isolation.", "Causes": "Cause of schizoid personality disorder\u00a0is unknown. This disorder may be related to schizophrenia and shares many of the same risk factors.Schizoid personality disorder is generally not as disabling as schizophrenia. It does not cause the disconnection from reality (in the form of\u00a0hallucinations\u00a0or delusions) that occurs in untreated (or treatment-resistant) schizophrenia.", "Treatment": "People with this disorder rarely seek treatment,\u00a0thus little is known about which treatments work. Talk therapy may not be effective because persons with schizoid personality disorder may\u00a0have great difficulty forming an effective working relationship with a therapist.One approach that appears to help is to put fewer demands for emotional closeness or intimacy on the person with this condition.People with schizoid personality disorder often do\u00a0well in relationships that do not focus on emotional closeness. They\u00a0tend to be\u00a0better at handling relationships that focus on work or intellectual activities and expectations."}, "Shampoo - swallowing": {"Symptoms": ["Vomiting", "Diarrhea"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Scheie syndrome": {"description": "See also:", "Possible Complications": "Compression of the spinal cord, which can lead to loss of nerve function, Extremity deformities, Hearing loss and deafness, Problems with the aortic valve, Vision problems. ", "Symptoms": ["Broad mouth with full lips", "Claw hands and deformed feet", "Cloudy cornea and progressive loss of vision, resulting in blindness", "Coarsened facial features", "Increased body hair (hirsutism)", "Prognathism", "Stiff joints"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show signs of:Aortic regurgitation, Hearing loss, Hernias -- inguinal hernia, umbilical hernia, Liver swelling, Prognathism. An eye exam will show cloudy corneas and retinal pigmentation.Urine tests will be done. Persons with Scheie syndrome have increased amounts of dermatan and heparan sulfate in their urine. See: Urine dermatan sulfateOther tests may include:Blood culture, Culture of skin fibroblasts, Echocardiogram, X-ray of the skeleton. ", "Treatment": "Enzyme replacement therapy for patients with a defect in the enzyme a-L-iduronidase (lauonidase) is now possible. This includes individuals with Scheie syndrome, but also Hurler and Hurler-Scheie syndromes.Early recognition and treatment of spinal cord compression can prevent permanent nerve damage. Treatment is also given for heart problems caused by leaky valves.", "Causes": "Persons with Scheie syndrome are missing a substance called lysosomal alpha-L-iduronidase. This substance, called an enzyme, helps break down long chains of sugar molecules called glycosaminoglycans (formerly called mucopolysaccharides). These molecules are found throughout the body, often in mucus and in fluid around the joints.Without the enzyme, glycosaminoglycans build up. This excess material is stored in body tissues and can damage organs, including the heart. Symptoms can range from mild to severe.Scheie syndrome is the mildest form of mucopolysaccharidosis type 1. The syndrome is transmitted as an autosomal recessive trait. If both parents carry the defective gene related to this condition, each of their children has a 25% chance of developing the disease.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended for prospective parents with a family history of Scheie syndrome. Counseling is also recommended for families who have a child with Scheie syndrome, to help them understand the condition and possible treatments. Prenatal testing is available."}, "Salivary duct stones": {"Symptoms": ["Problems opening the mouth or swallowing", "Dry mouth", "Pain in the face or mouth", "Swelling of the face or neck (can be severe when eating or drinking) "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider or dentist will do an exam of your head and neck to look for one or more enlarged, tender salivary glands. The doctor may be able to feel the stone during the exam. Tests such as x-rays, ultrasound, MRI scan or CT scan of the face are used to confirm the diagnosis. ", "description": "Salivary duct stones are deposits of minerals in the ducts that drain the salivary glands. Salivary duct stones are a type of salivary gland disorder. ", "Causes": "Saliva (spit) is produced by the salivary glands in the mouth. The chemicals in saliva can form a hard crystal that can block the salivary ducts. When saliva cannot exit a blocked duct, it backs up into the gland. This may cause pain and swelling of the gland. There are three pairs of major salivary glands. Parotid glands. These are the two largest glands. One is located in each cheek over the jaw in front of the ears. Inflammation of one or more of these glands is called parotitis, or parotiditis. , Submandibular glands. These two glands located at the back of the mouth on both sides of the jaw. , Sublingual glands. These two glands are located are under the floor of the mouth.. Salivary stones most often affect the submandibular glands. They can also affect the parotid glands. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to remove the stone. Steps you can take at home include: Drinking lots of water, Using sugar-free lemon drops to increase the saliva. Other ways to remove the stone are:Massaging the gland with heat. The doctor or dentist may be able to push the stone out of the duct. , In some cases, you may need surgery to cut out the stone. , A newer treatment that uses shock waves to break the stone into small pieces is another option., A new technique called Sialoendoscopy can diagnose and treat stones in the salivary gland duct using miniature cameras and instruments, If stones become infected or\u00a0come back\u00a0often, you may need surgery to remove the salivary gland. . "}, "Skull fracture": {"Symptoms": ["Bleeding from wound, ears, nose, or around eyes", "Bruising behind the ears or under the eyes", "Changes in pupils (sizes unequal, not reactive to light)", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Difficulties with balance", "Drainage of clear or bloody fluid from ears or nose", "Drowsiness", "Headache", "Loss of consciousness", "Nausea", "Restlessness, irritability", "Slurred speech", "Stiff neck", "Swelling", "Visual disturbances", "Vomiting "], "Causes": "Head trauma, Falls, automobile accidents, physical assault, and sports. ", "description": "A skull fracture is a fracture or break in the cranial (skull) bones.", "Prevention": "Although no child is injury-proof, parents can take some simple steps to keep their children from getting head injuries. Not all head injuries can be prevented. The following simple steps can help keep you and your child safe: Always use safety equipment during activities that could cause a head injury. These include seat belts, bicycle or motorcycle helmets, and hard hats.Learn and follow bicycle safety recommendations.Do not drink and drive. Do not allow yourself to be driven by someone who may have been drinking alcohol or is otherwise impaired. "}, "Salivary gland tumors": {"description": "Salivary gland tumors are abnormal cells growing in the tubes (ducts) that drain the salivary glands or the gland itself.", "Possible Complications": "Cancerous tumors may cause further complications, including spread to other organs (metastasis)., In rare cases, surgery to remove the tumor can injure the nerve that controls movement of the face. . ", "Symptoms": ["Firm, usually painless swelling in one of the salivary glands (in front of the ears, under the chin, or on the floor of the mouth); size of the swelling gradually increases.", "Difficulty moving one side of the face, known as facial nerve palsy "], "Exams and Tests": "An examination by a health care provider or dentist shows a larger than normal salivary gland, usually one of the parotid glands.Tests may include:X-rays of the salivary gland (called a ptyalogram or sialogram) to look for a tumor, Ultrasound, CT scan or MRI to confirm that there is a growth, and to see if the cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the neck, Salivary gland biopsy or fine needle aspiration to determine whether the tumor is benign or malignant . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is usually done to remove the affected salivary gland. If the tumor is benign, no other treatment is needed.Radiation therapy or extensive surgery may be needed if the tumor is cancerous. Chemotherapy may be used when the disease has spread beyond the salivary glands.", "Causes": "The salivary glands are located around the mouth. They produce saliva, which moistens food to help with chewing and swallowing.There are three main pairs of salivary glands. The parotid glands are the largest. They are located in each cheek above the jaw in front of the ears. Two submandibular glands are at the back of the mouth. They are on both sides of the jaw. Two sublingual glands are under the floor of the mouth. There are also thousands of small salivary glands around the rest of the mouth.Salivary glands empty saliva into the mouth through ducts that open at various places in the mouth.Salivary gland tumors are rare, especially in children. Swelling of the salivary glands is mostly due to:Abdominal surgery, Cirrhosis of the liver, Infections, Other cancers, Salivary duct stones, Salivary gland infections, Sarcoidosis, Sjogren syndrome. The most common type of salivary gland tumor is a slow-growing noncancerous (benign) tumor of the parotid gland. The tumor gradually increases the size of the gland. Some of these tumors can be cancerous (malignant)."}, "Stasis dermatitis and ulcers": {"description": "Stasis dermatitis is a change in the skin that occurs when blood collects (pools) in the veins of the lower leg.", "Possible Complications": "Bacterial skin infections, Chronic leg ulcers, Infection of bone, Permanent scar. ", "Symptoms": ["Dull aching or heaviness in the leg", "Pain that gets worse when you stand", "Swelling in the leg", "Thickening and hardening of the skin on the legs and ankles (lipodermatosclerosis)", "A bumpy or cobblestone appearance of the skin", "Dark brown color"], "Exams and Tests": "The diagnosis is primarily based on the way the skin looks. Your doctor may order tests to examine the blood flow in your legs.Stasis dermatitis can be related to heart problems, so you may need tests to check your heart function.", "Treatment": "You may take the following steps to manage the venous insufficiency that causes stasis dermatitis:Use elastic or compression stockings to reduce swelling, Avoid standing or sitting for long periods of time, Keep your leg raised when you sit, Try varicose vein stripping or other surgical procedures. Some skin care treatments can make the problem worse. Talk with your health care provider before using any lotions, creams, or antibiotic ointments. Things to avoid:Topical antibiotics, such as neomycin, Drying lotions, such as calamine, Lanolin, Benzocaine and other products meant to numb the skin. Treatments your health care provider may suggest include:Wet dressings (use only when instructed), Topical steroid creams or ointments, Oral antibiotics. ", "Causes": "Venous insufficiency is a long-term (chronic) condition in which the veins have problems sending blood from the legs back to the heart.Some people with venous insufficiency develop stasis dermatitis. Blood pools in the veins of the lower leg. Fluid and blood cells leak out of the veins into the skin and other tissues. This may lead to itching and inflammation, which cause more skin changes.", "Prevention": "To prevent this condition, control the causes of peripheral edema."}, "Swimming pool cleaner poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Too much or too little acid in the blood -- leads to organ damage", "Loss of vision", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Blood in the stool", "Burns of the food pipe (esophagus)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Nausea", "Vomiting (may contain blood)", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in the substance)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Burn", "Holes (necrosis) in the skin or tissues underneath", "Irritation"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Scabies": {"description": "Scabies is an easily spread skin disease caused by a very small\u00a0type of mite.", "Possible Complications": "Intense scratching can cause a secondary skin infection, such as impetigo.", "Symptoms": ["Itching,\u00a0most commonly\u00a0at night", "Rashes, mostly between the fingers", "Sores (abrasions) on the skin from scratching and digging", "Thin, pencil-mark lines on the skin", "In young children, the infection may be on the head, neck, shoulders, palms, and soles of feet.\u00a0", "In older children and adults, the infection\u00a0may be on\u00a0the hands, wrists, genitals, and abdomen. "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will examine your skin for signs of scabies. The doctor will look at scrapings taken from a burrow to look for the mites. A skin biopsy can also be done.", "Treatment": "HOME CAREBefore treatment, wash underwear, towels, and sleepwear in hot water. Items that cannot be washed or dry-cleaned can be decontaminated by removing from any body contact for at least 72 hours., Vacuum the carpets and upholstered furniture., Use calamine lotion and soak in a cool bath to ease itching., Take an oral antihistamine if your doctor recommends it for very bad itching.. MEDICINES FROM YOUR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERThe whole family or sexual partners of infected people should be treated, even if they do not have symptoms.Creams prescribed by your health care provider are needed to treat scabies.The cream most often used is permethrin 5%., Other creams include benzyl benzoate, sulfur in petrolatum, and crotamiton. , Lindane is rarely used because of its side effects.. Apply the medicine all over your body.\u00a0Creams may be used as a one-time treatment tor they may be repeated in 1\u00a0week.\u00a0For hard to treat cases, your health care provider may also prescribe a pill known as Ivermectin.\r\n\u00a0", "Causes": "Scabies is found\u00a0among people of all groups and ages around the world. Scabies spread by skin-to-skin contact with another person who has scabies., Less often it can be spread by sharing clothes or bedding.\u00a0Sometimes whole families are affected.. Outbreaks of scabies are more common in nursing homes, nursing facilities, college dorms, and child care centers.The mites that cause scabies burrow into the skin and lay their eggs. This forms a burrow that looks like a pencil mark. Eggs hatch in 21 days. The itchy rash is an allergic response to the mite.Pets and animals cannot spread human scabies. It is also not very likely for scabies to be spread by:A swimming pool, Contact with the towels, bedding, and clothing of someone who has scabies, unless the person has what is called \"crusted scabies\". "}, "Sarcoidosis": {"description": "Sarcoidosis is a disease in which inflammation occurs in the lymph nodes, lungs, liver, eyes, skin, or other tissues.", "Possible Complications": "Fungal lung infections (aspergilloma), Glaucoma and blindness from uveitis (rare), Kidney stones from high calcium levels in blood or urine, Osteoporosis and other complications of taking corticosteroids for long periods of time.,  \r\n High blood pressure in the arteries of the lungs\u00a0(pulmonary hypertension).. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain (most often behind the breast bone)", "Dry cough", "Shortness of breath", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Joint ache or pain (arthralgia)", "Weight loss", "Hair loss", "Raised, red, firm skin sores (erythema nodosum), almost always on the front part of the lower legs", "Rash", "Scars that become raised or inflamed", "Headache", "Seizures", "Weakness on one side of the face", "Burning", "Discharge from the eye", "Dry eyes", "Itching", "Pain", "Vision loss", "Dry mouth", "Fainting spells if the heart is involved", "Nosebleed", "Swelling in the upper part of the abdomen"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show the following:Abnormal breath sounds (such as rales), Enlarged liver, Enlarged lymph glands, Enlarged spleen, Rash, Eye inflammation (specialized eye exam is needed). Often the disease is found in patients with visible physical signs who have an abnormal chest x-ray.Different imaging tests may help diagnose sarcoidosis:Chest x-ray to see if the lungs are involved or lymph nodes are enlarged, CT scan of the chest, Lung gallium scan, Imaging tests of the brain and liver, Echocardiogram of the heart. To diagnose this condition, a biopsy is needed. Biopsy of the lung using bronchoscopy is usually done. Biopsies of other body tissues may also be done.The following lab tests may be done:Calcium levels (urine, ionized, serum), CBC, Immunoelectrophoresis - serum, Liver function tests, Quantitative immunoglobulins (nephelometry), Serum phosphorus, Angiotensin converting enzyme (ACE). ", "Treatment": "Sarcoidosis symptoms will often get better without treatment.If the eyes, heart, nervous system, or lungs are affected, corticosteroid medicine is usually prescribed. this medicine may need to be taken for 1 to 2 years.Medicines that suppress the immune system (immunosuppressive medicines) are sometimes also needed.In rare cases, some persons with\u00a0very severe heart or lung damage (end-stage disease) may need an organ transplant.", "Causes": "The exact cause of sarcoidosis\u00a0is unknown. What is known is that when a person has the disease, tiny clumps of abnormal tissue (granulomas) form in certain organs of the body. Granulomas are clusters of immune cells.The disease can affect almost any organ of the body. It most commonly affects the lungs.Doctors think that with sarcoidosis, persons have genes that make it easy for them to develop the disease. Things that may trigger the disease include infections with bacteria or viruses. Contact with dust or chemicals may also be triggers.The disease is more common in African-Americans and Caucasians of Scandinavian heritage. More women than men have the disease.The disease often begins between ages 20 and 40. Sarcoidosis is rare in young children.A person with a close blood relative who has sarcoidosis is nearly five times as likely to develop the condition."}, "Sciatica": {"description": "Sciatica refers to pain, weakness, numbness, or tingling in the leg. It is caused by injury to or pressure on the sciatic nerve. Sciatica is a symptom of another medical problem. It is\u00a0not a medical condition on its own.", "Possible Complications": "More serious complications depend on the cause of sciatica, such as slipped disc or spinal stenosis. Sciatica can lead to permanent numbness or weakness of your leg.", "Symptoms": ["After standing or sitting", "At night", "When sneezing, coughing, or laughing", "When bending backward or walking more than a few yards, especially if caused by spinal stenosis"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show:Weakness when bending the knee , Difficulty bending the foot inward or down, Difficulty bending forward or backward, Abnormal or weak reflexes, Loss of sensation or numbness, Pain when lifting the leg straight up off the examining table . Tests are often not needed unless pain is severe or long-lasting. If tests are ordered, they may include:Blood tests, X-rays, MRIs or other imaging tests . ", "Treatment": "Because sciatica is a symptom of another medical condition, the underlying cause should be identified and treated.In some cases, no treatment is required and recovery occurs on its own.Conservative (non-surgical) treatment is best in many cases. Your doctor may recommend the following steps to calm your symptoms and reduce inflammation:Apply heat or ice to the painful area. Try ice for the first 48\u00a0to 72 hours, then use heat., Take over-the-counter pain relievers such as ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin IB) or acetaminophen (Tylenol).. Measures to take care of your back at home:Bed rest is not recommended. , Reduce your activity for the first couple of days. Then, slowly start your usual activities. , Do not do\u00a0heavy lifting or twisting of your back for the first 6 weeks after the pain begins. , Start exercising again after 2 to 3 weeks. Include exercises to strengthen your abdomen and improve flexibility of your spine.. Physical therapy may also be recommended. Additional treatments depend on the condition that is causing the sciatica.If these measures do not help, your doctor may recommend injections of certain medicines to reduce\u00a0swelling around the nerve. Other medicines may be prescribed to help reduce the stabbing pains\u00a0due to nerve irritation.Nerve pain is very difficult to treat. If you have ongoing problems with pain, you may want to see a neurologist or a pain specialist to ensure that you have access to the widest range of treatment options.", "Causes": "Sciatica occurs when there is pressure or damage to the sciatic nerve. This nerve starts in the lower back and runs down the back of each leg. This nerve controls the muscles of the back of the knee and lower leg. It also provides sensation to the back of the thigh, part of the lower leg, and the sole of the foot.Common causes of sciatica include:Slipped disk, Spinal stenosis, Piriformis syndrome (a pain disorder involving the narrow muscle in the buttocks), Pelvic injury or fracture, Tumors. ", "Prevention": "Prevention varies, depending on the cause of the nerve damage. Avoid prolonged sitting or lying with pressure on the buttocks."}, "Short bowel syndrome": {"description": "Short bowel syndrome is a condition that occurs when part of the small intestine is missing or has been removed during surgery. Nutrients are not properly absorbed into the body (malabsorption) as a result. ", "Possible Complications": "Bacterial overgrowth in the small intestine, Nervous system problems caused by a lack of vitamin B12 , Too much acid in the blood (metabolic acidosis due to diarrhea), Gallstones, Kidney stones, Malnutrition, Weakened bones (osteomalacia), Weight loss. ", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Fatigue", "Pale, greasy stools", "Swelling (edema), especially of the legs", "Very foul-smelling stools", "Weight loss", "Dehydration"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood chemistry tests (such as albumin level), Complete blood count (CBC), Fecal fat test, Small intestine x-ray, Vitamin levels in the blood. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at relieving symptoms. Treatments may include:A high-calorie diet that supplies key vitamins and minerals, as well as carbohydrates, proteins, and fats, Injections of some vitamins and minerals, Vitamin B12, folic acid and increased iron in the diet to treat anemia, Medicines to slow down the normal movement of the intestine so food remains in the intestine longer, Injections of special growth factors, Tube feeding through a vein (parenteral nutrition) if normal feeding is not supplying enough nutrients, Small bowel transplantation in some cases . ", "Causes": "When part of the small intestine is missing, there may not be enough surface area in the bowel to absorb enough nutrients from food. The this can happen when half or more of the bowel is removed during surgery or sections are missing due to a birth defect (congenital defect), Risk factors include diseases of the small intestine that may require surgery, such as Crohn's disease. In infants, necrotizing enterocolitis is a common cause. "}}